In the city I live in, I probably am.  Might even be the entire island.  Ah well.  It's one thing to know that somewhere, out there over the Internet, there are many like me.  It's another thing to know someone, in my everyday life off the internet, who is like me too. Pixels on a screen just aren't enough. Life is a sadness.  But what else can we do but live it?  Life is a happiness.  But what else can we do but endure it? 
Actually, you're incorrect. My post was first, within one minute of the story being posted live on Yahoo!. I did a search on it and also distinctly remember seeing your post with fewer "minutes ago" than mine in the "new" list.  Regardless, I'm sorry if this was your best post that got buried. It didn't make my top 50 in terms of points for the year anyway.
Yeah, this was pretty weird. You can't bring a cameraphone into a courthouse here in the US; i find it hard to believe the video was done without the knowledge and consent of the people in charge.
Wait.. Did he give aid in form of weapons? If so, that shouldn't count.
WOW HOW NEAT 
I thought it was odd as well, Sirius has gotten very good subscription numbers for 2006 and will overtake XM in subscribers soon if things continue as they are, that's excellent growth compared to XM's negative growth (in subscriber numbers).   The loss in 2006 is largely attributed to spending on a new satellite, an investment that is not cheap.  Judith regan was fired for anti-semitic statements about her bosses, not necessarily the O.J. book (although that didn't help obviously).  The Karl Rove and HP ones are funny though, the hurricane one seems like it doesn't belong, who takes a pot shot at the weather service?
http://www.house.gov/paul/nytg.htm
"One of New York's Biggest Attractions", my ass. More like #837.
That answer is true to your username. Do you do that on purpose?
Downvoted due to evil video formats. What's wrong with MPEG?
A major reason that gangs rule is the lack of influence parents have over their kids.  It's something that is not limited to the Black community.  When the parents and the community as a whole feel powerless, there really isn't anything that the police can do about it.
I have to downmod you, but I just want to say that I'd upmod you for your comment about the irony, if I could.
Thanks
what do you mean by not standard? It's a standard option in the sense that it's installed by default (in fact i doubt that you can remove it), and it's fair to evaluate an operating system based on the features it provides without having to write them yourself. (Sometimes this works in reverse, when features get in the way of either speed or bulk, but every relatively mainstream OS will provide a command console.) The command console used to be so ingrained within MS that autoexec.bat etc was run directly from the cmd line. I can't remember if Win98 or Win2k was the first operating system to completely detach itself. Nevertheless, many applications still run programs within the command line- can you imagine trying to install some programs without it?
Good idea, horrible file size.
Someone care to explain what it's about, so I won't have to download the pdfs?
ahahahahahah nice !!!! hahaha
I'm going to say this:  The majority of the black people I have encountered in my life seem to be of the following: 1) Learning is "selling out to whitey".  It's cool to be stupid.  2) It's more cool to quit school, be a rapper/whatever, listen to shoes in a dryer while driving about in your 30 year old rotmachine and annoy the crap out of everyone.  3) English isn't a language, mumbling seasoned with profanity is.  4) They seem to be afraid of silence.  Have you ever noticed that around black people, there doesn't seem to be any quiet?  Ever?  5) Obviously, shoes, coats, phones, cars, "rims", systems, etc., are much more important than working, making something of yourself, and doing well.  Of course, your system has to be worth more than your car.  6) Of course, everything is the white man's fault, regardless of the fact that the particular white man you're trying to blame is a 2nd generation Pole.  Just like every white person isn't related to slaveowners, not every black person is related to slaves.  Hrm.  Know what that means?  Shut up about reparations.   7) "Assimilation", also known as "being human", is bad. Occasionally you will meet a "sellout", one that's realized that being "black" is a waste of time, and the only way to make anything of yourself is to get up and do it.  Most of the time they seem to think themselves better than everyone else, and overanunciate.  When everyone learns that skin color is just a color, and the main reason people are being discriminated against is because they bring it upon themselves, then maybe things will change.  Sure, there's the occasional jerk that actually things everyone is bad, but they're far and inbetween and can be avoided. I think I'm going to stop now.   By the way, I'm allowed to say these things.  I'm black. :p  Honestly, I wouldn't care if anyone else said them, if they're true, they're true.  If it applies to me, and it hurts, then maybe I need to change it.  If it doesn't apply to me, then I have nothing to worry about.
"But this is a guy whose job it is to negotiate these issues for the customer, so the customer doesn't have to. He's collecting money for it, he should do it." He did. He installed Linux on the box instead. Problem solved :)
china is not the next superpower.  the eu is
cool
&gt; In "My Documents" I'm out of luck. Ever tried typing "My Pic" when browsing that folder?
From what I remember from reading about this, its not quite that simple - generally, a new queen gets introduced by keeping it in a smaller cage within an existing swarm (Otherwise she does get killed by the swarm as you describe).  Eventually, the bees get accustomed to the new queen's smell and accept her as their queen. There's a great series of articles by a beginning beekeeper [here](http://www.kuro5hin.org/user/xC0000005/stories) which I think gives a description of acquiring a new queen at one point.  Its worth reading through the whole series if you're at all interested in bees, and there are some more details in his [diaries](http://www.kuro5hin.org/user/xC0000005/diary) as well.
I don't see how this helps in the long run. It's still a bitmapped image, using a standard grid of pixels. If I was a spammer, all that I would have to do is write a proper driver to convert the data to my standard processing format.
"The times you held hands under the bleachers during gym."  "The years after when you’re laughing together as you’re lying in bed at night."  "The Saturday mornings you spend with your kid skating at the rink and smiling at how cute he looks charging along with such determination."  "Creativity is the process and the unfolding. It’s not an event." those are all events she listed
check out the picture of the guy's father-in-law: http://www.simondale.net/house/images2/20051120.jpg  even looks like a hobbit
wholesale dropshipper launches new service
-1 not great
OMFG!!!!........WWJD?
Well if it's on wikipedia it must be true.  Case closed I guess.
&gt; Don't state things as facts that are not facts. According to your own definition, there are no observable facts. Or could you please specify what constitutes a fact in your understanding of science?
OMFG!!!!........WWJD?
This should not be concerned with the Broken Windows Theory:  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Fixing_Broken_Windows The above link is about the Parable of the broken window fallacy:  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Parable_of_the_broken_window 
it's a myth, there is no factual basis. The numbers about him killing millions and millions of people were invented by Genghis Khan himself - to scare his enemies.  he killed a lot of people (that's what happens in war &amp; empire) but genocide was never intended or attempted
... which means that if we develop a better, more accurate, dating method, we will revise the results. Such is the nature of science and human progress. We learn, we revise, we reject absolute truth by default. However, don't for a second believe that the sentence you quote means radiometric dating can be, and is in this case, off by several orders of magnitude.
The author points out what GM and most people seem to ignore with a passion-- it's the ENGINEERING, not the other stuff. GM has spent the last 30 years chasing (or blaming) everything else- marketing, financing, salaries, benefits, rebates, manufacturing, government regulations, government subsidies, fuel standards, vendors, corporate structure, branding etc etc. All the while ignoring the fundamental fact that THEIR ENGINEERING DESIGN SUCKS, and ultimately that's what makes a car good or not. 
You've got your head buried in sand if you think that. M$ are losing out everywhere. Vista is getting bagged all over, with Ubuntu finally giving a user-friendly Linux distro, the zune is a flop, the XBox 360 ass-whupped by the Wii, Gmail and the associated apps better than office, but available for free and without the need for on-site servers, web 2.0 apps running on any machine independant of OS.... I think it all spells Death to Redmond.
Excellent explanation!
A quick and easy tutorial that will significantly increase your downloading speed for Firefox. No plugins or software needed. Just change a few settings and max out your download bandwidth. You'll be able to download Gigs in minutes! Tags: firefox, internet, downloads, bandwidth
It seems to be a language built on top of Haskell (GHC to be specific), that uses "2D" latex/ascii code as it's syntax...to me (and my admittedly untrained eye), it looks ugly, but I don't think I understand all of what this language has in terms of features either.
So I guess by this logic, Pam Anderson's breasts deserve to be credited to the Adobe corporation (since Photoshop was most likely used by Playboy instead of airbrushing) and not the plastic surgeon who typically gets credit!
Thanks. I cannot believe how easy that looks.
"sipawhiskey"....OMFG!!! How many sips does it take before you "feel safe and comfortable"?......My kinda gal!!!
1) The author of the article is _the_ definitive authority on the Mongolian Empire. Wikipedia, on the other hand, is a bunch of crap like usual. 2) Saying the Mongols snuffed out the intellectual flowering of Islam is an extremely inaccurate and extraordinary claim. It's just wrong, really. The next sentence of that quote "Imagine [nuclear obliteration]" is a good indication that the author has no idea what he's talking about. 3) Temujin burned the library, but he also instituted widespread economic and religious freedom which directly led to prosperity, cultural sophistication, and a renaissance. Losing the library is a tragedy, but the freedom Genghis allowed under his rule is unmatched and so we did in fact see great things. 
I'm with you.  This only slows spammers down by instants, but at least it creates huge, stupid HTML files.  A thoroughly bad idea.
'Calling someone "naive" is hardly "ad-hominem attack".' It is a textbook example of an ad-hominem attack. hidalberto criticised the poster instead of the post. Now as far as Ahmadinejad is concerned, he certainly is not above reproach. He basically pulls publicity stunts and goes as far as he can to attract attention. At the same time though, the way he is presented in the west is clearly propaganda. He may be a prick, but he isn't the devil.
No, there isn't. There are however no contesting measurable data, and we use the best tools and methods we have. Hence, it is considered true until successfully challenged. Not by default, by some inherent authority, but because the method itself has been proven sound and holding up to scientific peer review. Yes, I say proven. Atom half-life is real and measurable. We might find a more accurate method though, and this would be a good thing. That is how science works. That is how human understanding works. Yes, we might be wrong, it might not be 300 million years old. It might be 310. Or 298. But if you really believe humanity is so stupid we can be wrong in dating by 299 994 000 years, then I can't really understand why you don't challenge other scientific accomplishments - such as combustion engines, satellite communications or semiconductors. After all, these technologies could, and shoul, be divine creations, since our own science is so apparently inadequate. And just so you know, there is also no scientific proof you're not a crab or a potato.
What strikes me is how puny the Star Trek ships are. The pride and joy of the Federation Starfleet, the Galaxy class, is so much smaller than the Earth/human(oid)-staffed spaceships of Babylon 5, Battlestar, Farscape, Star Wars etc.
Why in gods name would you buy HP computers and expect them not to be bundled with all sorts of crap? This is why you buy noname boxes with quality parts. A consultant that buys HP's... well what do you expect! If you dont know what quality parts are, or which brands to avoid ( HINT HP ), well then maybe you should find another line of work. Im tired of every idiot out there with an mcse thinking that they can charge $150 an hour and then blaming the companies for the bad decisions that THEY make! And not knowing that windows wont load drivers from anything other than the A: drive is just amatureish (like most tech *theinquirer* articles). To anyone who says whaa whaa blame M$, well would you blame linux for people not knowing how to recompile their kernels for some obscure device? or would you blame the tech for his lack of experience... (I mean seriously, he took 7 tries to enter the **bios** for a raid card?!! come on.)
Also Bangladesh.
That is some hilarious shit.  It's a rare a page that gets me truly LOL, but this one pulled it off.  Tears in my eyes.
Funny story, even if it is fictitious. The best part was the comment at the bottom regarding the Violent Acres story. If you haven't read it, you should. I was always taught to turn the other cheek. Wish I hadn't, maybe I wouldn't have turned out to be such a timid person.
Im sure it's in the form of halliburtons arms sales.
None were really that great. Especially when you compare them to cartoons in the newyorker or even most web comics.
Linux is comparably "ancient" and yet it consistently gains significance on reddit. Being "ancient" is an imaginary criteria, similar to dismissing something because it is red, square, metal, soft, or any other description one can attach to it. Perhaps learning a logical language such as Lojban would allow one to realize this logical fallacy!
The theater of science is not a court and not a democracy. There is no authority in the form of a judge or chosen one. Arrogance is ignoring 3000 years of scientific development. Whatever you believe, and you can believe whatever you want, that rock remains several hundred million years old and not 6000 years.  If your fate is so fragile you must reject the world's collective human knowledge and intelligence, then perhaps you should aim to expand your reading a little or reconsider  how you're choosing to spend your time on earth.
I can't even fathom the level of arrogance it takes to believe that the whole of the scientific community is wrong about something, and you (along with your bible belt buddies) have somehow found real truth. While there have been numerous examples throughout history where conventional wisdom has been dead wrong, ironically the conventional wisdom in these cases has usually been propoganda of the church.
1 pixel =   &amp;lt;td style='height:1px;width:1px;background-color:#f4e3eb'&amp;gt; Ugh! Better idea -- send an encoded binary image as JSON via ajax or just php generated javascript, have javascript decode it and generate the html.   same thing, less file size.
http://officespam.chattablogs.com/archives/036476.html http://www.theregister.co.uk/2006/09/22/caspian_sea_monster/ Actually, they weren't all THAT great but they are my first, and so far, only posts on reddit.
Wtf is this? Did that really look high scurity to you, and not some thugs in ski masks in the back of a warehouse? You really think that people dont bring their celphones everywhere?
They'll never let you travel on a plane with it either. May as well title it Super-sharp stabbing device, never gets blunt :)
Good point. I'm just being a bastard now hehe :P
Oh boy, are you ever one dense dollop of lard.
Actually, according to Michael Shermer in Scientific American, it seems that it is the religious who are still donating.  "On the other hand, Syracuse University professor Arthur C. Brooks argues in Who Really Cares (Basic Books, 2006) that when it comes to charitable giving and volunteering, numerous quantitative measures debunk the myth of "bleeding heart liberals" and "heartless conservatives." Conservatives donate 30 percent more money than liberals (even when controlled for income), give more blood and log more volunteer hours. In general, religious people are more than three times more generous than secularists to all charities, 14 percent more munificent to nonreligious charities and 57 percent more likely than a secularist to help a homeless person. In terms of societal health, charitable givers are 43 percent more likely to say they are "very happy" than nongivers and 25 percent more likely than nongivers to say their health is excellent or very good."  http://www.sciam.com/article.cfm?chanID=sa006&amp;articleID=D27BB754-E7F2-99DF-3E2F8A28942743F5&amp;colID=13
Its one of the leading dependently typed languages. Check the paper "Why dependent types matter", for examples of how to express very strong proofs in the types of epigram expressions. Summary: think Haskell's type system on serious steroids. Or, as the page itself says: &gt; Epigram has a type system which is strong enough to express the behaviour of programs, the type checker then guarantees that the program is well behaved.  The canonical example is the sort function for lists, which specifies in its type that the function indeed sorts its input. This behaviour will then be checked statically by the typechecker.
this is sarcasm right?
I'm puzzled as well. I took a look at the tutorial pdf on the website and it was more of a research paper than a tutorial of the language. Can anyone explain the significance of dependent types for a non-expert? :p
Or more likely, you and I will be commenting on a reddit article titled  "26% of Americans Think Jesus Will Return in 2008 (funny!)" :)
1. Why did they have to implement this in Flash?  Navigation thus becomes a pain… 2. I couldn't find any women's names in the grid.  I then tried searching, but the Flash implementation (see 1, above) didn't locate any of the names from here: http://www.icasualties.org/oif/female.aspx The idea behind this was OK, I guess, but jeez, talk about packaging information in a visually slick but otherwise hard to access form (sigh)…
This has been the case for -all- versions of Windows XP released, especially for MSDN/MSDN-AA licenses. This is not new nor unexpected. The author is making a mountain out of a molehill and clearly does not have enough system builder experience.
&gt;because Bush has received little support from African American voters, he has little obvious political incentive for his interest. Funny, because when I think of the stereotypical person who wants to increase support to Africa, Africa-Americans voters don't come to mind.
Link to that: http://www.e-pig.org/downloads/ydtm.pdf
Peonies are one of the flowers that make spring the most beautiful season of the year.
The lesson is that if you steal movies and music, you don't have to put up with this bullshit. The media companies only treat paying customers like criminals.
Funny, although it's Apple with its proprietary, closed DRM scheme who is preventing Microsoft and other stores from the iPod.  Microsoft didn't block iTunes from Windows.
He reinvented [data urls](http://obscuretags.com/showcode.php?id=13)?
So, when can we expect NY to get in?
It seems to me that your main complaints about Windows are of bureaucracy, develop-friendliness and security, right? If that is the case, then surely those are pretty silly reasons to switch to another OS since two of them are OS-independent, no?
Quite interesting that "being afraid of silence" is a characteristic of traumatized children as well. I don't know that many black people but my ex-girlfriend was black and she was terrified of silence, the night, and being alone.  I don't think it is too much of a stretch to suggest that historical trauma can influence the personality of a culture.
"The main advantage of DirectX is that it is the de-facto standard at the moment for PC graphics." Total, complete hogwash.  Cite a source please (besides Microsoft's internal shill catalog for employees). Playstation is based on OpenGL  Nintendo Wii is based on OpenGL  All DOOM engine games are based on OpenGL OpenGL is open source, its standards are enforced by a consortium instead of a single convicted monopolist corporation (Microsoft).
Shock - north american can't buy a region 1 dvd and throws toys out of the pram. Millions of region 2 users who've been similarly shafted since DVDs were invented shrug and move on.
The map is incorrect. IL has had a moratorium on the death   penalty for several years now which was institued by   then Gov. Ryan.  Wonder how many other mistakes there are
You'll understand the 'scientific names' of various organisms, and you'll be sophisticated enough to know what phrases like 'et al.' and 'habeas corpus' *really* mean, but other than that it seems rather useless.  I can think of six or seven languages you should learn before Latin.
Looks like I should limit my domestic killing spree to KS.
Why we do that?
I suppose a land of diversity isn't your cup of tea.
well, compared to having major engine trouble before 50,000 miles... those are minor problems; most of which can be fixed by buying accessories from 3rd party companies
If this is not a joke then it's just wrong. Check out the article on threesomes.  Apparantly, God is all about the lesbian action as long as the husband doesn't actually have sexual thoughts about the other woman.  Threesomes with men are just wrong though.
Hmm. Doesn't look like **my** mail. 
Academics can find potential PhD students and PostDocs at The Online Academic Advisor. But there is much more than that for an academic to do there. Take a look at your advantages.
Equally surprising is Israel (yellow) which falls under *abolished for crimes not committed in exceptional circumstances (such as war time).* Darn it, it's that war-time loophole again.
yeah, time has some bad taste and or they are too afraid to step of the middle of the road mainstream path.
[Microsoft owns a patent for something called a "Butt hinge with integrally formed butt straps"](http://reddit.com/info/uw6w/comments)
Lexx gets my vote for the most phallic object award!
Yours has code [w491](http://reddit.com/info/w491/comments). His has code [w48y](http://reddit.com/info/w48y/comments). That means he beat you to it.
&gt; Ces dispositions ne s’appliquent pas aux actes qui ne portent pas préjudice aux titulaires de droits **et** qui sont réalisés à des fins de sécurité informatique **ou** à des fins de recherche scientifique en crytographie. There's an *and* and a *or*, like he said.
poor writing? i'm talking about writing, period.
The documentary "the Revolution Will Not Be Televised" is full of lies as you can see here http://video.google.com.au/videoplay?docid=-3378761249364089950
I don't like it :P it's a trivial conversion not much of a challenge compared with the problem of interpreting the catcha itself and of course...  &gt; * The Captcha is no longer an image and therefore not a resource they can download and process. false, if you're seeing the catcha you havbe already downloaded the resorce. &gt; * The owner of the site can change the properties of the Captcha's HTML, making it unique, and by doing so add another layer of complication for the bot to crack. not a problem, while it's html it is *readable*
the thought passed my mind too so i won't downmod you, though we're in a far better position to give aid to Africa than Africa is in a position to aid us. Yes, we are zillions of dollars in debt. But at least most of us come home to a roof over our heads and a meal.
she's probably a lesbian, though, so i was close.
I have it bookmarked since it has been up on Google. It is one of the most moving speeches I have ever heard. The visuals are the icing on the cake. I play it everytime I need clarity on the World's problems.
I always thought God was just a fancy fairy...
I think there may be a few steps in between #4 and #5. Depending on the girl, of course.
As they said he would in 2006, 2005, 2004, 2003, 2004...
All those charges sound perfectly reasonable to me, do you have any real arguments to counter them?
Yeah, whatever dude. I fail to see how the reasons I stated were silly. They were convincing and I am quite happy on Ubuntu now.
So you blame them for pointing out the obvious?
Technically the entire US should be red on the map, since the federal government and military employ capital punishment.
Don't forget "Fisting and God's Will." http://www.sexinchrist.com/fist.html
there are no limits given, just  the usual nitpicking by anecdote. i would be interesting to see some  an actual quantitative follow-up  of the britannica vs wikipedia study  done by nature.com, which btw isn't  even cited in this except in a footnote. 
better idea, don't try to obfuscate the image into any other format because it accomplishes nothing. As long as you are showing the user an image through some standard means, a bot programer can just convert that image to whatever format they wish to do the OCR all over again.
&gt; The author of the article is the definitive authority on the Mongolian Empire. Says who? Wikipedia at least provided references. [This review](http://www.nationalreview.com/books/rose200409231429.asp) of the author's book calls it revisionist history and adds: &gt; The Mongols were the thieving magpies, not the busy beavers, of the Middle Ages: Instead of diligently building and developing things, whenever they saw something new and shiny they needed or liked, they took it. And as for (2), it was written by a [respected professor](http://www.uwgb.edu/dutchs/WestTech/xmongol.htm) too.
I seriously don't see how "historical trauma"  could be that strong of an influence.  Granted, most of the older people could say that about the Civil Rights Movement, but in "these times", it doesn't really make sense for anyone who hasn't experienced those things to be traumatized.  Perhaps it has something to do with living in slummish areas and seeing things that are traumatizing, regardless of your upbringing. What I seriously think is that people need to move on.  Don't forget it, but don't dwell on it either.  It's nice to be different, but it shouldn't be a handicap.  I like to say that I should always define my skin color, my skin color should never define me.  It seems that many of todays "black" problems come from the fact that many black people let their skin color define who they are and how they should act, and often use it as a crutch.   It doesn't help that black people tend to be the first to yell racism at a crooked eye, but are always the first to discriminate against someone.  You won't believe how many people I've heard say "you can't trust them, they're white", and then act like they deserve something because of their skin color.
Which is also:  timesN = map . (*) :-)
Re: your "running through a backyard" anecdote. I absolutely have no doubt that skin color and sex make a huge difference in how a person is seen as they perform the same acts. But, I do find some real frustration in the subtle claim that I am being racist (or sexist) by viewing it as such (not by your comment, but overall).  I mean, I don't live in a community very heavily populated by blacks, but we do have ethnic groups up here that are viewed the same way, and I admit that if I were to see one of them running through my yard, I would assume it's because he just stole something. In most cases, according to the statistics (yes, yes... but it's the best I have) I'd be right. Unquestionably, there are numerous much, much deeper social and political reasons why the statistics say what they do, but strictly as it pertains to your tale -- the cold truth is that racial assumptions are often correct.  Let me put it this way: the home-boy with gold teeth and triple oversized jeans standing across the street at night in any big city just *might* have a damned gun, and I admit that I resent the implication that my crossing the street to keep a distance makes me a racist.  My safety is more important than how he feels. It's like me wearing a freaking swastika and a shaved head and then complaining when people make their own assumptions.
Fantastic. Just note that this is going to be quite a bit slower than the actual OS, and the default look of the OS is customizable in many ways (and can look like something new or look like XP, Vista, or Mac).
They might have thought you meant a straight-line *tool*.  The ability to draw straight lines has been there for years.  I agree there should be a tool for it as well.
Have you ever read the Bible? The fundamentalists know their Bible better than those that pick and chose the bits that are socially acceptable. Here are some samples: http://www.skepticsannotatedbible.com/cruelty/long.html
right, take out the battery and connect the charger to talk.  That probably won't circumvent this though.
what comments are you talking about?
http://geology.wr.usgs.gov/parks/gtime/ageofearth.html http://www.ucmp.berkeley.edu/fosrec/McKinney.html 
*"The message to local law enforcement seems clear: If you want to search a business but can't get a search warrant, just pretend you're doing a regulatory inspection, and search the place anyway."* It's (past) time to send a message to "law enforcement" by the voice of the people.   The longer we stand for this kind of abuse (like we have been doing), the worse it is going to get (like it has been doing). It's time for the people to fight back.  With guns.  No more bullshitting around and pissing around and expecting the corrupt courts to restore the rights of the people.  No more standing on street corners in "free speech" zones expecting the media to take notice (or anyone else).  No more seeking a redress of countless grievences and hoping that somebody, somewhere will pay attention and put a stop to these thugs. It's time the people did it themselves. If the people fought back, we might stand a chance to roll back the State-sponsored tyranny that is overcoming our nation.  If we continue to stand silent, or expect help from the politicians, the courts or the "public outcry" (which never accomplishes anything, then we can simply expect much more of the same. More assaults, more trampling upon our rights, our cat, our liberties and our future freedoms.  It's time we stood up and forcibly put a stop to this. I am SICK TO DEATH of reading stories just like this by the hundreds (this year alone). By now, I've read of a thousand stories posted on the web regarding State-sponsored terrorism.  All for a measly few fiat dollars demanded by the State or some b.s. "requirement" or "enforcement" action. **NOBODY** is being served by the State.  Look around and ask yourself who is benefitting?  Nobody.  Nobody but the State and it's getting worse and worse. It's time to open up the dialogue among people and how we are going to fight back.
A review of the new Bible-based action figures that are being released by the inventor of G.I. Joe.  The figures, such as King David, Samson, Moses and Noah, are armor-clad and wield large weapons.  Noah has a crossbow and a wolf companion!
I know what car I am not going to buy next. 
Sure, it's a license, and most every state treats public broadcasting frequencies the same. But my jibe was with his comment that "this is a step in the right direction...I have no love for these right wing media groups". I have no love for a lot of wacko political views (like banning television as a "corrupting evil influence"), but I've got more love for various freedoms they independently seek to destroy (like freedom of expression) than my dislike for their views.
Yeah, I'm with Sean.  There's no way this idiot "sets up clients every week".  OEM and Retail builds of XP have been around since, well forever.  A (very) well known quirk of working with MS and XP. This guys is nothing but a linux zealot.  He obviously has an anti-MS agenda (required for entrance into the Linux club), and he very carefully crafted the story (I really doubt this really happened in RL...) to make MS and HP look bad, and make Ubuntu look good (as if there arent' already enough idiots on the net doing this already.) Voted down, and you should do the same.  This is a kind of "journalism" we don't need.  I'm all for Linux, but goddamn people, stop comparing it to MS and let it live on its own merits.  Every time you linux idiots do this, you're losing the very audience you need to attract.   Like me.
wow, that's honestly the first time i've ever heard anyone interpret it that way. there might be a few people who are like that, but 9 times out of 10, even an evangelical Christian isn't going to be much more than shocked or disgusted by the heathens, etc., even when they say [you're going to hell](http://reddit.com/info/wj0p/comments/cwjze).
What? I think you need to explain that, and I'd like for somebody who upmodded you to explain why they did.  Is your implication that African-Americans are selfish? I really don't get what your point is supposed to be here.
Sad, but true. It's too bad that small businesses have to fork out so much cash for something so simple.
Decorators are, to me at least, most useful when I have a particular "thing" I want to do to a lot of functions or methods; the decorator provides a way to abstract that thing out into one definition, and apply it in many places. This keeps my code cleaner and more maintainable, because it keeps each piece of logic in one place, making changes far simpler and easier (if I decide I don't want to modify a particular function/method, I can just drop the decorator line above it; if I want the decorator to behave differently, I just change its code and every decorated function updates automatically). Real-world examples: Django (the web framework I use both at work and play) makes heavy use of this for a variety of patterns; view functions which respond to HTTP requests can be modified with a number of built-in decorators, such as `login_required` (redirects to a login form if the user making the request isn't authenticated), `cache_page` (caches the response of the view for a set amount of time), etc.
Another anti-MS rant. (yawn) You guys really need to get a new act.  The old "MS sucks" schtick is really getting tiresome. Voted down, as deserved.  Next time try inserting some facts into the article instead of opinion.  Then I might actually give a shit. Until then...
Even if it *is* true (and I'd like to hear dates/locations), the fact that their corporate office even said it was "out of control" just goes to show sometimes idiocy isn't company policy.
Quiet? I know why it is quiet. MSM did not care about telling that. Quiet, my ass...
Ya the Sirius comment was as far as I got.  Soon as I read that, I stopped and voted it down.  It's obvious this person doesn't have a fucking clue.
Wow, that's your first and only comment on this site. I don't know where you're from, but did you know that the European slave traders were just copying what the Muslims had been doing in Africa for thousands of years. It was the whites by the way who finally brought an end to it.
This suggests a rather limited notion of self-reliance.  Self-reliance doesn't preclude taking advantage of community.  Gandhi's term for Indian independence was *swaraj*, which I understand means self-reliance
no, atheism is not an absence of belief. agnosticism is an absence of belief. atheism is an active belief that there is no god. and religion = communism? that's kind of funny. is there a corollary for Godwin's law for this? here's some good advice- if you're going to actively not believe in something, please know more about what it is you're not believing in.
Finally someone with a rational point of view. Thank you!
The typical supporter of increased Africa aid is a rich, white, bleeding heart liberal (like reddit readers). My guess is that black voters in general are more concerned about domestic issues.
&gt; However, if he's simply using his executive  &gt; authority to deny a license renewal, then we  &gt; have no reason to complain. Actually we do, but the reason is one in which the governments of western democracies misbehave as well. There's a culture in the Anglosphere of having government have control over broadcast and exercising that control in such a way as to arbitrarily restrict the number of operators. The way it should work is that there should be a decision made on the amount of spectrum available, and then *all* of it should be put up for public auction for fixed periods. I'm familiar with the Australian situation. The major cities here have five stations, two of them government owned. The government then claims "Oh there's only enough advertising/programming/some other crap to support having three extra networks so we're going to artificially restrict the spectrum." This is an anti-market decision and leads to cronyism. Broadcast spectrum is a channel, and therefore it's necessary to have it coordinated to ensure there are no clashes. But that's all. The governnment shouldn't need to do it directly - the ideal model would be for it to grant the responsibility for the allocation to a board that is separated from the government in a similar way to the Reserve Bank.
No, not good - a small example of what we're dealing with: &gt;Most Middle Eastern countries recognize the following Islamic law: “After having sexual relations with a lamb, it is a mortal sin to eat its flesh.”
&gt; Shock - north american can't buy a region 1 dvd and throws toys out of the pram. Millions of region 2 users who've been similarly shafted since DVDs were invented shrug and move on. Which approach is more likely to produce change? 
There is a strange correlation with the contries in red :p
From this picture it looks like velcro will eventual lose its stickyness from the hooks being torn apart. Is that true? 
This is stupid, but I love that frog/yak thing. Awesome. Now all we need is a GNU/Penguin thing. :P
So we have a couple hundred years worth of carefully gathered fossil evidence and several decades worth of evidence gathered from studying living creatures at the cellular and molecular level, and these people have a board game? That's great. Good for them.
It's the kind of self-reliance that means the community itself is self-reliant, capable of thriving without outside help. There is both individual swaraj and community swaraj.
Gonna go with "Oh my God that website is confusing and has no order whatsoever.  How do I just get a a list of available programs and watch one?" EDIT: went back to the site and dug around, and discovered: IT'S NOT AN INTERNET TV SITE.  It's a TV network with a website.
What?  No Firefly or Millenium Falcon?  Sheesh. Still awesome.
Slightly OT, but you know what? I think we're finally at a point where Linux is a viable alternative to Windows for non-geeks. Me and my brothers have just installed Ubuntu Linux on my parents computer while we're home for Xmas, and after setting the desktop to the Windows 2000 blue colour and making desktop icons called "Internet", "Google Mail" and "Create documents", my parents hardly noticed the difference. I just splashed out on my first ever Mac this summer, and after playing with Ubuntu (other distros would have been just as good probably) I'm not sure why I bothered...
The hooks bend when pulled to release the loops, they don't break until they've been used hundreds of times.  The left-most one appears to be just about to release.  I'm just guessing, but I think the sound you get when pulling velcro comes from the hooks snapping back.
Uh, I think the onus is on "whoop" here.
He should have mentioned the install time and complexity of both OS for sake of comparaison.  Personnaly I know the difference, and it's day and night. Ubuntu kicks Microsoft's ass in every way.
The whole region-locking thing is BS, it only benefits distributors, and the customer gets nothing out of it. I got screwed over by the scheme personally; when I was in England 6 years ago, I wanted to pick up a British version of "Walking with Dinosaurs," but the clerk told me that it wouldn't work in my VCR back home. Pissed me off, I didn't get to watch the special until about a year and a half later &gt;:(
The guy is in southern Alabama of all places.  What the hell did he expect would happen?  Did he really foresee any other possible outcome from putting an atheist bumper sticker on his car?  I'm surprised some good ol' boys didn't beat the shit out of him while they were at it. This isn't the least bit surprising, and it certainly not qualified to be "news".
In the article it says "direct humanitarian and development aid"  And I doubt the Bush Administration would be getting kudos from the Center for Global Development if it's been in the form of military aid.
I'll keep mine even shorter: Fuck you.
Damn, just rip and burn it region-free already. Yes, region encoding sucks. It's sucked since its conception. A long-winded post isn't going to fix it.
How bout this: fine, the world is actually 6000 years old and the devil makes it appear much older. In fact, the devil has created an completely internally consistent geology and cosmos that all appear to be millions to billions of years old and is consistent with all other scientific principles and theories. Whether or not the evidence is devil-created, scientific analysis has been extremely consistent, and extremely useful in creating technology, predicting natural phenomena, and saving lives.  Let scientists go about their business, and let Christians can go about their business, believing that the evidence is "false". As a sign of good faith, Christians are allowed to partake in the technological benefits based on the "false" evidence, and Christians don't try to interfere with science. Can we agree to this and all just get along.  Or not...
Certainly not the approach that includes being quiet while it WorksForMe (TM) and to start bitching once it does not.  We Europeans (and most americans complaining about this too btw) chose to complain when the standard was written, not after the next generation standards are written already.  Of course we now shrug and move on since our initial few years of protests didn't help.
Lame.  As other people say, it's just a crappy way to encode a bitmapped image. I thought this was going to be something interesting.  For example, something like "hash cash" that's computed by Javascript to produce a captcha.  That still wouldn't work since spammers have access to thousands of zombie machines.  Still at least it's more interesting than this hairbrained scheme.
Last year Microsoft was Googled.  This year and next they'll be Netscaped.  Doesn't look good for MS from here.
I don't know her personally but I'm willing to bet that your ex-girlfriend still is black.
I'm going to take a wild guess: none of them.
It's only $4 billion *on paper*.  There have been many articles on this.  It includes things like sending over "consultants" at huge hourly rates, debt forgiveness (they can't pay anyway), and so forth.  Very little in the way of concrete, tangible assistance. http://www.latimes.com/news/opinion/sunday/editorials/la-op-sachs12jun12,1,3449624.story &gt; Total annual U.S. aid for all of Africa is about $3 billion, equivalent to about two days of Pentagon spending. About $1 billion pays for emergency food aid, of which half is for transport. About $1.5 billion is for "technical cooperation," essentially salaries of U.S. consultants. **Only about $500 million a year — less than $1 per African — finances clinics, schools, food production, roads, power, Internet connectivity, safe drinking water, sanitation, family planning and lifesaving health interventions to fight malaria, AIDS and other diseases.**
&gt; Certainly not the approach that includes being quiet while it WorksForMe (TM) and to start bitching once it does not. If it worked for you (tm), you wouldn't be bitching either. &gt; Of course we now shrug and move on since our initial few years of protests didn't help. So you're saying that all your opponent has to do in order to win is to ignore you?  If you want X, and your opponent wants Y, as soon as he does Y you give up and go home? 
"I asked her to donate it to Salvation Army and guess what, they can't do that either." LMAO  
I have to say I think I would find knowing I would die at a fixed time worse than it coming at random. As it is, I don't know when I will die and I like it that way. I understand the longest death-row resident in Japan has been there for 40 years. In that time, he could have dropped dead from natural causes.
Technically? - the map is just plain wrong and all the US should be red.
Why is this getting downmodded?  It's a simple fact, many prisoners in the U.S. have jobs.
Australia is definitely (and unfortunately) a very christian country.
Weatherford's book _is_ revisionist history because new history was made available. The former dominant view held by Western society was shown to be wildly inaccurate and based on medieval European propaganda. A very large portion of Mongolian history has been kept secret under Soviet rule and has only come out in the last decade. Your point about thievery does not contradict Weatherford. The Mongolian impact was social/economic/religious freedom. They were not busy beavers and no historian that i've read has claimed that. I assume you agree with my 2nd and 3rd points since you didn't address them. Thanks for the downmod, hope it was worth it.
In Chavez' prisons? I didn't knew Chavez owns prisons here in Venezuela, where I live. Anyway here are things you CAN do now in venezuela WITHOUT going to jail: * Call Chavez "son of a bitch" in national tv in a morning show  * Call for his assassination or "physical dissaparison"  * Sabotage the state oil company, causing 10 billion dollars of loss  * Be one of the ministers in the failed cup  * To sign a decree to abolish the constitution, resign the judicature and executive brach  * Be the president of a TV channel and suspend the regular programs, broadcasting for 90 days in a row messages calling for a regime change  * Be an oil distribution tycoon and refuse to do your job  * Be a Captain of a oil ship, fond it and refuse to deliver the gas the country is waiting for  * Accept money for foreign governments and use it in an electoral campaign  * Manifest in front of the house of general  * Destroy an embassy  * Block out streets, make barricades and burn vehicles is OK if you protest against Chavez The list keeps going and going, but you have now an idea... 
Here you go, [from Boeing](http://www.boeing.com/commercial/777family/compute/compute4.html):  &gt;Central to the digital design approach was the CATIA system. CATIA was developed by Dassault Systemes of France and marketed by IBM in the United States. From the beginning of the 777 program, the three key participants in the system -- Boeing, Dassault Systemes and IBM -- developed a "working together" agreement signed by their respective chief executive officers. The very great sophistication of the CAD/CAM system, which as used to design, model and test the whole plane before any metal was cut is the main thing that makes the 777 programme special. And clearly that was an *international* achievement. What's interesting about this, I'd suggest, is that it's an example of the  near nonsense of phrases like: ${COUNTRY}, after all, is capable of ${GREAT_ACHIEVMENT}  The world just doesn't work that way any more--and this is relatively recent. This here Internet is pretty solidly an achievent of the United States, for example, and I thank them for it; but such great endeavours are increasingly out of the reach of individual nations. Even of ones as prosperous and well-educated as the US. And the greater the achievement the more international it tends to be. Even if we consider the rather limited domain of, say, rollercoaster engineering we find that the best coasters are *built in* the US, but to Swiss designs, and often from parts fabricated in third countries.  It's this sort of collaboration that makes all our lives (in the Reddit-editing parts of the world) so much more physically comfortable etc. than those of our ancestors. This can be embraced, or we keep plugging on with outdated ideas about national genius and--well, end up all doing the equivalent of driving GM cars.
how is this Not cool?  +1!!
What, exactly, is a "Bright"?
*If you commit a federal crime (i.e. killing the president) then it doesn't matter if you did it in a state without the death penalty or not.* So, in conclusion, the whole of the US has the death penalty, and no area is allowed to differ from this.
Thank you SO MUCH for that info... I just HATE it when people post images of artwork with no references to the creator/location/title etc. Especially in a case like this where I know I've seen it somewhen before but can't immediately place it. Thanks!
You fucking dick.  Since when does not wanting to discuss your personal life, your personal plans for the rest of your travels, with a complete stranger (even if it's a cop) imply that you have something to hide?  That's no strangers business, and it's certainly not a cop's business.  What a teenager plans to do when he gets to his destination has nothing to do with putting up a roadblock and searching his vehicle.  You're an idiot.
No it doesn't, since we ratified the treaty of Maastrict.
Ubuntu is simply awful.  I tried installing it and got an error message.  And this was on an IBM P3.  Can't understand why people are raving about it.    
Yeah I'm new but I just like saying NERD ALERT in an Austin Powers kinda way which I guess makes me a nerd...
Since brevity is key; Skip to end.
hurrah for the EU!
Decorators are more interesting when you are doing something to the function at import time instead of runtime. For example, if you are registering the function in a COM interface or associating a URL to it for invocation in a web framework.  from easyweb_thingee import register_url_handler as url  @url("/")   def home(): ...  @url("/login")   def login(): ...  @url("/logout")   def logout(): ...  @url("/resetpasswd")   def reset_password(): ... If all you are doing is factoring out "common stuff" then decorators are not very exiting. After all functions themselves exist to "factor out the common stuff."  You can "factor out common stuff" even in ancient and crufty languages like Fortran or Basic or Pascal. But you can't set up a URL-&gt;function registry in a syntactically simple manner. 
Is it OK to publicly call for and organize the overthrow of the U.S. government?
Bush believes that his signing statements indicate not the law, but the correct interpretation of the law as it applies to him; in other words, they are indications of which laws he feels he is not required to obey. I know of no actual test in court of one of these statements, but this is very much in line with the administration's favored theory of the "unitary executive" (a theory which essentially claims that the President is, during times of war -- as in the never-ending War on Terror -- essentially in possession of absolute power and accountable to no law).
Most Southern US states have the death penalty. Not having the death penalty is a pre-requisite for joining the mostly secular EU.
My ex-girlfriend's 2003 Hyundai Accent (base model) had the foglight holes. Maybe it's just the Japanese whom are good at such things--one example is the Honda Civic, which shares not one body panel between the three trim lines.
&gt;Oh, my partner and I were arrested for extortion? You got to love that legal system. Yes, we were arrested for extortion, but I don’t remember where it says that we committed extortion. Whoops, can’t remember doing that… Oh yea, that might be because the company that induced our arrests just so happens to own the media pool…well that’s another blog all together, I’m not going into it now. Regardless, I don’t mention anything about being arrested in my job ads, so how is that relevant? This kind of language (why say you didn't do it when you could instead say you were never tried or convicted?) and logic (it's relevent even if you didn't put it in your ad because potential emplyees google you before even replying) worry me.
Thank you for that...
&gt;Desegregation in the 60's meant better educations for parents who were having kids in the late 70's and 80's. Segregated schools were no worse than desegregated schools. The Coleman report showed this.
In other news, 25% of Americans enjoy screwing with people who call them to ask retarded questions.
Sources? In a comment? On reddit? Question marks aside, http://www.tanb.org/tantalum1.html has some enlightening info...
It should be surprising.
I'm living in Germany, and while I think the region coding is stupid, I knew about it right from the beginning when I bought my first DVD player about 8 years ago. I made sure it could be made region free before I bought it.  And so I did with every DVD drive and player after that, up until the point when I hooked up a computer to my video beamer three years ago and discovered VLC, after which the region code lost even the last bit of meaning to me.  A good portion of my DVD collection is region 1, the other region 2. I never had so much as a problem with that. In 8 years.   The only thing that bothers me is the region locking that will come after the one on DVD. I'm pretty sure it will not be so easily circumvented/ignored... 
The very fact that you see this as normal shows how much MS is holding back the whole computer industry.
Expand your horizons, dude (And along with them your grammatical context)... I obviously didn't mean the link itself, but rather, its context (Read; 'The link').
&gt; 1. look them in the eye.  &gt; 2. cook a few great meals.  &gt; 3. fix their PC.  &gt; 4. smell sweet. 4a. ???  5. Profit! ?
I think the crucial point that you've missed is that "society" immediately blames the individual if they're white.  Remember the BTK killer?  He did it.  Not society.  That was never in question.  On the other hand, when I see the nightly tally of black guys that have committed whatever felony you care to name, there's a palpable overtone of "what's wrong with society?"
MarkByers: You, my dear, are an idiot. Go fellate yourself. Avenestra: Great link, I apologise for the comment.
I'm trying to figure out how this made it to the front page on *reddit*.
Something which has a broader appeal and a more generalized approach to critique based on the deconstruction of Psychiatry in general and clinical psychotherapy in detail? The entire endeavour seems to miss many of the basic 'Sore Points' of psychiatry whilst focusing on complete and utter minutia...
That's exactly what I was thinking, except for the smell part.  It's probably a pleasant mix of woodsmoke, soil, and green things.  Also, you've got to admit that it does have unequaled aesthetic appeal - for now.
If God had not wanted us to wank, he would have put our genitals in that spot on you back that you can't get to when it itches.   
I had an uncle who worked for the Velcro company. He actually took this picture during some of the research they were doing on the longevity of their product.  They used dyes to make the product the color it is.
&gt;If I was a spammer, all that I would have to do is write a proper driver to convert the data to my standard processing format. I just wrote one. It was not the slightest bit challenging to write. Anyone silly enough to use this should be glad I (or anyone else who can overcome this tiny obstacle) am not a spammer.
I was just pointing out that your oversimplification was probably due to your lack of reading the article.  You pointed to the expensive shoes and said they claimed it was a new trend.  That was just one point made by one of the gentlemen.   Your post completely ignores the rest and frankly doesn't make much since when you consider the rest of it.  So either you didn't read the entire article or your reading comprehension is abysmal.  So, what is the 'phenomena they clearly don't understand'?
The moment you secceed from the United State [sic]; and I would be right there to help you.  Microstates are the future; not empire.
Related: The Dangling Corpse of Saddam Hussein and a Bit of Context http://cryptogon.com/?p=159 In 1995, I wrote a case study entitled, The Tilt that Backfired - Historical Perspectives on the Persian Gulf Crisis. If you’re interested in placing the dangling corpse of Saddam Hussein into a bit of context, I’d still recommend that paper. If you want more than a bit of context, there’s not a finer source on the subject than the almost entirely unknown, forgotten and out of print, Spider’s Web: The Secret History of How the White House Illegally Armed Iraq written by Alan Friedman.
Where the *****fuck***** do you see an ad on that site?!  he's just trying to do his part to make the world a better place, and hasn't met a person such as myself who could show him how to more appropriately channel his energies. What are YOU doing that's positively affecting the globe?
This is clearly a sign from the Flying Spaghetti Monster that we are to love and honor his noodly appendage. Ramen.
&gt;So, you end up spending anything from days to years, just waiting for this random event where you die. Fucked up, no? Sounds like a normal life and death...
lol I love how everyone tries to see something terrible in these actions... but face it Bush did something good. Stop being such zealots. $ and humanitarian aid to Africa is good. Bush sucks, but he's not evil.  And on a side note, Bush jokes are fucking lame. You're not original or clever in making them, as they've all been done. Bush impressions are fucking old news too. Smoke a fatty and just enjoy 2007, then we can enjoy 2008 and pick between real candidates like  Mccain and hillary.
Voting?  Individual rights? Maybe I didn't understand the question. There was no freedom to choose government under Saddam's Bathe party.  Ask an Iraqi.    That doesn't make the whole endeavor right, but let's be accurate.
I've seen that.  It doesn't name any manufacturers.
Modded down for the violent acres reference at the end...
They do say that a good troll is indistinguishable from idiocy.  Well played, sir.
GIMP is a great app. It really is. That said, it is not a Photoshop and is has a long way to become one. Contrary to whatever is said in the Internet forums, it is not about UI. Yes, there are people that say that they hate GIMP UI. Don't listen to them. Screw UI. Whatever you learned in Photoshop, UI-wise and keyboard-wise, it is not deal breaker. Capabilites are. While GIMP is doing great, Adobe doesn't sleep. They are doing amazing work with every new version. They know they can't stay in one place, and it can be seen. For example, since PS7, every single PS user uses adjustment layers -- very powerful tool that GIMP doesn't support to this day. Every single course (VTC, Lynda, etc) teaches them - how do you expect these people convert to GIMP? 
Rico, what is your malfunction? [ don't downmod me b/c you do not read Heinlein, either! ]
Yes, but 154,000 of those layers were created by God.
This entire article is a hodgepodge of crap. He is comparing things that dont even make sense. He is acting like all the consoles cost the same price, and therefore M-Soft MUST be losing. While big M has made some gaffes (Zune sucks, we all know it...) the 360 is not one of them. He is comparing the 360 to the PS2. PS2 has sold more because it's a trusted brand and OWNS Japan. "There are less PS2's than 360's and XBoxes, so the X-Box family MUST be losing. Has he ever thought maybe it's because you can get a PS2 for 150 FUCKING DOLLARS! The Wii will be a success because it's pretty muck a smaller Gamecube with motion tech (look like it kicks total ass). Did he look at the PS3?! You can get a Wii60 for the price of a PS3. With the Wii you can buy a 360 too because it doesnt cost you any organs. But the PS3!? Now THAT is screwed. (P.S. XP &amp; Vista still suck, I will take my OS/X anyday!)
How does one post comments to Reddit if they want them to show up on the main site but it is not from another site?
Most DVD players have an unlock code that makes them region free. For my most recent one this involved opening the drive and entering a key sequence found in about 2 seconds with a google search. It's annoying but I guess most of us European's are used to it by now; I guess it's more of a problem for us. Also isn't this a touch late? I was pissed off about this like 6 years ago and lets face it we have far worse to worry about with HD disks.
So the potential for dogma is a side effect of the brain's implementation of reason?
This is out of control...
Wow old people critizing the youth.. How.. odd...
In Microsoft's struggle to end piracy, they either turn off a good amount of customer base, or more ironically, increase the use of hacks and pirated copies being used.  And the problem doesn't stop at Operating Systems, you'll find increased piracy in virtually any medium that cuts customer use down in place of higher security. And they'll keep doing it until their paychecks start to suggest otherwise...
Shuttles are the size of a buick.  Would you even see them on the scale?
"My way" of thinking? You're assuming things you have no business assuming, sir. And I take it you think you're the right person and authority to decide who does or does not "like" the USA.
It would make such a lame illustrationm though - a silver ovoid. :(
Most of these weren't funny, but the Zidane one and the Wiretap one cracked me up, just for their sheer silliness.
Well, if he shows up around here, I'll buy him a burrito.
Middle click is very fast. It seemed weird at first, but now I hate using systems that don't support it. If you don't like it, you can set the middle button to do something else.
GIMP sucks at UI (bring up Layers and it appears where the cursor is... um, that's what I'm working on, I don't want a dialog covering it!! There are lots of UI issues like this that go beyond the idiosyncrasies any product has.  Te other issue for some people is that you can't use GIMP for print production... No CIE support, no separations support, etc.  Finally, PSD compatibility isn't 100% though it's not bad.  For web work, it's fine - I'm not about to shell out hundreds of dollars to do a few web graphics. But for print or for someone who is doing this constantly, Photoshop is more polished and more full featured with a better UX. Any school that is teaching GIMP solely is doing  disservice to their students.  
Commercials are neither news nor entertainment. Fight the power!
It's true.  The guy posted the story with more details in another forum.  I don't know his real name but with his posting history, I believe him.
You can't reply to yourself!
Black racists.
Parent modded up for truth.
I bet he was non-white
What's there to understand? Very religious, very scary.
So does Bill O'Reilly.  Preposterous nonsense. Bad parenting and irresponsible procreation create these problems.  Rap music _does not make_ shitty parents!  Neither does heavy metal. Neither do horror movies. Music is entertainment.  I knew that when I was 8 years old.   The end game of your 'rap music' theory is censorship.  I'm perfectly certain that if rap music didn't exist we would have just as many problems.   Irresponsible assholes having kids they can't support (and usually don't want) creates poverty and thugs.  Not sports and entertainment.  WTF.
Finally, something on the frontpage that directly affects me, a North American!
you need a [/sarcasm] tag; i hope.
I was tempted to say, "Oooo, well my uncle was a police man," but I was wondering why the two parts were not black. Therefore, I refrained from making that statement. EDIT: Seriously, I was wondering about the color. A lot of micro photography is artificially colored.
Another post about UNDERAGE SEX on reddit. YOU LIBERAL NAZIS NEED TO COME OUT OF THE CLOSETS.
The internet stopped being interesting today. As evinced by the reddit hot page at this moment, we have to dig up from our trenches of saved stories and repost them over and over again. In due time, we can probably switch over to to this [way](http://reddit.com/info/6xmp/comments/c6yjk).
Depends on if you are a "vision" person or not. Gates should stick to reading spreadsheets; Jobs should not.
I understood you to be claiming that Dawkins' bias was against philosophers. If you meant rather that his bias was towards correspondence truths, then it's still not really a bias: the argument between scientists and fundamentalists has nothing to do with correspondence vs. coherence. The fundies don't claim that in some complex post-structuralist sense the rock is and isn't 6000 years old: they claim it's 6000 years old. The park rangers (and one assumes RD) would claim it isn't. I take no exception to the bulk of your post: Dawkins has his flaws (though I dispute that he's the 'fanatic', 'fundamentalist' or 'atheist high priest' of local pro-religious opinion) and there's a lot of lazy religion-bashing on Reddit (although also a lot of persuasive and accurate religion-bashing).
Well, here, in THIS country: - speak in Arabic and you will be kicked out of airplanes inspite of going through all the extra "random" security check at the airport. - speak in Spanish and quite a few restaurants and other such places will deny service..(remember all those "No English No Service" stickers) - Doctors and Pharmacist deny service related to Birth Control(and abortion) on personal religious beliefs all the time.. And this lady from Tennessee is pissed because a Palestinian denied her service??? I hope she knows how it feels to be on the receiving end of racist/religious bigotry..   
treagan, there are plenty of people who don't tell their children that music is entertainment. Sure, you'd think the kid would eventually figure this out, but I'm sure many don't.
Understandable with some vindication in the air but hardly acceptable behaviour from a doctor. Agreed, the doc may have personal issues involving politics but he should have the self respect to not allow him to stray away from impeccable care when dealing with patients. All patients, even amerikkan swines. You may quip with words but go beyond that and you should consider another career.
The US didn't sell bandwidth that way until somewhat recently (20 years or so I think?). I think that we should compare the Venezuela television situation to the early US television history as opposed to our current system. But there is a strong case (Nash Equilibrium style) to be made for the modern approach, as you point out quite well. Either way, I have a hard time seeing this as a freedom of speech issue. I think that broadcast television is an inherently undemocratic mechanism. I think it is easy to see that the current US system unfairly restricts free speech so perhaps we who live in glass houses shouldn't throw stones.   
You mean White Christian *Protestant* Africans?
There are other minor errors as well.  For example, they classify UML as paravirtualization, and it's clearly not.  UML has two *optional* patches against the host kernel (SKAS and another who's name escapes me at the moment), but it has no other special kernel requirements, which makes UML more similar to Bochs than Xen.  Also, the author mentions protection from kernel bugs as a virtue of all virtualization, when what the author refers to as "OS-level virtualization" -- specifically, OpenVZ and VServers -- both rely on security contexts in the "host" kernel, and are therefore just as susceptible to kernel-related instability and security issues as a non-virtualized system.  He also mentions live migration while failing to mention that not all the systems support it (neither UML nor VServers have support for "live" migration; I believe the only two on his list that do are Xen and OpenVZ). It's still a good overview of what's out there; just don't read too much into the descriptions or classifications.
The one about Brokeback Mountain still annoys me, because the movie isn't about cowboys. It's not like they were Texas sheriffs or anything like that at all. They were watching sheep up in the mountains, hardly John Wayne fare.
Indeed.  Or, as I do in my webapps:  @FORM('formfield')   def handle_formfield(): ... or   @POST('postedfield')   def handle_formfield(): ...   Decorators make it easier to build libraries instead of frameworks. 
Oh heck yeah. Makes for a great movie set or some website pictures, or perhaps some kind of oddball museum, but not much else. I cannot even fathom what it would be like if I held a party at my house. People would arrive and ask, "Is this your clubhouse?" Or imagine the tax assessor. How the heck does he get a "comp" value? How the heck does he assess a value at all? Does he just compare it to a trailerhome?
What he said.
It always seems to come down to one thing: Macs are made for morons. Every supposed benefit of owning a Mac is something that isn't even an issue if you know your way around a computer. The crashing, the viruses, the "fun" applications, and now ease of use. I can assure you that I have yet to have a problem utilizing my computer because my various Windows windows look similar. I have no virii, no spyware, I never crash, and I can navigate very quickly. On the same token, I'm not as advanced as, say, a Linux user. I'm no power user, I can't go into DOS and tinker around. I just know what I'm doing with the thing. The fact that my icons all look the same has yet to slow me down (mainly because I, y'know, alphabetize and go by the name rather than the graphic).
It is 7.5% in India. Any future US administration has a long long way to go.
New years, history, Muse
Here's my two cents. I'm a software developer on Linux. I don't contribute on Gimp, however. I can clearly see how having an extra toolpad button for this would be a big help, as would a preference option to switch the whole thing to an MDI interface instead of multiple SDI. And if you emailed me this, I would not jump your case or be rude, no matter how many times someone said it. If they said it enough, I would simply refer them to the public statement I had about that feature on the website. Developers need to quit being rude with end users. They are end users for a reason -- they have opinions on how software should be used, and our job as developers is to at least listen, consider their input, and respond politely even when it hurts.
&gt; Remember, theists may condemn you for living by this code  because you are doing it of your own free will instead of because you're afraid that if you don't a supreme being will set you on fire. I liked that part (under Rights)
The only real drawback I'm aware of is that IE has trouble with returned snippets of HTML which include forms or which are inserted into containing `form` elements. Other than that it's pretty handy.
I don't see how banning television is a "wacko political view" just because most people don't perceive the harm. I see it as a logical extension given what television does to the human mind and its inherent undemocratic nature. We ban lots of technologies because they cause more harm than good, for example lawn darts and drugs. People refuse to take this logic to television because of the political power that television offers and the large number of addicts.  My main point is that this is not a black and white freedom of speech issue because of the nature of the medium being altered. If Chavez starts to ban specific newspapers or the internet, then Venezuelans would have a cause for serious alarm. I just don't think that futzing with television stations raises the alert status that much.
owned
to be honest, i was just searching for objective treatments of dawkins that didn't seek to glorify him. I wouldn't call him a fanatic either--he's too cold and calculated to be considered a fanatic--but I would say that he's a bit extreme, in the sense that he lies quite far out of the mainstream. i think there are many holes in the "Dawkins admits he's wrong, while his opponents don't" that anyone attempting objectivity could see easily. if someone really has a hard time seeing them and actually wants it explained, then i'll do it, it's just not really worth having to explain things objectively if my audience is a bunch of atheists who don't want their bubble burst. as for my talks of being downvoted, it's not so much this area of the thread but further down, where i calmly explain that the NPS *can* say how old the park is, it's even on their website, and this issue is a repost of something that is years old. this is not a current event, and if anyone actually did their homework (which i did, and provided links), they'd know that. the issue at hand is not "the NPS is afraid to say how old the park is" (they're not) but "the NPS sells a book about the grand canyon written from a creationist point of view", which has been moved into an "inspirational" section of the bookstore. the context of this article has been dramatically misrepresented, and when i've tried to explain that, i haven't gotten responses telling me that i'm misled, i've gotten downvoted. i understand that disagreeing with atheists is pretty unpopular at reddit, but really, when you present them with facts and they vote you down? if Dawkins really is a man who can admit when he's wrong, then maybe atheists need him more than they think.
Did the U.S. rush Saddam's execution to prevent him from revealing what he knew?
The title on Reddit was "Everybody tries to blame racism, but...": Older black men speak out on a generation destroying itself I.e. the title is suggesting that black people are responsible for their own problems. However, the evidence in the article does not bear this out. In fact, this isn't even really what the article is about. Anyway, I wasn't trying to claim that the article says this is a new trend, but rather that the submitter seems to think it is.
Is that supposed to work?
in what time frame can signing statements be legally reversed? is there any constitutional violation, or is Bush violating the spirit of the constitution while upholding the letter of the constitution?
Hey - this is A-OK!  After all, pharmacists here in the States can choose not to provide "The Morning After" contraceptive pill to patients based upon the phatmacist's belief system!
I think that's OK, personally. In that case, an out-of-band Null value is better than the only alternative, which would be an _in_-band Null value, which is a disaster so old that there's an entire generation of programmers that have never had to encounter it :) I would like a way to say that the "same" Null value can't propagate out of the function, though; __that__ is most likely a bug.
... and there is sand in her vagina.
my 85 Volvo wagon has foglight holes but no foglights
Link to post with more details?
[Print-friendly version, watch out it opens the print dialog.](http://www.thelocal.se/article.php?ID=5932&amp;print=true)
It takes a very small Bush to fuck it up this royally. It could not have been more poorly executed.
The software is still different. It just happens to release those software developers from developing an auto-update system.
"Refactoring the code into smaller functions and storing the values in a state object" That's exactly what the technique is all about. Exceptions are used to distinguish between normal returns and those that must capture the state (you can avoid them by eagerly building the states up eagerly, but that's a pessimisation). The goal is to fastpath non-capturing code and thus not overly penalise code that doesn't use continuations; similarly, exceptions let you distinguish between multiple types of "returns" and (hopefully) optimise for non-exceptional code paths. The only difference is that the compiler is doing the refactoring, not you.
A sufficiently large quantitative change _becomes_ a qualitative change. Decorators replace three, or at most four, entire lines of Python. Whoop de freaking do, who cares? But those three or four lines are "accidental" complexity, in Fred Brook's terminology. The more of that you can cut away, the better your programming gets because you can concentrate more on the essential issues. And, perhaps counterintuitively, the most import bits of accidental complexity to remove are the final bits, not the first bits. It turns out that by cutting that last little bit away, we went from "classmethod" and "staticmethod" being the only examples of decorators, to all kinds of examples. Not because it was more _possible_ than before, but because it was _easier_ enough that people did it. (Closures, incidentally, are a different story entirely; clever use of closures _does_ make things possible that weren't without them, or were at the very least fiendishly difficult and impractical, not just three lines of code. The best way to get started with them is to find places in your code that are starting to grow a bajillion options, especially ones related to collections, that all boil down to ways of manipulating the data or summarizing the data. Instead, allow things to pass in closures. It's also really useful for flow-reversal; I have some code that generates the shells of HTML tables based on certain SQL searches, and you pass in closures that explain how to render the cells. These closures get to do anything they want with the rendering, in the context of the calling code that "knows" the most about the rendered objects, and the table part of the renderer doesn't have to care. Without closures you'll end up with code that is both less capable and more tightly bound.)
&gt; As much as I hate to say it, some people just need killing. -- Hitler (paraphrased)
Not an unreasonable reaction to someone married to Ida Amin,  or the moral equivalent.
i hope you like
&gt;He created one of the most brutal, corrupt and violent regimes in modern history, something akin to Stalin's Soviet Union, Mao's China or Kim Jong Il's North Korea Um isnt that a little hyperbolic? Why dont you just call him a  nazi straight up?  ALL of those people are a great measure WORSE than saddam. Unless saddam somehow killed multiple millions of people that I am not aware of. I mean gassing the kurds, like have you even seen fucking africa or anything like that? Theres a lot worse people in the world NOW. How can you say hes like stalin? thats an insult to stalins victims. He wanted to sell oil in euros. This is why he is dead.
Hmm...  what kind of "error message?"  Did you ask about it on the Ubuntu forums?
Cool! I did something similar. I built a scanner app workstation for scanning batches of docs. Because the end users were highschool grad clerical types, I didn't want to scare them when I chose Ubuntu for the solution. Therefore, down to the very pixel, I changed the "unclicked" desktop to look as much as possible like Windows XP with the same color scheme, icons, icon names, taskbar location, menu location, main menu icon, and so on. I even found a plugin for Firefox that changes the titlebar to say Microsoft Internet Explorer, instead. The end users didn't notice anything different. At home, I dressed up my wife and kid's PCs similarly but not exactly -- they already know it's Ubuntu Linux.
it predated the web, early 90s. sorry. maybe fortune has digitized archives, who knows.
This man is a murderer, ain't no amount of money that's gonna change that! How about using his family's fortun.
Then he apparently *wants* us to think that the earth is at least that old, so why not do that anyway?
Perhaps you missed the ads on the right of the page because you have some kind of ad blocking going on? &gt;he's just trying to do his part to make the world a better place, and hasn't met a person such as myself who could show him how to more appropriately channel his energies. He's comment spamming.  Because his comment spamming fits into the prejudices of the average redditor it might not be immediately obvious, but take a look, he is a comment spammer: http://reddit.com/user/ravenous &gt;What are YOU doing that's positively affecting the globe? Spammers are not positively affecting the globe.  By both not spamming, and trying to persuade spammers to quit, I am making the world a better place.
Exactly. When a software vendor's market shows signs of a slowdown, that's the *wrong* time to attack its existing customers with sniffing stuff that questions their integrity, and with no real compelling reason to upgrade.
*"The truth is that unless you were actually here 6,000 years ago, you don't know for sure. Your geological assumptions may simply be wrong."* Are people really that stupid? Wait, don't tell me, I already know the answer. You give **"dumb as a stump"** new meaning.
You mean [this Lauren Becker?](http://cfi-forums.org/viewtopic.php?t=555&amp;sid=cee4ec5e26a40a28ad309f8e31ccb016).  They seem to think she's a she.
Nice! Bastiat rocks.
Agnosticism: I think it's not possible to know for sure. Atheism: I don't have this belief. Source: http://atheism.about.com/od/aboutagnosticism/a/what.htm
Triple zero is still zero.
Description of escrow process and types of transactions, with examples, in which escrow is used.
This article was well written, despite the ridiculous (and provably wrong) comments that it wasn't written by a woman. She's quite right.  Those that refute the scientific evidence have no proof at all, and they deny "deny the process that got us to that understanding". This is why I reject religions, Christianity in particular, because it denies intelligence, common sense, reason, evidence, facts and understanding, and replaces it with superstition, ignorance, stupidity, arrogance, hatred and mythical beings, all based upon fear and manipulation.
We have something in common with the Chinese and the Muslim World.
That's because you're an American prick.
So 50,000,000 Americans are as dumb as stumps.  Nothing new there. Irregardless of the accuracy of the numbers, anybody that still believes this falsehood is and ignorant idiot.
Try this, from typingtest.com: Dorothy lived in the midst of the great Kansas prairies, with Uncle Henry, who was a farmer, and Aunt Em, who was the farmer's wife. Their house was small, for the lumber to build it had to be carried by wagon many miles. There were four walls, a floor and a roof, which made one room; and this room contained a rusty looking cookstove, a cupboard for the dishes, a table, three or four chairs, and the beds. Uncle Henry and Aunt Em had a big bed in one corner, and Dorothy a little bed in another corner.  There was no garret at all, and no cellar--except a small hole dug in the ground, called a cyclone cellar, where the family could go in case one of those great whirlwinds arose, mighty enough to crush any building in its path. QWERTY Distance: 16.93  Dvorak Distance: 10.05  Colemak Distance: 9.334 One of the larger notable distances is when words use the letters "w", "r", "i", and "t", such as in "write". The difference in Colemak and Dvorak can be up to 300% - QWERTY moreso.
Americans are dim-witted cretins and unfortunately, reddit is dominated by the bastards.
Don't hold your breat. For *over* 2,000 years, people have heralded the coming of the "Christ".  In case you didn't know, Jesus was not the first.  But since his death, they have been anticipating his return, again, and again, and again, and again, and again, and again, well, you get the idea. At the dawn of every year, they have made such predictions.  There was also "millineum fever" a few years ago, and even in the year 1000 the idea took ahold that Christ would return.  It also happened in 1914, 1856 and back through time. Nothing new here.  The only thing that is surprising (well, maybe not) is that (allegedly) there are still 50,000,000 people that believe this bullshit.   Expecting people to learn from their mistakes, however, is kind of like believing in the return of Christ - ain't never going to happen.  You just have to take that on *faith.*
Yeah, the article is crap, but not its title. The Xbox is a financial failure, MS lost probably 4 billions with it. I guess it's the cost MS paid to enter this market, mainly, get developers, brand and franchises. We shall see what happens with the 360... the future looks promising, just like its multiplataform games against the PS3. And Sony's newest console blows currently, anyway.
It can't work.  Mom used to tell me when I was a teenager, "Don't argue with them.  If you convince them you're right you'll need to stay with them at least ten years to give them the rational underpinnings for what to do next.  It's that complex."  Mom was always right. 
If there were a democratic referendum, it should be on revoking ALL of the corporate media's licenses. Not on the failure to renew a license that has come up. There doesn't need to be, and there shouldn't be, a referendum in the latter situation. It's too black and white.
Sadness.
It's true, most games that sell well for PC are made with DirectX. Just install them and you'll see it asks for Directx installation. I know, I know... what's a "standard"? Well, for total number of games being produced, OpenGL probably wins, but most AAA titles, and high sellers are made with or need DirectX compared to OpenGL.
I hate courts, and the entire judicial system, but having said that, this guy should challenge this.  Pretty sure it will be thrown out. I don't have the references handy right now, but there is no law that states you have to provide either I.D. or your name. Others have refused, been arrested and been exonerated. I admire the man's courage to refuse. What's amazing about this story is he was on a *bicycle*.  Nor did they have "probable cause". I still think it's time people starting fighting back. This shit is gone way too far.
What a dumb list. Is this the best of Reddit for 2006? If so, I'm wasting my time.
from my prev. comment.. &gt; "to be on the receiving end of racist/religious bigotry.." Well, usually "bigotry" is a negative/condemning word..and so I am not justifying the Palestinian doc.
Hurray! It's the first of 2007 and Ubuntu has made it to the top of the reddit hot list. This should be a good omen for Ubuntu, I hope.
So.. reddit has dupe police, and dupe police police?
I didn't change his mind, but I actually had a rational discussion about it (the first and only with a fundamentalist) by asking him *why* he was a Christian.  I asked, was it because his parents were, and he was following in their footsteps?  Would he still have become a Christian if he had been born a Jew?  If people have the power to choose (and they must, else why was he always trying to persuade me?) then what was it that made him *choose* to be a Christian?
Strange. It's as smooth as other websites on my computer, which is quite far from the high end (Internet Explorer 7, Windows Vista, Pentium M 1.6 GHz). I'm not trying to pick a fight or start a holy war here. Perhaps it's an issue with your browser?
Too bad it is over 5 years old.
It's true! http://www.narsil.org/politics/carter/killer_rabbit.html
It would be easier if you would just mod it down and, you know, shu^H^H^Hkeep quiet. I did. But if it makes it to the front page, it's quite apparent there are a number of people who haven't seen it. Sorry, the Internet does not revolve around you.
If you want to understand the giving of humanitarian aid by If you want to understand the giving of humanitarian aid by the Bush administration read Imperial Life in the Emerald City by WaPo journalist Chandrasekaran.
If you want to understand the giving of humanitarian aid by the Bush administration read Imperial Life in the Emerald City by WaPo journalist Chandrasekaran.
And I'd like for somebody who downmodded YOU to explain why they did. That was a good, totally valid question which I was also wondering.
Best fact: "If you had a circle the size of the observable universe, and you wanted to compute its circumference with an accuracy equal to the size of a proton, the number of digits of pi that you'd need is only 50." By the way, anyone want to confirm or correct that?
If you want to understand the giving of humanitarian aid by the Bush administration read Imperial Life in the Emerald City by WaPo journalist Chandrasekaran.
Garlic is always good to enhance just about any taste
Doesn't seem so to me to. Last time I checked, Bush's government only applied to the United States. Over half of reddit's visitors comes from overseas. A more descriptive title next time would be appreciated.
New Year Wishes , videos , cards and more
The radius of the observable universe is on the order of 10^26 m according to Wikipedia, and the diameter of a proton is on the order of 10^-15 m. So with 50 digits of pi you'd get about 26 significant digits before the decimal and 24 afterwards, which is more than 15. Yes, it blends!
I think you're asking how to submit a reddit comments thread.  Read what it says in the URL form field on the submit page before you type anything there. I'm downmodding your post since it's not relevant to this article, just so it'll be relegated to the bottom of the page.  Don't take it personally.
I always thought they were looking for repetition or a pattern of some sort.  Nothing to do with accuracy.
up next: fundamentalists destroy ALL rocks, lest one of them turn out the gd can't lift.
&gt; In 1789, a Slovene mathematician computed pi to 140 digits. I misread that as "a *slovenly* mathematician computed pi to 140 digits." And it made sense, almost...
I don't understand why this has anything to do with communism, other than the background music.
The security of the State was the reason that the State had to keep a militia; and because the State had to keep a militia, the people had to be armed.  Armed against the militia.  Just in case.
Vote down if you don't want every xkcd on the front page anymore. I don't care about my karma, I don't submit anything anyway.
Not impressed. XML printer is a trivially simple task in any language.
[We can only hope.](http://reddit.com/info/vzl2/comments)
Or maybe he is just stating what is true? Christians are pretty heavily persecuted in Muslim countries. It isn't a secret. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Persecution_of_Christians#Islamic_persecution_of_Christians
"The Necessity of Swallowing - The Sin of Spilling Seed"  "The Benefits of Swallowing - Drink of the Living Water"  "Toward a Framework for Christian Porn"  http://www.sexinchrist.com/oralsex.html These guys are hilarious! Praise the lo-h-h-hd!! I have re-entered the church!
Another cute example from the "tutorial" is that the type system can, *at compile time*, ensure that you never do `head []` i.e. try to access the first element of an empty list. There's a saying in ML and Haskell circles that "If it compiles, it's almost certainly correct" because the type system is so powerful and expressive. Epigram is an effort to remove the "almost" from that sentence.
Hmm...maybe a couple new users signed up since July?  Stranger things have happened...
Stupid. Lambdas are just syntactic sugar in python. If you force their usage like that you are just doing yourself disservice by making modifications harder (if you can't fit future mods in lambda you'll need to "factor out" that into def() closure anyway). The only thing going for it is that you don't need to invent name for it. But when I'm lazy I just use "def _()".
You are seriously getting upmodded for that? That has got to be the most close-minded post I've ever read on Reddit. Reddit has been biased against religion for a long time. But I didn't realize that it had become outright intolerant and anti-intellectual about it.
Perspective of the death penalty.
Totally agree.  The cartoons in the Economist are also much better.  Key problem with these Time cartoons is that they are too busy.
&gt; This is why I reject religions, Christianity in particular, because it denies intelligence, common sense, reason, evidence, facts and understanding, and replaces it with superstition, ignorance, stupidity, arrogance, hatred and mythical beings, all based upon fear and manipulation. My faith, and the Christianity taught in the Bible is firmly about: intelligence, common sense, reason, evidence, understanding, and love. Nowhere in the Bible does it say to turn off your brain. It is actually very clear about 'testing everything'. I just don't understand how you can make such a blanket statement against Christianity. I know many Christians who are very serious about the logical aspect of their faith.
I'm just pointing out the impossibility of changing this person's mind.  Everything can be explained to be in accordance with his faith (substitute any particular faith for "his faith").  The bible says it, he believes it, that settles it.
A fact is something that is in agreement with the bible.  Anything else is not a fact. For my next trick, I shall convert a brick wall to Islam.
Now that Python 2.5 [has conditional expressions](http://mail.python.org/pipermail/python-dev/2005-September/056846.html), can't you just do `lambda x,y: (1 if x&gt;y else -1 if x≺y else 0)`?
Here is the digg link too. If you like it please digg. We have a Terabyte of bandwidth that needs to be used up some how. http://digg.com/football/MPC_Computers_Bowl_Incredible_Catch
As 2006 comes to a close, it is time for the predictions to make their rounds. Over at VoIP News the VoIP Bloggers have their go at predicting 2007. Of course I am going to highlight the application space because it is going to make up a more significant component of VoIP going into 2007-2008.
Reminds me of a recent favorite article I read linked from reddit this week:  "Piracy : The better option" Seriously, once you own it, just download it.  And next time, you really won't feel all that bad not purchasing it in the first place.   Somehow these heavy-handed tactics aren't causing me to WANT to PURCHASE these things legally. :)
I've skimmed through the link. I am left with two questions: a. I don't see a description of how sort actually sorts the original list. I see only size + order, but no guarantee that the elements in the final list are the same as the ones in the original list. I could write a sort implementation that just generates the sequence 1..n, which satisfies their specification. I have no idea if this is a shortcoming of the approach or just of the presentation, but for such a basic example I would have expected better. b. I'm not sure how Epigram is different/better than other proof systems, in particular Coq - as Coq is as expressive as it gets in the Barendregt's cube. They mention Coq, but I see no explanation why Coq is not good enough or why is not good enough, thus why exactly do we need Epigram?
Hey, I saved this last time it was on reddit!
Stewie reading a bible: "I love God.  He's so deliciously evil!"
Good advice as far as it goes.  This is a problem I struggle with regularly...
No
You're absolutely bonkers.  You just argued that we should only believe in something which we can empirically see with our own eyes, which means you're arguing that a person should *not* believe in god.  You're contradicting yourself all over the place.  You make no sense.
That's rich, that's rich ;-)
hell yeah about that last part. wtf is wrong with america. time for a slight correction.
...and blind people *still* can't read them!
Really?  I thought the key problem was the lack of humor.
You may be black, but you certainly don't love yourself or black people, which is very unfortunate. And by the way, Assimilation is about adopting a foreign culture.  Being "human" is not the exclusive domain of europeans.  It's funny your rantings have little to do with the article, perhaps you fall into category 2), someone who quit school and is incapable of basic reading and writing, what the hell is "overanunciate" Oh and by they way, "I'm allowed to say these things. I'm black. :p Honestly".
This is the [xkcd comic in question](http://xkcd.com/c204.html). I certainly don't believe that every xkcd deserves to rise to the top of reddit, but I just thought this was an interesting real story to link to.
WE HAD TEN!
New and upcoming resources from Google for 2007.
GOOD ARTICLE
Agreed. I modded it up as soon as I finished the first paragraph. The techniques described are somewhat subjective. Dimming the light works for me (we all know programmers are hardly productive before 5pm) but it occasionally gives me trouble sleeping so I try to avoid that. Reading articles/books tend to help me stray further from actual work. Staying away from social network sites is a must, hovewer.
You got that right!  You are not alone.
All respect due to everyone here who does not share my belief: You know, you could always ask us why we dont change our minds about religion rather than take the word of some internet article heh. Truth is, we dont believe something just to believe it. We truly believe Christianity to be *CORRECT*. I personally have no desire to be deluded, or misinformed, or in any way believing anything that is not true. If I believe something not true, then I certainly want to know the truth. Now, any time someone wants to take some time and attempt to convince me its not so then I am all ears, to date however more often than not such an event has ended up with the person attempting to convince me ending up becoming a Christian themselves. No article is going to get you into the mind of a believer, but if you want to find out *why* we believe as we do, talk to us.
[Here's an enlarged picture of the "swamp rabbit".](http://www.narsil.org/politics/carter/large_rabbit_image.html)
Does not match orwell.ru!
They are not looking for any magic. They're just pushing the limits with better algorithms and faster hardware.
&gt;What's so strange about wanting to shut down a media outlet that supported a "bungled" coup against the democratically elected government ? What's really strange is that a someone writng this message call themselves a "liberal"
LOL, the EU is soft, weak and crippled with irrational bureaucracy, not to mention the corruption. Who's going to be afraid of the EU? they'd wet their pants about having to send an army anywhere to do anything.
Some people find comfort in being unhappy...god-speed.
well, so far they've been living there for more than 3 1/2 years...
http://www.m-w.com/dictionary/atheist we can go back and forth on this.
Thanks. That's enough desktop backgrounds to last me about a century.
Ha ha.  Looks like the president was winning.
Everything you can see on your browser a hacker can crack and analyze. The first captchas were only a set of letters in an image – they were cracked, so they skewed the images – they were cracked, and then they added noise – they were cracked etc… What we have here is another layer of complexity for the bot, it will need to recognize the HTML that presents the Captcha and only then try to crack it. It isn't a problem for a specific page you are trying to crack, but it is a problem if the HTML layout changes – the bot won't know where to look for the Captcha unless its programmer tells it. It's like changing the encoding of the Captcha image to an unknown one.
Then why are you attacking the victim?
Why do you believe in something that the brightest minds "know" to be false? And don't say at one time the brightest minds thought the Earth was flat. While scientists can be wrong about science and are the first ones to admit and change, they have pretty much always said religion isn't "correct." So what makes you want to truly believe in it? Especially considering that the sole reason you are a Christian is sheer luck. If you were my brother, you'd have been brought up Hindu and would fight whoever tried to question your faith. And you'd think you're truly correct as a Hindu too. So how can you truly believe your religion as correct when it's just a matter of chance that you were born in a family that practiced Christianity?
&gt; Another cute example from the "tutorial" is that the type system can, at compile time, ensure that you never do head [] i.e. try to access the first element of an empty list. You can even do this in Haskell, although it is much worse usability-wise. Define two data-types:  data List a = Empty | Cons a (List a)   data NonEmpty a = NonEmpty (List a) These must be abstract, in that the Cons and NonEmpty data constructors should be made inaccessible from outside the defining module. The central idea is that NonEmpty acts as a certificate of non-emptiness. The details all flow naturally from there: There are functions  toList :: NonEmpty a -&gt; List a   cons   :: a -&gt; List a -&gt; NonEmpty a   head   :: NonEmpty a -&gt; a whose implementations should be obvious. Their value is in their types and the abstractness of List and NonEmpty, ensuring that a list certified non-empty is indeed non-empty. You can use the phantom type technique to simulate a simple subtype lattice where List a is a subtype of NonEmpty a, allowing functions to be written that operate on either empty or non-empty lists and retain their status. (Think of a reverse function.)
&gt; well would you blame linux for people not knowing how to recompile their kernels for some obscure device? It wouldn't make sense to blame Linux for that because Linux doesn't ship any compiled code at all.  But if Ubuntu (to pick some OS, you can also pick Fedora, Suse, OpenBSD, whatever), doesn't recognize some hardware there are two possible branches:  1) The specification to the hardware is open and the drivers can be made, in which case there are two solutions: if the drivers exists and are free I *will blame Ubuntu* for not shipping by a simple bug report (I haven't payed anything for it, I can't really claim or require anything). If the drivers doesn't exist, the bug report will get to the Linux devs or something like.  2) The specification to the hardware is closed and it is close to impossible to develop a driver. Then I would blame the company making such a hardware and I wouldn't buy anything from them.  Guess what, 1 never happened. It is not impossible to happen, but very hard.
The EU requires abolishion of the death penalty as a requirement of membership. Many European countries gave it up grudgingly.
Do you know mostly black people or white people or a mix? Otherwise - yeah - this thread is a bit of a mix of arbitrary claims.
Link?  I know that some segregated schools were decent, but I'm under the impression that most of them were very poorly funded.
If governments were serious about helping third world countries they'd cut their aid to the corrupt governments, *and* cut domestic agricultural subsidies. And while they were doing it the people in their own nations would be better off. Few countries have the balls to do it though. It's much easier to throw money at despots that to convince itinerant farmers that they should have to create value.
What, again? 
I wasn't trying to be clever.  That's actually my experience, and some friends of mine have experienced the same.
About the only people stupider are the ones that make sweeping generalizations about people's intelligence.
Well sorry to offend the fragile sensibilities of the dupe police police police!
good speakers will sound like crap if you hook them up to a crappy stereo.  I have a friend with all NAIM equipment and he has some tiny TANNOY studio monitors hooked up to it with tiny little 5.25 inch drivers.  You would think the sound would be horrible.  Think again.  I brought over some of my CDs to his place and listened.  Amazing.  I heard details in the music I hadn't heard before at all.  And my system isn't too bad with Adcom separates and a good NAD 24 bit CD player hooked up to some pretty nice Speakerlab S9's that my father and I built from a kit back in 1982 when I was 12 years old.   Good amplification combined with good speakers can result in good sound.  I have an iPod hooked up to an NAD C320BEE integrated amp, and some good Speakerlab speakers that I found at a local Goodwill for $40.  The system is great for casual listening and I can let it play for hours.   Don't be fooled by the ads, "this amp has 1000 watts of power!" or the Bose speakers that are the size of the head of a pin yet can reproduce "the full spectrum".  A load of crap!  You want your system to reproduce as closely as possible the actual recording.
Sounds [familiar](http://programming.reddit.com/info/i77w/comments/ci87q). 
You should have seen the one that got President Ford. 
You're implying that this woman perhaps owned a restaurant that refused to service non-english people? Or maybe she personally kicked arabic speakers from the plane she was piloting? Oh wait, she must have been a pharmacist that refused an abortion pill based on her religious beliefs. Wtf?
Actually, if you can't pay the hospital, they might send you to the county hospital instead, but they can't refuse you entirely. Hospitals pretty much have to treat anyone, even if they can't pay for it.  Don't you watch ER?
It thought someone else email address was mine, but those are my contacts all right.  This looks serious.
&gt; Duplicate Points are not supported (two game objects cant share the same location) This is not an intrinsic problem with kd-trees. There are a lot of standard data structures that in their most basic forms don't support duplicate keys, e.g. B-trees. The solution is simple: Store a _list_ of entries when duplicate keys occur. You can even optimize the typical case of no duplicates to be space and locality efficient by using the least significant bit of the data pointer to indicate whether the node contains a single datum or several. &gt; Only points are supported (the concept of object size does not fit the algorithm well) This is news to the hordes of game programmers who happily use kd-trees for broad-phase collision detection between non-point shapes! Again, the simplest version of kd-trees you meet in a textbook only supports points, but it is easy to support shapes that are not points.
That is a real commercial?  I'm not convinced, truthfully.  The one alien looks striking like a "cock-and-balls".   And the other alien barfs up an eyeball for him.  If this truly is a zune commercial.. well, somebody at microsoft advertising needs to lose their job.
[Here's how it probably happened](http://cyber-knowledge.net/blog/2007/01/01/gmail-vulnerable-to-contact-list-hijacking/) *([as submitted by Rub3X](http://reddit.com/info/wlvq/comments))*
It was hilarious. Assumably, time didn't affect it. Pity, really...
"This is a strange place, and extraordinary place, and interesting. There is nothing resembling it at home. The people are all insane, the other animals are all insane, the earth is insane, Nature itself is insane. Man is a marvelous curiosity. When he is at his very very best he is a sort of low grade nickel-plated angel; at is worst he is unspeakable, unimaginable; and first and last and all the time he is a sarcasm. Yet he blandly and in all sincerity calls himself the "noblest work of God." This is the truth I am telling you. And this is not a new idea with him, he has talked it through all the ages, and believed it. Believed it, and found nobody among all his race to laugh at it. Moreover -- if I may put another strain upon you -- he thinks he is the Creator's pet. He believes the Creator is proud of him; he even believes the Creator loves him; has a passion for him; sits up nights to admire him; yes, and watch over him and keep him out of trouble. He prays to Him, and thinks He listens. Isn't it a quaint idea? Fills his prayers with crude and bald and florid flatteries of Him, and thinks He sits and purrs over these extravagancies and enjoys them. He prays for help, and favor, and protection, every day; and does it with hopefulness and confidence, too, although no prayer of his has ever been answered. The daily affront, the daily defeat, do not discourage him, he goes on praying just the same. There is something almost fine about this perseverance. I must put one more strain upon you: he thinks he is going to heaven!" 
The craving for clothes is a learned response. Little kids are perfectly happy running around naked.  If you've ever had kids, or been around friends with kids, you'd know this. Kids learn that being naked is taboo by watching adults, not from any innate sense of shame. I wouldn't know what caused your sister's change to becoming uncomfortable with even music videos.  It sounds to me as if she became ashamed of sex and all things associated with it.  Exposure to a nudist camp at a young age wouldn't do it. If you want research on this, there's plenty on google.
Thanks for illustrating just how seductive the broken window fallacy is and how hard it is to explain why it is indeed a fallacy.
You are probably wrong.  See Hiibel v. Sixth Judicial District Court of Nevada.  I'm sure the officer would describe him as detained.  Was it really on reasonable suspicion...  I guess the courts would have to decide.  It's just a name.  ID could not have been required (no ID required to walk or ride a bike.)
i enjoyed the arc from lrh
http://ja.reddit.com/info/wgd0/comments あれ?と思ったけど、wiliki.cgi と wiliki2.cgi ってのがあるのか……
I understand.  It's still not going to happen. It's not a matter of paying only 1 cent more per bar of chocolate.  Btw, I know your trick. First you argue that if I'm willing to pay 1 cent more, then what about 5 cents.  What about 50 cents.  What price children.  THINK OF THE CHILDREN! Give me a break.  I am not saying it's right.  I'm saying people aren't going to stop buying chocolate from west africa because there is child slavery involved. If you want to eliminate the problem, you can try to cut off the demand for the product but I doubt if that will work.  At the most, you might lower demand a bit, but that will result in less money going to the workers, in which case the enslaved children will eat less. I don't know what the answer is but cutting off all trade to west africa isn't going to help those kids. Actually, cutting off all trade entirely to West Africa, if it was even possible, might help them, but it would take 60 years for the country to build themselves enough of an economy that this couldn't happen. Any real fixes to West Africa has to come from within.  We've proven that attempts to help other countries only messes them up, whether we try to institute new regimes or just by giving them charity.
Great for privacy as well - you can be assured that, at least until it gains popularity, few will know how to use your keyboard correctly.
No, that's basically just propaganda they teach in schools. The truth is basically that: A) The schools were equally funded.  B) There isn't really any correlation between money spent and academic achievement anyway.  C) They found that the difference in achievement was due to peer group and family, not differences in schools. Basically they found that if you put one black kid in a class with 30 white kids, the black kid will perform on the same level as the white kids. So they went and made classes of 15 black kids and 15 white kids, so after desegregation both black kids and white kids did worse than before. The Coleman report got finished, and it was one of the biggest studies ever conducted on anything. They didn't understand statistics as well then, so they literally interviewed 600,000 people even though it would have been valid with a far smaller sample, which they didn't know. However when they saw the results they basically realized that segregated schools didn't make any difference. So what they did is they decided to release the report in Washington on the hottest day of the summer without telling any of the press, so no one showed up and covered the story. Then they went ahead with forced busing which is what they wanted to do before. Anyway, I'm not claiming the concept of desegregation is bad, just that the way it was done has completely fucked up our schools, and they remain fucked up because of it to this day.
There's a whole slew of groups that have moved beyond this notion of historical trauma, and I fail to see how it differs for blacks. A few examples: Catholics. Once vilified. Now perfectly mainstream to the point that McDonald's sells fish sandwiches for a discount on Friday's during lent without any objection. The Irish: Turn of the century America, they had two strikes against them -- the ethnic shame of being Irish, and being catholic. Look around at St. Patrick's day where "Everyone's Irish today!" and Notre Dame stickers on car windows. Chinese. Middle of the 19th century, vilified as being an inferior race with shameful religious and culinary preferences. Italians. Japanese. These are people who were vilified as evil incarnate not a generation and a half ago.    
Wait till you see the grammar police, and the grammar police police.
you mean *too good*. rehashing old bush satire will probably continue until he leaves office. and we'll miss him.
Good thing I have a all-region dvd player.
2003 was an off year for jobs. Late 2003: Employment that didn't permit hours upon hours watching television reruns.
&gt;Don't you watch ER? Classic.
You do know that 68% of reddit comments are arbitrary claims, right? 
IE 'has trouble'? Can you elaborate on this? What will happen?  Is it a well known problem that I can read more about?
No, just a tribute to the hordes of retards promoted to management in this company.
Last time that posted, it was Irish.  ..zzzz
I've got to look them up to see what they mean, the English language is always changing, so here is what Merriam Webster has added this year.
Could be Hercules?
The country was banned because of censorship by the national high speed ISP. Why is our country investing such large amounts of education dollars in a country that doesn't abide by the first amendment?
It's a sad display of the "but he's *our* bastard" mentality.
They don't have the ice core samples?
This also sets precedent for Wikipedia. They've never banned an entire country with in-place high-speed internet infrastructure. 
Just a quick note to all concerned: At last count there were 5 continents that aren't Europe or North America.
One city I lived in charged people about $30 a day to be in jail. Cheaper than Motel 6, but in the motel you don't have to smuggle tobacco in your rectum.
unfair to ants
I was always so upset that the older games never had an executor class ship.  I wonder how long it would take to fly along the length of one.
or the frenchman could have said "pole vault"
I agree; this part &gt; Either mathematicians are totally crazy, or they're planning ahead for a time when the survival of humanity will depend on the ability to construct extremely large, accurate circles. totally ignores that, which is kindof dumb.
My favorite technique is to always have many useful things to do, preferably written down in a list. I try to always have at least dozen items on my immediate to-do list, so I can switch to other tasks if I'm not making much progress on my main one. This keeps you busy and maintains your coding momentum; most importantly, it prevents you from falling into a vicious cycle of productivity guilt. Once you feel good from having finished other tasks, you can then return to the original task with your energy recharged and with a fresh set of eyeballs.
As I said before, I wish to offend no one. I respect everyone's belief: There is no consensus on who the "brightest minds" are. In any event, I do not think there is a person alive who would allow someone else to choose their beliefs for them. I look at all of the evidence and arguments personally, and I make my own choice. I have chosen Christianity from the other possibilities, myself and millions of others. I am not opposed to science, I enjoy it -- part of the reason I spend a lot of time on reddit are the many science articles. There are a huge number of great thinkers in history who happened to be Christians, -- not to mention Isaac Newton who was a *great* scientist and who also most certainly never said religion isn't "correct". Also the word "Science" takes on many forms. The "science" of determining predictable phenomena we see in our world, along with the "science" of constructing experiments to *VALIDATE* a hypothesis (full with the understanding that no hypothesis can be truly valid until an experiment can prove it or at least begin to prove it) is not remotely in the same category as the "science" which creates a hypothesis and *validates it purely on the merits of other *scientists* (the brightest minds) and not through any experiment.  Your belief that I am a Christian because of "sheer luck" is entirely faulty. I have examined many belief systems, and I have *chosen* this one of my own free will. Also, you are entirely misled if you think that anyone who is a Christian must have been raised that way, *millions* of people become Christians worldwide who were not raised that way. Assuming I had been brought up Hindu, or Muslim, or Atheist --- I would have still more than likely upon becoming an adult said to myself "Hmm I wonder if this is really how it is" and saught to see other possibilites. This I did, and I continue to do. It is also how I will teach my son as he gets older. However, it is a fallacy to claim that the "brightest minds" have a monopoly on truth. Do the brightest minds decide who the brightest minds are? Last I checked the brightest human mind was still fallible and capable of extreme error, and last I checked the world's greatest expert in one field of science was not the world's greatest expert in another branch.
damn you reddit I should be working!!*!
It isn't Wikipedia's fault. The ones at fault the officials/telecom-monopoly owners of the country of Qatar (which along with the Taliban in Afghanistan and Saudi Arabia, is one of the few places where Wahabi/Salafi version of Islam is enshrined in law) for being so idiotic/repressive as to channel the entire country through a single IP.
it's not anti-venezuela, it's anti-chávez chávez is not Venezuela...
It's certainly a good feeling to be checking tasks off a list all day, too... even if they're small ones.
Step away slowly from the keyboard, the [dupe police police](http://reddit.com/info/wl8u/comments/cwlen) would like to have a word with you.
The central command of US forces in the region is located in Doha, Qatar. I could see their reasoning: there's local support infrastructure needed for such a deployment (well qualified local accountants, engineers and linguists) that demands a good education investment, but from a purely utilitarian standpoint the money would indeed be spent elsewhere in terms of gain on investment.
I can't see what's the relation in:   usa is a snoop dog and it should mind it's own  business   therefore   chavez is not a dictator
Exactly. You want to make sure your to-do list has a mix of tasks in terms of expected duration, effort and pay-off. When you have one of those shitty days, it's great to have some busy-work tasks that you can complete with your brain on auto-pilot.
no idea. I had no idea many (how many?) prisoners in the US had jobs, and I have no idea why people are pushing this comment down. However, since we all know that statistics are almost by definition fucked up, could it be true that while prisoners are NOT added to the ranks of the employable, at the same time those prisoners who DO have a job are actually counted as employed (and both things help paint a picture rosier than it is)?
the problem is that in venezuela there is not independence of powers, the "electoral" power does what chavez tells it to do. there is no confidence in the results of the election
Because the Israeli-Palestinian conflict is entirely GWB's fault... (He sure hasn't helped the situation, but... get some perspective).
and she must have not been looking for sex for a long time, either, apperently...
I don't get it.  Why would this guy expect/want a cash refund?  Buyer's remorse on the Tony Bennett disc?  I didn't think any store would ever do that for an open CD or DVD.  It's always an even exchange for the same disc.  What's to keep you from ripping a copy on your laptop in your car and then returning the "bad" disc 3 minutes later?  I'm tired of reading about these 'incidents' at BestBuy/WalMart/Costco/etc.  Usually the people to whom they happen seem to be looking for trouble.
Lets read
It's the thought that counts :0)
HAHAHAHAHAHAHA
Yeah, I am thankful for that.  I have traveled around the world and saw first hand at how many people live, and I think god that we have it so well.
Really, I thought this might j u s t beacleu.     no, really  I   Thought    This   Mi ght  B a clue  Happiest New Year Fellow(s) People(s) Principals(s) Entity!   
&gt; Wtf is this? Did that really look high scurity to you, and not some thugs in ski masks in the back of a warehouse? You really think that people dont bring their celphones everywhere? It's high security to prevent a jail break by Saddam's loyalists.
there are so many admins on Wikipedia, they should do just like they do with other trolls on the site and simply clean up any "vandalism" that they see. they have such patience for admitted trolls like the GNAA, i dont see why they wouldnt see the error of BLOCKING A WHOLE COUNTRY and simply keep an eye on anything that comes from that IP
Where do you work? There are plenty of people in professional software development--most of them--who work at a small fraction of their possible productivity. They might be adept at _looking_ busy and productive, but they don't necessarily get much work done in a day. They could stand to learn a few techniques, probably.
thats actualy super funny!
Tell that to my (maybe larger) university.
That is my job, but I work alone. Some days I do just have to move my ass... and this article is about how exactly I do it :)
bright lights (but I strangely prefer a hat to keep direct light out of my eyes), hard techno, coffee, sleep, wanking it and reddit work here. Combine appropriately.
There can be no confidence in the results of the election because in Venezuela does not exists the separation of powers necessary for democracy. In Venezuela, supposedly, powers are divided in 5 branches, each one being independent of the others:  Legislative, executive, judicial, citizen and electoral.  The citizen power is the power that everybody has and the electoral power is the one responsible for the election of representatives, such as the president, governors, etc.   Ok, here it goes, first hand experience: I signed for the approval of a referendum, done 2 years ago, for the removal of Chávez from office. You have to identify yourself and ask for the referendum, since a number of citizens soliciting the referendum is required in order to approve it. This was confidential data, only for the electoral power to know... Well, the electoral power gave away this data to a member of  the congress named Luís Tascón who, by the way, is a supporter of Chávez. He in turn gave it to the executive power and, not happy with that, published the data in his web page (http://www.luistascon.com), there you could check if a given person solicited the referendum. This produced a lot of firings from government's office and a wave of discrimination throughout the country. It was impossible to find work in the government, or in a government enterprise such as PDVSA (http://www.pdv.com) if you appeared in Tascon's list. The electoral power moved to buy automatic voting machines for the referendum, and as everybody here knows, this can give you a greater control of the outcome of the election... The system has a physical backup, a ticket where the choice of elector is recorded that's deposited in a box. With this box was possible to do an audit... but the Judicial Power, The Supreme Court of Justice to be more precise, ruled that the contents of such boxes where not legally binding.   So, here it is: how can I trust in an electoral power that gave away the confidential data I trusted them? what can you expect of an automatic electoral system that is not audit able?   I defy any chavista to say there is an ounce of falsity in what I have said. And after you find that all is in fact true, I urge you to think how can you support a government that is in fact a dictatorship.
Gods I'm so gullible... I always fall for these articles and then belatedly look up to see its on The Onion.
Democracy is et al when people of the country/society are responsible for decisions made by their countries/societies.
&gt;If Fjuckby gets its way it is conceivable that Anusviken, Arslet and Dicken may be next in line for a swift reversal of misfortune.
Well, actually, taking those is equivalent to self mutilation.
Did he abandon just his fundamentalist position or did he lose his faith altogether?
It has won the battle against OS X, but the war against Windows has yet to begin.
I loved this park.  Some of the statues are quite strange.  My favorite is the trio of really old naked ladies looking like they are having a good gossip in the sauna.
False title, it does not fire 1-million rounds per minute.It fires 180 rounds at a rate of 1-million rounds per minute. I don't see any mechanism for feeding it 1-million rounds per minute, and I don't see any significant cooling system that would stop the barrels from melting.
Your uni uses a single IP? For both labs and residential net? Pretty lame.
no, it's a sad display of how the term liberal has been kidnapped by socialists. Liberalism != socialism.
I am aware, of course, of persecution of Christians (and more than likely by Christians) in many nations of the world.  I was just rather hoping that religious persecution was a thing of the past in the UK (where I live) and the US (where the story comes from).
The obligatory xkcd link: http://www.xkcd.com/c191.html
There is a best approach!  In my country ALL DVD player are multiregion. We even stopped  to ask about if DVD player is multiregion in shops (if it is not it will be returned!) Approach 2. Go to Internet and search for multi region unlock for you player. Something like press power , 1, ,2 and eject on player simultaneously... 
Why should the government of Qatar be expected to "abide by the first amendment" of a constitution that isn't theirs? It's one thing to press the government of Qatar to allow their citizens greater freedom to exercise their right to free speech but its quite another to tell the Qatar government that they have to adopt the interpretation of freedom of speech as endorsed by the Roberts Supreme Court in Washington, DC.
win
I have to agree with you, the whole thing was unprofessional. The shouting and name calling  shows it was just a hanging party. It probably was only high security in the sense that a lot of hardware was involved, the finer points of high security procedure seem to have completely eluded the new bullies in town.
It's really over hyped.   It doesn't need a cooling system as its disposable.  The bullets are pre-packed in the barrel one after another and fired electrically.  ---------------------------- |=&gt;:::|=&gt;:::|=&gt;:::|=&gt; ---------------------------- Where |=&gt; is bullet, ::: is charge.
I still think it is worse for a doctor to deny treatment based on inability to pay exorbitant fees.  It happens everywhere in the world. Why are medical treatment so expensive?  I wouldn't be surprised if it is all labor costs and hospital margins.  Since when is life less important than a extremely cozy lifestyle?
Saddam is dead, but have we really figured out why yet?  What lead us here?
This is not Apartheid.  As a South African who grew up in the Apartheid era, I will state that what they experience is *not even close* to being Apartheid.
Most of them aren't much different than those who use reddit.
Where is THIS ?
Surprisingly true
Go to your local store and check where everything is manufactured.  My guess is that even in the EU, 70% of everything is made in China. China is probably turning their own country into a cesspool to become the next superpower.  Question is, will they use military might to find a new home for their superior citizens? :)
I've never found a fellow American who felt the same way, until now! Astounding!
&gt; Too bad it is over 5 years old. Too bad you're not.
Telling your browser to load your own contacts list isn't "hijacking" anything. EDIT: Okay, maybe it is.
Does it involve preaching abstinence?  It probably does.
Very good news for indians
Another map I would like to see superimposed over this one is: Which countries have the highest weighted percentage of violent crimes? My guess is blue wins.  It does where I live. I must admit I'm scared shitless every time I travel via Singapore.  What if some junkie decided to stow his stash away in my baggage?  There's no appeal, you're dead.
I visited South Africa in 1997, just after the fall of Apartheid, and I heard first hand from people there, blacks, whites, colored, and Indians, what it was to live like in Apartheid. To that extent, I agree what is going on in Europe is not Apartheid. That said, when the EU, the self-proclaimed champion of human rights, equality and democracy now that the US has joined the ranks of North Korea*, implements policies that discriminate people on the grounds of nationality (which in the case is race), then one must be worried. *Obligatory foot note: US and North Korea were the only countries to ban against the recent non-proliferation treaty motion at the UN. US holds prisoners in Gitmo in contravention of international humanitarian law. US executes and imprisons disproportionately more non-whites than whites.
I wonder if that is why the Brits are buying up coastal properties in South-Africa?   I guess what goes around comes around...
Truth, Damn Lies and Execution Three hundred years ago, courts of justice could be blinded by superstition. In those dark times, people in positions of power could snuff out the light from any candle of hope that the condemned still held for life. Innumerable falsely accused victims were burned at the stake, ignited by the flames of flourishing injustice, and fanned by the falsehoods spoke by their peers. Sadly, no joyous sunrise would come to end their tortured nights of captivity. But three hundred years later, courts remain hoodwinked by dishonesty. Three hundred years later, lives are still tossed to the proverbial pit of fire. Three hundred years later, people in positions of power demonstrate that they are impossibly all-knowing, all-seeing, and all-hearing by summarily judging the actions of others and then doling out executions with omnipotent strength. And so I share with you today a reiteration that acts can be neither omniscient nor omnipotent, that we all have faults, and by extension so do our governments and judicial conditions. In a sense, capital punishment is like writing a cheque to purchase the life of a criminal. A payment, some argue, that is cheaper than supporting lifelong imprisonment. Yet the laws of Australia, Canada, the United States of America, and numerous others guarantee the "unalienable Rights" of Life and Liberty. Our past actions liberated slaves and all but abolished slavery. Our present actions show that we believe the authority to limit the life of a human being belongs to no one. But coldheartedly, these representative cheques continue to be cashed at Banks of Justice, even though Banks of Life and Liberty would return them marked "insufficient funds"! We must refuse to endorse Banks of Justice that continue to honour such cheques. We refuse to believe that money can indemnify human lives, regardless of the crimes in question. These deplorable bank drafts must be nullified to redeem our courts of justice and our humanity. Every moment that our voices remain silent widens the gap between being human and being humane. There is an urgency that cannot, must not, be ignored. Every hour of apathy lends credence to legalized vengeance. Now is the time to speak out for those lost voices smothered behind iron. Now is the time to turn our backs on barbaric States. Now is the time to tell the people in power that killing is wrong. Now is the time to teach compassion to all of our children. Lives are lost forever by ignoring the fierce urgency of Now. The dark winter veil of cold-blooded murder will not be lifted until the springtime infusion of life is guaranteed throughout our societies. And those who believe that tomorrow will be just another day will have a rude awakening if the executions continue. There will be neither rest nor tranquility in the world until unconditional life is granted to all its citizens. The snowstorm of revolution will not end until the clear dawn of humble justice emerges. And to the people united on the peaceful threshold of merciful justice: Do not embark in wrongful deeds. Life cannot be sanctioned by vengeful actions or riotous demonstrations. No, the Right to Life will not be chartered by outbursts of physical violence. Our actions must embody this monumental goal; we must segregate villainous force from moral force. When light from our morality is used to judge the shadows cast by criminals, we must appraise ourselves and our laws by the same rays of ethics. To do otherwise places governments and judicial systems beyond the reach of mediated introspection, beyond the grasp of justice itself. By this beam of self-inspection, when a death sentence is dispatched we lift the offender to the moral equality of societal norms, and find ourselves standing deep inside the shadows of criminals. We shall not walk in those shadows. We will walk without the spectre of hypocrisy to haunt our footfalls. And as we walk, our steps bring us closer to a golden era that waits ahead. We cannot turn back. There are those who oppose the progression toward leniency. They raise statistics like a stoic hammer, driving the belief that executing murderers will reduce homicides. However, this interpretation does not a nail in the coffin make. Numbers are tools to add weight to debates; debates that must be continually cross-examined for applicability and accountability. Yet statistics are also the claw to the hammer's head, pulling out deterrence arguments by suggesting that legitimising murder through the death penalty actually raises the rate of homicides! So we will not be satisfied by statistics. We can never be satisfied as long as the guiltless are slaughtered. We cannot be satisfied when fallible humans are the judge and the jury to deadly trials. We can never be satisfied while the Press pilots our opinions with sensationalized stigma. No, no, we are not satisfied and we will not be satisfied until tolerance towers like the tallest of trees and forgiveness flowers like an endless forest. Let us be mindful that forgetfulness is not a bedfellow of forgiveness. To forget that many death row inmates committed terrible crimes would let befall a grave injustice. By the same token, to overlook that the dead can only be exonerated posthumously defiles the memory of innocent victims. Instead of incapacitation, let criminals atone for their crimes with positive contributions to society. Instead of martyrs, make them educators. Instead of miscreants, fashion them material makers. Instead of misfits, mold them as missionaries. Instead of being slain for malevolence, give them the chance to change. Even though we face the turmoil of retribution, we can see the tenets of redemption. Within these tenets, I, too, have a dream. I dream of a day when no human will have the right to revoke the life from another. I dream of a day when miscarriage of justice does not result in fresh flowers to a solitary grave, but in the freedom of an unjustly accused prisoner. I dream of a day when even the ghosts of Salem Massachusetts, whose deaths were inconceivably shackled to "spectral evidence", and whose memories still mock modern justice, may finally find peace. I dream of a people who understand that no heated crime warrants a cold resolution by death; that death is unjustly everlasting when pit against both fleeting and permanent transgressions; and that humane disciplines can meet the needs of society while being a fair reproach for felonies. I have a dream today! I dream of a world where we can judge our justice systems as though they were individuals: not by the colour of their skin, but by the content of their character. Where at the highest courts of international law we find that justice is morally, ethically, and logically consistent across all countries. I have a dream today! I dream of a world in which Mercy opens the Door of Knowledge to reveal that the real truth in any situation can never be known entirely. A world in which we are keenly aware that the whirlwind of motives, emotions, psyche, and actions behind a trial cannot be judged and punished with absolute conviction. A world that has cast off the rattling chains of death to embrace the foundations of life. I dream of a world without injustice buried within injustice. A world where the poverty line does not foreshadow a flatline. A world where the accused wealthy and the convicted poor face their fates with equal outcomes and equal opportunities. A world where the concept of just justice is not an ironic fairytale, but a practical reality. This is our dream, a dream inspired by an extraordinary man. In the spirit of Dr Martin Luther King Jr, a man who made an enormous march for liberty, these words strive to be an extension of his ideas, a continuation to his ideals. But this time the walk is for life. And along the road to the global abolishment of capital punishment sits a world that is one small step closer to unity. It is only through this journey will our collective conscience truly be free at last.
Another casualty of modern society.
Because it is our duties as Americans to try and take over the world by spreading our cultural ideas to others. Countries that go by our rules always end up paying us tribute in the form of labor, oil, or UN votes. We could use all the help in the Middle East we can get.
dupe
Al Jazeera is censored from impacting Wikipedia, also.  I don't like my edits to Wikipedia coming from CNN "Saddam died with fear in face" Bush news journalists. I'd rather have it from the reputable news source in that region of the world.
True, but still a good question.
nobody knows what EtOH or oil really costs, the subsidies are just too deep down the rabbit hole.  blaming it on subsidies is a bit of a zero order approximation.  having said that, engines are highly designed pieces of kit, you should be able to know the composition of your fuel at point of sale...
BTW. what makes you think I'm an outsider?  I'm white, I'm South-African and I would be the first to admit that there is a lot of things wrong with my people.  I'm guessing you're too young to remember the good of the past.
Telling your own browser on your local machine with a local html file is fine, but once you go to someone else's site, and the browser loads *your* contact information, there is no telling what someone else will do with it
That's not a course, that's a reference grammar. If you want to learn Lojban, you should probably start with [Lojban for Beginners](http://www.tlg.uci.edu/~opoudjis/lojbanbrochure/lessons/book1.html) instead.
Is there a way to make the browser automatically send the information to the server?
&gt;if you had a circle the size of the observable universe, and you wanted to compute its circumference with an accuracy equal to the size of a proton, the number of digits of pi that you'd need is only 50. Of course, the universe is expanding. Give it a few thousand years, maybe you'll need 51.
Do people really understand the racism and nationalism until they are on the receiving end?
The source code is linked in the blog comments.
Easy.  People view things from different perspectives. If I was black and got paid 3 times more than my white counterpart because my company need me for the numbers, then I will disagree and I will be very happy living in South-Africa.  I would also change my mind when I get hijacked and shot because crime in South-Africa doesn't discriminate anymore. If I was colored I would say that where I was too black before, I'm now too white, but still I would prefer a white boss to a black one.  If I'm living on the Cape Flats I would say being killed by a stay bullet is a fact of life. As someone who spent most of my life in the old South-Africa I can still remember the freedom of going to school on my bicycle. Walking to rugby practice, etc. My kids can't, they live between 2 jails, home and school.  Nobody in SA can let their kids have a life because the risk is too great.  I've been to about 15 countries outside South-Africa.  I've seen rich and poor in Asia, civilized and yet decadent Europe.  I've seen what South-Africa can be, but never will.
Yes, I explained that it's an absurd term, like "anti-American" is about disagreeing with a government rather than its people. Perhaps you should look at my very next sentence above.
Unfortunately not all pages in your browser are equal. The scenario is this: You are logged into Gmail (or any google account - they use the same cookie) in Firefox Tab #1. Evil site is loaded in Tab #2. How'd you get there? Clicking a new reddit link, a link from a friend, it could be an ad on a page you sort-of trust, a popup window, the list goes on. You probably visit some sites that aren't quite... trustworthy ;) Evil site runs a simple script that grabs your Gmail contacts. From a quick look, it's possible to grab the name, email and "affinity" of your contact, which reveals a LOT. I wouldn't be surprised if there were ways to grab the other contact fields like phone number, address, etc. Now once the page has that list it's trivial to pass it to a server: submit it using a form, heck use Web 2.0 AJAX goodness (or badness) so you don't even have a page reload. Tada. Random site now has your contact list, ripe for the spamming.
Yes - the page can automatically submit the data, just like you are writing your comment to reddit :) See a more detailed explanation below.
There is nothing like getting tasks or goals done, but the evil force fields surrounding some projects is hard to puncture.
What's with all the light font on dark background blogs lately? 
LMAO! only th onion can pull something like that. I wonder if any real media outlets post this as real?
[International election monitors said the election had no signs of fraud](http://ipsnews.net/interna.asp?idnews=25095). I haven't heard of this list or the implications you speak of. Do you have a news source you could point me to read more about this? Also, I couldn't find la lista on luistascon.com. Do you have a direct url? Thanks.
Is the question then who polices the dupe polices, or who dupes the dupe police? (BTW, I agree with mshiltonj)
Defenition from [their website](http://www.the-brights.net/): * A bright is a person who has a naturalistic worldview * A bright's worldview is free of supernatural and mystical elements  * The ethics and actions of a bright are based on a naturalistic worldview    [Wikipedia says](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Brights_movement): The brights movement was started by Paul Geisert and Mynga Futrell in 2003 to provide a positive-sounding umbrella term to describe various types of people who have a naturalistic worldview, without casting that worldview as a negative response to religion (as the terms "atheist", "infidel" or "non-believer" may be taken to do).
"Woman turned away by doctor - for being American" Well, wouldn't you?
We have the fourth but it needs to be reasserted we need to clarify that in today's terminology "papers" and being secure in them is your "data". Otherwise the first thing to go will be any ideas you have or business ideas getting stolen through spying.  "The right of the people to be secure in their persons, houses, papers, and effects, against unreasonable searches and seizures, shall not be violated, and no Warrants shall issue, but upon probable cause, supported by Oath or affirmation, and particularly describing the place to be searched, and the persons or things to be seized.  "   
He's punting a baby...
&gt; Easy. People view things from different perspectives. That's exactly my point. I was rejecting the idea that 'any African' will agree with you and du Toit, as you claimed in your original comment, since the thread contains plenty of Africans claiming he's talking out of his arse. Your 'if you don't live here you know nothing' response looks less convincing in light of this fact. &gt;I've seen what South-Africa can be, but never will. That sounds like an emotional reaction. It's already in an enormously better state than (say) Europe in the fifteenth century.
COOL!!
Why? This is easy. Bush wanted him dead.
Buy spaghetti to be on the safe side. You never know what shape His Noodlyness can take when He comes down to Earth.
Quick follow-up. On digg someone posted the un-obfuscated code: http://www.cc.gatech.edu/~achille/contacts-source.txt How it works The code is pretty straightforward. Basically, Google docs has an embedded script that will run a callback function, passing the function your contact list as an object. The embedded script presumably checks a cookie to ensure you are logged into a Google account before handing over the list. Unfortunately, the script doesn’t check what page is making the request. So, if you are logged in on window 1, window 2 (an evil site) can make the function call. Since you are logged in somewhere, the cookie is valid and the request goes through. Also, if you check the object that is returned, you see fields for the contact’s name, email and “affinity”. Presumably, a higher affinity means a more-emailed contact, so it may be possible to know the relative weight of links. Possible solutions Google is run by smart people and I’m sure they’ll have this fixed soon. A few suggestions appear to be popping up, all centered on making sure the user is on a Google.com page and not a random site: * Referrer blocking: Block all requests from sites not in the google.com domain. However, some people run referrer-blocking software. It may be the price they have to pay for security, but there could be other consequences. * Script checks: An idea I had was to check the window.location (just like you check the cookie) to make sure it’s coming from a google.com domain. This is another way to see what page is making the request. * Challenge-response: Google pages (like Gmail) can have some token or unique, computed data that they submit with their requests. Random pages won’t have access to this token when they make the function call. * (From JRF, below): Include part of cookie in the request URL as a unique token that only a "real" Google page would know. Need to watch out for proxies/browser history (accessible from other pages) being able to access this unique data. May need to seed or salt it in a challenge-response system. I wrote a quick post about this: http://betterexplained.com/articles/gmail-contacts-flaw-overview-and-suggestions/ It's interesting thinking of fixes for this - do you have any other suggestions for how Google would fix this? EDIT: Clarified that embedded script does token check, added  jrf's fix mentioned below.
You're getting confused. Microsoft did block iPod users, by developing the PlaysForSure DRM scheme (as well as the new scheme in the Zune). In the end, all DRM schemes are bad, for everyone.
I just hope atheists continue to believe this, since if all atheists at least got to thinking "Yeah they are Christians for survival reasons" then at least they might let us be heh.
&gt;to be honest, i was just searching for objective treatments of dawkins that didn't seek to glorify him.  Fair enough. I think the Wikipedia entry fits the bill actually. Most criticisms of Dawkins tend to focus on his lack of diplomacy rather than his ideas - it's hard to knock holes in a belief that there is no evidence for the existence of God (a belief a lot of theologians share). &gt;but I would say that he's a bit extreme, in the sense that he lies quite far out of the mainstream. I don't think he's terribly far out of the mainstream, or the God Delusion wouldn't be flying off the shelves (the same is also, I'm afraid, true of the Left Behind authors).  'Extremist' is a rather weaselly term. He may be the closest thing atheism has to a big-name 'extremist', but all this actually means is that he's unusually outspoken and severe about religion - he doesn't want to see atheism mandated by the state and he doesn't promote or commit violence. There's no equivalence between RD and political or religious extremists. &gt;i think there are many holes in the "Dawkins admits he's wrong, while his opponents don't" that anyone attempting objectivity could see easily Go ahead, by all means. From what you've said so far I suspect you're confusing 'bias' with 'opinion', but I'd be interested to hear your argument. &gt;as for my talks of being downvoted, it's not so much this area of the thread but further down, where i calmly explain that the NPS can say how old the park is Yes. You did a public service down there and it's irritating that you got downvoted. (You'll notice you've got modded back into positive numbers there.) &gt;disagreeing with atheists is pretty unpopular at reddit, but really, when you present them with facts and they vote you down cf my response, and jayne's. I'm an atheist. Please don't be tempted to generalise about us. It's not really an ideological position in the sense that being left-wing or being Christian is.
[This article by Peter-Paul Koch](http://www.quirksmode.org/blog/archives/2005/12/xmlhttp_notes_c.html) is where I first saw mention of the problem; PPK states only that he saw "weird errors" any time the HTML snippets involved forms. The last comment on the page lists a possible workaround, but I've never tried it out to verify whether it works.
It's not as if an academic textbook that covers the complete learning of the language has been published, a la those used in schools for other languages. "The Complete Lojban Language" is the closest one will get to a legitimate "course" for Lojban currently, due to its relative infancy as a language. Besides, if it had been termed "Reference Grammar", it's unlikely that anyone would have paid attention to it since it contains much more than what one is normally used to encountering when browsing a grammar book.   
how does one calculate digits of pi "by hand"? do you draw a circle with a diameter line and measure it? this is a serious question, not a sarcastic one. :-)
He's right that corn is a lousy crop to produce ethanol with.  There are better crops, like algae or hemp
I found this story rather endearing, which is why I submitted it.  It won't change the world, but it made me smile.
What type of name is Tadlet?
dfhdfhdfh
*It's interesting thinking of fixes for this* It looks like a browser problem to me. Don't send cookie for embedded script if it's requested from a site that is not subdomain of cookie's domain. EDIT: Meanwhile a possible hotfix is to put part of authorization cookie into request url. The reason for sending only a part is to avoid storing the whole authorization cookie in a proxy log or browser history, just for extra security.
giving very useful information
If people are more or less equally good, then they are also more or less equally rotten, no?  It was meant as a tongue-in-cheek reply, but that apparently flew straight over the head of most readers.
[Bono](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Bono) EDIT:  &gt; Is your implication that African-Americans are selfish? No, I think the implication is that the "media" doesn't focus on "Africa-Americans" trying to lend aid. I can't believe you guys are down moding Bono. ??? 
Yeah, I liked the book "Contact", too. :-) 
Reading  "My Pet Goat" on 9/11.  Hanging out at the ranch during Katrina disaster.  What next?
And besides that: &gt;In violation of a Judgement of the Court of Justice of the European Communities[EU], the UK is limiting access for low-skilled workers from Romania and Bulgaria to its labour market So, it's the UK going **against** EU regulations... 
&gt; he's an agent freely contracting for his services, isn't he? Nope. He is employed and has contractual obligations. He is free to ignore those (otherwise it would be slavery) but he has to face the consequences.
I would hope that the considerable amount of tax that is taken from my small pay check would go to something good in the world, but you have a point that we have many pressing domestic issues to worry about, if I understand your comment correctly.
I have N-timeunit-plans -- usually 3-hour-plans.  I say 'I will start a 3-hour-plan with the goals of X, Y, and Z and upon achieving those goals or exhausting my time, I will *stop*, evaluate what has happened, and do something else for a while. ... OK, go.'  The most important important part happens at the end, when I stop :-)  Within a 3-hour-plan I find it easier to focus, I find myself more sanely interruptible, I find myself less stressed about the progress I make -- and I find that I make better progress anyway, particularly as I continue onto subsequent iterations where've I've more thought-out clue about the domain and better ideas about my solutions.  I first used N-timeunit-plans on a personal Forth project -- to make a decent personal MUD client in Forth.  This took me three three-hour-plans, the first almost completely a wash in terms of code, but by the end I'd mastered gforth's undocumented multitasking library, coordinating my own two tasks with gforth's internal tasks so that I could drop down from my client prompt into a gforth repl; likewise used gforth's undocumented FFI to build a networking library in Forth, and then again to poll(2) stdin and socket in separate tasks; finally written three levels of interface, one of Forth commands, one of traditional prompted input, and one of vi/nethack-like input (h "west" l "east", mh mm "cast 'heal'" "cast 'magic missile'").  Not the most impressive thing anyone has ever done in nine noncontiguous hours, I'm sure, but N-timeunit-plans won my favor for the directed, comfortable pace I found under them.
Great call, that would fix this entire class of bugs. I wonder if it would have implications for tools like Google Adsense or  Google analytics, since they also call remote scripts (not sure to what extent they use Google's cookies). I tried in the latest versions of IE, FireFox and Opera and the exploit worked, so it appears the major browsers don't currently do the cookie check you mention (don't have a Mac, maybe a Safari user knows).
See [Marlon Brando - The Ugly American](http://www.amazon.com/Ugly-American-Marlon-Brando/dp/B00009AOBP/sr=8-6/qid=1167654410/ref=pd_bbs_sr_6/102-1609684-7108909?ie=UTF8&amp;s=dvd) Please also see this link about [America's involvement with Suharto](http://reddit.com/info/wmc2/comments)
Steps that a Linux administrator can take to protect his logs in the event of a system being exploited.
Horny Goat Weed, Potent 1000mg pills to enhance sex:  Horny Goat Weed is the only non-prescription pill that shows instantaneous results. http://www.goatweedspill.com/ 
*it appears the major browsers don't currently do the cookie check you mention.* Yeah. And I don't hold my breath waiting for them. It will probably take **years** until all vulnerable browsers disappear from users' computers. I have edited my previous post to add what I think is pretty simple and robust way to handle this problem in the imperfect world we live right now.
Also important is the "google" callback function which is executed by the above script and enumerates the items in the Contacts object:    function google(a){   var emails;   emails = "&lt;ol&gt;"   for(i=0;i&lt;a.Body.Contacts.length;i++){    emails += "&lt;li&gt;"+a.Body.Contacts[i].Email+"&lt;/li&gt;";    }   emails += "&lt;/ol&gt;"   document.write(emails); }
Article title is misleading - these are the top 10 Indie Games of the year.
More like 76%, get your statistics right!
and this is why i run noscript... :)   http://www.noscript.net/
oH God! That one was scary! And it sucks! Looks like a dick with eye or something.
This will last about 5 minutes until somebody slips and cracks their head.
&gt; It's true. The guy posted the story with more details in another forum. I don't know his real name but with his posting history, I believe him. Which guy are you referring to?  Do you mean the poster of the story on that site (Ben Popken) or the RJH person?  Presumably Popken can't verify the facts any more than we can so it wouldn't prove anything if he posted it somewhere ele.  A post from the RJH with some more detail would help but I googled it with the phrase ["Best Buy" 911 Customer Refund "Tony Bennett" CD] and all it turned up was this post and another blog that had copied it word for word.  Can you provide a link to this other forum of which you speak?
It's hard to conceive of many people who don't want to be productive at all. I don't think it's a question of intent. Most people have some bad habits, and I'm always interested in breaking my own and picking up techniques for becoming more productive. My point is that a lot of the techniques that might be helpful in overcoming "coder's block" are also likely to help productive programmers become even more productive. I don't really care much for the implication that anyone who disagrees with you must be a solitary worker with no professional experience. I don't want to spill my personal credentials, but suffice it to say that you probably aren't the only experienced professional software developer browsing reddit.
Thanks for the explanation!  This is a pretty big browser problem...
Sometimes you need to realise when the fat lady has sung, and move on.
The EU is very good at drawing up effective cooperation agreements and prefers this approach to military might. Which is to say, it projects soft power. The lack of fireworks means it rarely makes the news. The EU has a record second to none when it comes to spreading democratic values. It does this by offering economic cooperation to reformers, and no less than 14 former one party states are now EU members.   
Silent Death Online was a 2D MMO Space Shooter that had a die hard community of players. Unfortunatly the game was closed down on December 7th 2001 by EA however now the die hard players have launched a project to bring back Silent Death Online by recreating the gameplay of the game in a new title which has yet to be named.
On way would be to add up the first X terms of Leibnitz Formula for Pi (and multiple by 4) http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Leibniz_formula_for_pi
The article's quite poor. It doesn't give any information about how pi would actually be computed to so many decimal places.  It could easily have talked about how to compute pi using the arctan series, arctan(x) = x - x^3/3 + x^5/5 - x^7/7 + x^9/9, ... and identities such as pi/4 = 4 arctan(1/5) - arctan(1/239).  With this formula, and an extended-precision arithmetic package, one can easily compute pi to thousands of decimal places.    See, for example, http://www.mathpages.com/home/kmath373.htm Another method for computing pi is the "arithmetic-geometric mean" iteration -- see the book by the Borweins, "Pi and the AGM".   Yet another method computes the n'th binary digit of pi using very small space (informally:  "without computing all the previous digits").  See, for example, http://crd.lbl.gov/~dhbailey/ .   The small space bound is dependent on an unproved conjecture, however. The article also doesn't mention why one would want to compute so many digits.  There are at least two reasons: It is still an unsolved problem whether pi is "normal", that is, whether every block of k digits appears with a limiting frequency that one would expect from a random sequence.  It is even unknown whether every block of digits appears somewhere in the decimal expansion of pi (popular claims to the contrary notwithstanding).  Most mathematicians believe the answer to both problems is "yes".   It is at least conceivable that computing huge numbers of digits of pi could suggest whether these conjectures are true. The second reason is that computing large numbers of digits of pi, since they intensively use various arithmetic operations, could reveal problems with new computer chips -- you can compare the results of your calculation to previous ones. Neither reason is truly compelling, though.
Qatar is already a solid US ally. IIRC, US forces were headquartered there in the run up to the Iraq War. BTW, you might want to have a word with your representative if you think your American duty is to spread the concept of free speech to Qatar.  The US government has pressured the Qatar government to bring Al Jazeera into line. The Qataris have demonstrated a stronger understanding of American values by refusing.
* The belief that we should love each other.  * The belief that materialism doesn't lead to enduring happiness.  * The belief that the universe is bound together by something we do not currently understand.  * The belief that there is intelligent life beyond our universe (or for the pedantically minded, what we currently consider to be our universe).  * The belief that we should forgive others  * The belief that [people should study science](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Bah%C3%A1%27%C3%AD_Faith_and_science) to avoid believing in superstition. I would go on, but if you've come this far without considering these things, your mind is probably fairly closed. :-(
Good comment here:  http://www.scripting.com/2006/12/31.html#docSearlsWordsmith
&gt;Jesus answered her, "If you knew the gift of God, and who it is that is saying to you, "Give me a drink,' you would have asked him, and he would have given you living water." 11 The woman said to him, "Sir, you have no bucket, and the well is deep. Where do you get that living water?...15 The woman said to him, "Sir, give me this water, so that I may never be thirsty or have to keep coming here to draw water." 16 Jesus said to her, "Go, call your husband, and come back." (John 4:10-16) &gt;“Living water” in this context refers to semen, which literally is the liquid of life. As Christ indicates, drinking of the “living water” provides a spiritual replenishment for the soul. When the woman asks Jesus where she can get this “water”, he tells her to fetch her husband, clearly with the intention of instructing her on how to fellate him and swallow his semen.  Is this a standard interpretation of that verse? Any christians out there?
iTunes doesn't add high-quality ITMS artwork to MP3 tags because Apple are selfish, and for copyright issues. Here's how you can trick iTunes into doing so.
You're right. But I can't figure out how to change the title, having already made it.
Almost nothing in .eu is made in China. The trade between China is miniscule compared to the one between .us and China.
&gt; I simply don't see what's so wrong with this. [Hippocratic Oath](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hippocratic_Oath) anyone?
And in case that imageshack link breaks, here's a [backup](http://img356.imageshack.us/img356/8618/2007hooterscalendarit9kc7.jpg) And if the backup breaks, well, then you guys are too into hooters.
Of course, the countries in it also have a record second to none when it comes to subjugating it's wills onto the rest of the world as well.
[You should at least have included the link!](http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/magazine/3985113.stm)
Political murder isn't the same as death penalty.
Zing! ;)
Playing golf with his oil buddies during his impeachment.
Because they were *slaves*?  They were chattel, and never compensated for it, and surrounded by a hostile and sometimes violent white majority.
No longer taken by doctors.
Here you go: http://flyertalk.com/forum/showthread.php?t=640778 But that won't work for you unless you have an account and enough posts under your belt to participate in the sub-forum. Sorry.
"Name the logical phallacy"
Not the EU, dearie, the Brits.  Your best friends over here in Yurp, 'member?
Reminds me of Britney's Guide to Semiconductor Physics. http://britneyspears.ac/lasers.htm
Which is why I support the death penalty in principal. Cases like the Guildford four are why I oppose it in practice.
&gt; But screw facts, you are an MS fan! Actually, I'm a recently switched Mac user. I gave up on XP and bought a MacBook when they came out. I don't play video games, except on my little brother's Gamecube. But thanks for jumping to those conclusions and then accusing *me* of being Diggish. I don't have much of a response to the non-ad-hominem portion of your comment. My point had less to do with what's *right* on some higher plane of interoperability ethics and more to do with what made sense for Microsoft in designing the Xbox. (that they had an existing technology and a large base of programmers familiar with it.)
You've been able to draw straight lines by holding down the shift button for a very long time. It's just a crappy way to do it, and it's very difficult to find in the sparse documentation. You'd think that drawing a straight line would be the simplest thing in the world, but in GIMP it isn't.
I'm not sure, and not motivated enough to investigate further. But. If what we're talking about here is a standard HTTP proxy, there should be a way to determine the actual IP-address behind the proxy (via HTTP headers). Like those ['what's my IP' sites](http://www.whatismyip.com/) (try it via a proxy!) do. In that case, it is wikipedia's fault - a faulty technical solution for determining users' IP-addresses. If all traffic in the country is really channeled through one IP-address, then no luck, I guess. So ... what, Qatar is one big LAN?
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Jurij_Vega
Next he'll be helping out the geologists at the Grand Canyon with their carbon dating....
Human Rights are being ignored, and in many aspects of our socities, crimes are allowed.  This article should be made available for as many as posssible; we need to honor Human Rights, and let these be known and used. Mary Collins
Some people wouldn't recognize irony if it smacked them in the face.  Papist.
Bush has always had a thing about funerals, he almost never attends them.  I don't think it has anything to do with politics or lack of class, I think he just plain hates funerals.
That is definitely NOT the normal interpretation of that verse. I've looked through this site, and most of the biblical references they cite are either completely misinterpreted or taken completely out of context.  Christ was asking her to call her husband so that he might hear the good news as well, that he might share of the "living water" too. The "Living Water" refers to Jesus - living water is a symbolical way that Jesus referred to the new life possible in Him. It is NOT at all literal.
Marvin Bush blew up the WTC?!  The things you learn!
If the religious could find in themselves to stop being intolerant (ahem, like Jesus supposedly asked the faithful) and stop being stupid (believing that Genesis is a factual representation of the beginnings of humanity rather than just a creation myth) we'd have no argument. You started it.
Do we have a new Godwin phrase?
Oh good, so it turns out OCaml is reasonably competitive with C++ in speed after all. I was afraid I was going to have to face the fact that my pet obscure language isn't a silver bullet that will revolutionize software, cure cancer and sprout puppies and rainbows whenever you utter the word "functor"! :( Programming redditors, I'm looking forward to another year of my favorite technologies languishing in obscurity. Aren't you?
Medical tourism in Thailand seems like a pretty attractive alternative to going broke on doctor bills in the States..  Hmmm..  Sunshine...
Hitler was never democratically elected. He was appointed by president Hindenburg who was blackmailed to do so.
I hated the film though, which arrived at the directly opposite conclusion from the point which Sagan was making. Contact and I, Robot are my two least favorite sci-fi films for this reason.
What have 'poorly heated houses' got to do with it?
Try Krita -- http://www.koffice.org/krita/ &gt;Krita is a painting and image editing application for KOffice. Krita is part of KOffice since version 1.4. Krita contains both ease-of-use and fun features like guided painting (never before has it been so easy to airbrush a straight line!) and high-end features like support for 16 bit images, CMYK, L*a*b and even OpenEXR HDR images.
gotta love what seems to be a norfolk terrier (about 15lb dog) chasing the tiger away... although if these cats are 700lbs or so as wikipedia claims, then  its probably a 50lb dog... but still... surprising interaction.
It looks like daddy likes it much more the the kid.
pardon? *.........digits of pi that you'd need is only 50.* *Mathematicians.* No, sorry I don't understand.
Not so very shocking
Interesting, as officers I figured that they would have the right to release the code as they see fit. Can you imagine if the CEO of IBM or Novell has to sign-off on every open source release?
You can't ban users by "special access keys" because then they will just get a new one.
I gather one way is to work out the area of a square that will  fit inside the circle, then fill the remaining areas with squares that will fit inside those, add the areas to the total, and keep going, getting a more and more accurate figure for the area. PI is then worked out using the known radius of the circle.
Oh yeah, she wouldn't look at you twice. I guess that makes most of the world lesbian too.
tiger seemed in a playful mood
&gt; Avoid social news websites (such as digg) at all cost.  Yea, that is the first thing that goes on my busy days. Problem is they are so damn addictive.
No person I know likes or enjoys a funeral. We attend them, not for ourselves, but to show respect for the dead and to support the survivors.
Is it just me, or does the heating of the building in which PI calcs are done only seem tangentially relevant?
I break all my projects into small tasks. Except research, which you never know how long will take, I plan all of my tasks to take one hour or less. That way I not only can ease into my working day, I can always give a decent estimate.
heh! perhaps the rulers and circles contract in the cold...?
Could be. I'm sure we've all seen it by now, but have you seen the [map of the internet](http://xkcd.com/c195.html)? Remember that non-US or EU are drastically underrepresented in IP space.
fake.  This is a spoof.  I didn't read it all but, " Not only that, but oral sex has benefits that are of particular importance to Christians: oral sex allows the natural prevention of unwanted pregnancy and is an alternative to premarital intercourse for those committed to preserving their chastity before marriage. "   ok I was raised religious and NO religious person would seriously make this argument.  Not unless they are a horny teenager.  But no official organization would publicly declare this to be their christian-endorsed position.
Wow, who could have thought he can do that?! He was so anti-capitalist, anti-Bush, so cute, so left and fluffy and likable by your average reddit armchair politician!
A lot depends on your work environment. I work in an IT department, not a software shop. So when the company needs software for a new line of business or contract, we have to work our tails off. But when we finish, there is often a long lag time until the next project. This kind of feast or famine makes it hard to run full speed all the time. After a week or so of 6 hour days spent reading news sites, going back to doing 9 to 10 hour hard coding days can be hard.  Still, I love working 40/week on average instead of 40/week minimum. 
The constract between a light font and a dark background is easier for most people to read. The problem is a lot of people misunderstand and choose a dark font with a slightly darker background.
Legal Service India,Law, Lawyers and Legal Resources Indian lawyers Indian law firms  An Excellent Portal on Indian legal services providing free Consultancy services through out India provided by thousands of lawyers and law firms around the Country. This legal website has also a huge storage of legal information on Law related to Indian Courts Cyber laws Constitution insurance consumer protection foreign trade laws Copyrights Divorce Forms Articles Arbitration Court Room Humour News Dictionary Famous Cases colleges Trade Mark Court Calendars Great Personalities bare acts and statutes Marriage Visas Wills case laws sexual harassment in india
Seems this is less about open-source than about some  disagreement among the management team.
I think "Tadlet" is an anonymized name for the kid, but I'm not sure.
Okay, I may sound like a cold-hearted jerk here... but: If 20 billion were to be found someplace, it should go the the poor in the US. Africa is one vast sink-hole. We take money from the poor here in the United States, and give it to the rich in Africa.
I think the point is, you can justify pretty much anything by using quotes from the Bible.
Niccce.
It's sad, but introduced non-native species can wreck havoc on an ecosystem.
My university has everybody surfing through a proxy server and the only protocols you are allowed to use are HTTP(S), E-mails (that basically may not contain attachments, or they get bounced) and MSN Messenger. This is very nice for those of us that wish to use dangerous stuff like SSH, SVN or SCP. God forbid we get work done easily! It seems proxy servers are always an indication of network policy suckage.
Where does this notion arise that everyone must be compensated for past wrongs committed to their race/group?   I'm sure my ancestors were probably serfs or otherwise exploited somewhere in Europe.  I'm not running around looking for reparations.
A Muslim child?  Don't let Richard Dawkins hear you say that. ;-)  As he often points out, a child of Muslim parents is not a Muslim child until he or she makes a conscious decision to accept their faith.
You spelled 'Zenyatta Mondatta' wrong.  No, wait, that's the Police grammar police.
Kiva Rocks. Loan it up!
&gt; We take money from the poor here in the United States, and give it to the rich in Africa. Robin Hood must be spinning in his grave...
Are you saying that death penalty reduces violent crime? Or that the two are inversely correlated?
...or kill
How about a cut and paste of the relevant details?  Pretty please?
You might recall this story (http://preview.tinyurl.com/oa9th) - I think it was in reddit earlier but I couldn't find it.  Be sure to check the archived comments.
It's not just a matter of removing the region lock, the hardware has to handle conversion between PAL and NTSC too, which, while being trivial to do, is not handled by most DVD players bought in North America.
Oh dear - I think I will disable my Gmail notifier extension in Firefox until this is fixed!
ful dobr
[Issue 1: Pattern Matching](http://pupeno.com/publications/erlang-network-programming-1.pdf/view) is here, although I had to use Google to find it (not listed under Publications or pupeno's author page).
A large number of visitors may come to Niagara Falls and surround hotels throughout the year, but the biggest turnout is during the summer months.
Well, actually, when the country is doing something that's clearly dumb (proxying through only a single IP for example), they can expect the country to fix itself.
here's the link and more pics http://go.to/Vigeland/
Your network admins need to be taken outside and shot. I can understand blocking most protocols coming in, but blocking outgoing SSH is just nuts. Also, your network admins need to get their head around the idea that they are there to make users lives easier. If they don't have the manpower to manage a non-locked down network, they need to work it out with the university administration, but I'm a little skeptical that that is the case. 
Revolution.  Only in revolution.
January 1, NOT April 1....
She looked beter then.
Nice spam!
The version in Debian probably doesn't have source code, as it was probably released before they open-sourced it.
How come 36 people voted on it at IMDB?  http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0429277/
I think a more interesting viewpoint on this matter is Eben Moglen's. I like his catchphrase for it: broadcasting is unconstitutional. With smart radio advancing quickly, soon a case will be possible to argue that freedom of speech and the fact the people own the spectrum are incompatible with broadcast media over EM. 
After 50 years, I will be dead or too old to enjoy it.
It doesn't look like anyone's mentioned it here yet, but it's worth noting that Qataris who create a Wikipedia account and log in with it can still edit normally. The ban only applies to anonymous edits. The *user* "82.148.97.69" has been banned, not the IP address itself.
But MS will continue this practice until they begin losing market share to installations like this.  MS gets away with it because we're so used to dealing with it that it has become the accepted.
I think the title refers to the fact that "technology isolation syndrome" was a term invented by the bbc, and wasn't found in the research it was based on, which didn't refer to technology or isolation or, umm, syndrome(s). cake, its a made up drug.
Misleading title. There are two funerals, and Bush is going to one of them.
Ahem, observable universe?
&gt; Why are medical treatment so expensive? I wouldn't be surprised if it is all labor costs and hospital margins. Since when is life less important than a extremely cozy lifestyle? alas, not so. especially in today's increasingly litigious society, doctors, practices, and hospitals have tremendous insurance costs of their own (malpractice). As well, many people think that "once a doctor, always a doctor." In reality, doctors must undergo periodic recertification; in many jurisdictions, this involves taking time off away from the practice to study, as the recertification can often include cutting edge techniques and treatments that the doctor may not yet be aware of. I have a close family friend who's an anesthesiologist. He lives very comfortably, to be sure, but he has a tremendous daily liability hanging over his head. A single mistake, even a very small one, can potentially end his career. Sure, he has malpractice insurance, but a significant judgement against him can leave him with a premium increase sufficient to put him out of business several times over. Out of curiosity, do you work a job with such dire consequences to both your customer and yourself, in case of error? Given the current litigation environment, I think it's only fair to pay these people handsomely to do something so important that we are, none-the-less, completely willing to rip away from them on a moment's notice.
yeah the dog is the story here
&gt; In reality, doctors must undergo periodic recertification; in many jurisdictions, this involves taking time off away from the practice to study, as the recertification can often include cutting edge techniques and treatments that the doctor may not yet be aware of. The point I failed to address here is that this recertification is expensive, mostly because they must make enough money in the time that they're actively working to subsidize their living expenses in the months they're studying, etc. Do you make enough money now to take three months off, completely unpaid, every couple of years, without any financial hardship? I sure don't...
It's worth noting that Qataris cannot create Wikipedia accounts using the 82.148.97.69 IP address (which is the only one they have). Edit: *could not*
which would be great... if we lived in a Democracy. Which we don't. Federal Democratic Republic, baby. Very, *very* different from a Democracy.
I tried to research this quickly on my own and didn't find much.  The NAACP has minor mentions of [aid to Africa](http://www.naacp.org/advocacy/international/) and even on that page it's hard to grok exactly what their position is on sending US public funds/services. My curiousity is piqued now, too, because the last article I read on the issue written by an African ex-pat was [this one](http://reddit.com/info/s9fe/comments).
You can read all about it here: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Luis_Tasc%C3%B3n
Reddit really needs a report user button against spammers like ravenous. He is posting one of his shitty links in each comment for weeks now.
Hey, here's an idea - why don't you stop forcing primitive religion down children's throats?
Agreed.  See my other comments in this thread and contribute if you'd like :)
Is this a problem?
I bought a disk recently (from HMV, not from Best Buy). It wouldn't work. I took it back. I asked what was going on. They told me 'oh, the new copy protection on some CD's won't work with older players, buy a new player.' I said 'I want my money back.' They said 'no.' I said 'Implicit in the sale of a CD is the idea that it will WORK as a CD. This doesn't work as a CD, you just said so. Would you like me to call the fraud office of the RCMP and the Better Business Bureau?' They said 'uh, okay, here is your money back.' I haven't bought a CD from that particular music vendor (ie. production company, not the store) since, nor do I plan to. Don't confuse buyers remorse for a product that has so much spyware and anticopypro on it that it won't run on a high end CD player.
India's prolific Hindi movie industry, popularly known as Bollywood, recovered from a long slump in 2006. Not only did the industry produce a series of big hits, but market avenues such as Internet and television also began contributing more money to the trade.
Anyone mentioned that the IP presented is just "ONE" of Qatar's ISP? This means that the message here is nonsense. Not the whole country was blocked, but just a single IP from the only ISP in Qatar. Even according to IPv4 Qatar has "more" then ONE SINGLE IP. ;) I wonder how people can share such silly hoax.
caryle, nice linkspamming. I'd hardly call it erotic, by the way... vulgar and boring is more accurate.
I can so. It's part of...
... rhetoric ...
... though sometimes overdone :&lt;)
And that's for an anesthesiologist.  Try being a pediatrician or a family practice doc where the salaries aren't set for you by a hospital.  Is there any other profession with the same time investment (at least 7 years) and monetary investment (200,000 dollars in most cases)?  I agree that some medical costs are too high but if people feel doctors are overpaid, please enlighten me as to how much they should be paid.
Goodbye, daily newspapers! Should have done something other than reprint the AP wire and run car ads!
That's an abridged dictionary. *Webster's Unabridged Encyclopedic Dictionary, 1957* atheism: Disbelief in the existence of God; the state of godlessness. Atheism: unbelief in or denial of God or any supernaturalism; to ancient Greek it meant denial and lack of recognition of state gods. In 18th cent. it was a protest against religious hypocrisy; in 19th cent. it was any system not recognizing the idea of a personal Creator or any one supreme being. It sees marter, not spirit, as sole universal principle; its history one of opposition. Term often loosely used in referring to agnostics who neither deny nor admit the existence of God, or in regard to others who disagree with current theological doctrine. agnostic: One who, while he does not deny the existence of God, believes there is no proof of a Supreme Being; sometimes confused with atheist. agnosticism: 1. The doctrine that nothing is known or knowable of the origin or nature of the universe or its creator, except the physical manifestations of phenomena, neither accepting nor rejecting a Deity with supernatural power. 2. Any doctrine which maintains that matters generally accepted as knowledge are problematical, since all are related and trace to a common unknown source. disbelief: lack of belief, unbelief. Unlike most dictionaries, this one traces the course of how the term "atheism" has been used over the centuries, leading us to the more modern usage which incorporates anything which simply does not bother believing in any gods. *Funk &amp; Wagnalls Standard Desk Dictgionary, 1980* atheist: one who denies or disbelieves in the existence of God. agnosticism: The doctrine and philosophical theory that man cannot know God, first truths, or anything beyond material phenomena. theism: Belief in, or in the existence of, God, a god, or gods. disbelief: Lack of belief *Oxford English Dictionary* atheism: (from Greek atheos, "without God, denying God") Disbelief in, or denial of, the existence of a God. Also, Disregard of duty to God, godlessness (practical atheism). agnostic: (from Greek agnostos, "unknowing, unknown, unknowable") One who holds that the existence of anything beyond and behind material phenomena is unknown and, so far as can be judged, unknowable, and especially that a First Cause and an unseen world are subjects of which we know nothing. [Suggested by Prof. Huxley at a party held previous to the formation of the now defunct Metaphysical Society, at Mr. James Knowles's house on Chapham Common, one evening in 1869, in my hearing. He took it from St. Paul's mention of the altar to 'the Unknown God.' R.H. Hutton in letter 13 May 1881] disbelieve: 1. trans. Not to believe or credit; to refuse credence to: a. a statement or (alleged) fact: To reject the reality of. (With simple object or object clause). b. a person making a statement. 2. absol. or intr. Whatley Commonpl. Bk. (1864) It is very evident that the opposite to credulity is scepticism, and that to disbelieve is to believe. 3. intr. with in.: Not to believe in; to have no faith in. disbeliever: One who disbelieves or refuses belief; an unbeliever. unbeliever: One who does not believe; spec. one who does not accept a particular religious belief, an infidel. *Webster's Third New International Dictionary, Unabridged* atheism: (from Greek atheos, "godless, not believing in the existence of gods) 1a: disbelief in the existence of God or any other deity b: the doctrine that there is neither God nor any other deity 2: godlessness esp. in conduct : ungodliness, wickedness. agnostic: (from Greek agnostos, "unknown, unknowable, not knowing) one who professes agnosticism; broadly: one who maintains a continuing doubt about the existence or knowability of a god or any ultimates &lt;~... came into my head as suggestively antithetic to the gnostic of church history who professed to know so much — T. H. Huxley&gt; agnosticism: 1a: the doctrine that the existence or nature of any ultimate reality is unknown and probbly unknowable or that any knowledge about matters of ultimate concern is impossible or improbable; specif: the doctrine that God or any first cause is unknown and probably unknowable. b: a doctrine affirming that the existence of a god is possible but denying that there are any sufficient reasons for holding either that he does or does not exist. disbelieve: vt to hold not to be true or real; reject or withhold belief in. ti to withhold or reject belief. unbeliever: 1: one that does not believe: an incredulous person : doubter, skeptic. 2: disbeliever, infidel. *Canadian Oxford Dictionary, 2001.* atheism: disbelief in the existence of God or gods. disbelief: 1. lack of belief 2. astonishment
Patience mixed with passion and this is the stunning result.
French do have sense of humour
Christians make only about 20% of the world's population. But 7 out 8 UN Sec Gens are Christians. Does that make sense?
Ok, I get it now: you guys are idiots. I can't believe "black people don't want to help Africans" just got 17 upmods.
Forgive them?
% bc -l scale=1000 4*a(1)   18 characters, What do I win?  :)
Actually, think that preaching abstinence will be quite good  for the people of Africa. No sex = no AIDS.
These seem really undistinguished.  Time would have been better to keep quiet if these where the best from a whole year.
Sounds like a publicity stunt to try to create a cult classic.
Well, this is what you can expect from a service still in BETA. : )
No, he's not implying that. He's implying that the woman probably wouldn't even notice racism until she's on the receiving end of it. 
Give a shit?
You're right, I had forgotten the particulars of Hitler's ascent to power. Still, he and his party managed to game the German democratic republic and gain almost complete control without breaking its laws by using clever politics, mass crowd control, and false-flag attacks.
I agree with you that everyone is more separated, at least in some cultures here in the US.  When my daughters tried to cut through two neighbors yards to get to their friends home, they were told they would probably "get shot" if they kept doing it.  I really didn't know if that was a threat or a warning, but instead of walking a short distance to see friends in another neighborhood, they had to walk over a mile to get there.  This being white kids in a white neighborhood.  Both of them have moved on to more integrated cities and have little trouble walking anyplace.
Very cool.  If I'm ever in Norway I would love to visit the park.
Someone probably cammed it.
The advice isn't exactly practical, BUT... If you are just out of college, say, and just got a job, NOW is the time to plan for retirement.  Resist the urge to blow your paychecks on stupidity.  Put 10% of your pay in a stock mutual fund and forget about it.  By the time you retire you'll have more money than you ever thought possible. By the way, if you don't understand this advice, investigate on your own until you do.  You won't regret it.
I'm an American who moved to China. And apparently, the "most live in North America" requirement did mean that I can't see this article (though it does sound like from the comments Europe can read it, so I don't know...) Anyway, I get the general idea from the comments. And I got to say, China is a good place for pirates. It's harder to get legal DVDs than illegal ones, the illegal ones come in nice packaging and are about $1.5 US each. And the DVD players here appear to be regionless. At least, the region 1 dvds here work, and my ones from the US work too, without having to crack open the machine. I just might bring back my dvd player in my luggage on my way back to the states in 6 months.  Also, I download all the TV shows that I am missing being gone. It seems like American TV just got better when I left, let me tell you. Anyway, I would gladly get them off of iTunes instead if they served China, though. I would much rather get legal stuff, if it was possible. But they make it so hard for us to do that, like blocking China because I guess there's too many pirates here.
Running photoshop under Wine is the worst idea. First of all, you still need a copy of Windows to run Wine. Second of all, it's emulation, it's not real code being executed, so guess what, it's frigging slow. And if you ever worked with large images (like medium format scans), you know how hard it is even under windows. Forget about Wine, it will only work for tiny images. For any real production work you need Windows+Photoshop or Mac+Photoshop.
Huh, that irritated someone.  They took the time to go click on all the down arrows next to my previous comments.  I guess that'll teach me...
Blodget should be in jail, not writing books.
"Whoops"
&gt; * speak in Spanish and quite a few restaurants and other such places will deny service..(remember all those "No English No Service" stickers) No ... what terrible city do you live in?
il mio commento per te
Noob! That would solve **nothing**!  You would have to manually clear your cache and cookies after each GMail session.  Fastmail.fm does not store your address book in the browser (tho it is easily exportable to many standard formats, including CSV and XML) and the cookie expires when the active window is closed.  Gmail's cookie never expires and when I log in at a friend's house, he accidentally logs into my email when trying to open his own.  That's just atrocious. GMail is **so** 2005.
Seems this might also be effective for beer, which is often pasteurized at some point for reasons similar to milk pasteurization.
Uh, isn't it the very definition of racism to blame one individual for the bad actions of other individuals that merely happen to look like her? This woman shouldn't have to suffer for other people's actions.
He's pretty much the only person in a position to help the situation, yet his actions have done nothing but make it worse. I can't justify a doctor holding an entire nation of people responsible for Israel though, and refusing to treat a woman in pain. I hope he loses his job.   
I might expect this in Blekinge (in Skåneland) where the ever so PC Swedes have been dumping many of their Muslim immigrants. Check [this](http://www.folketsnyheter.se/?sida=artikel&amp;aID=408) out.
torrent?
I don't think it's available in VHS or DVD format, at least, I can't find it on Amazon.
This guy clearly believes "Saying you're bored is a form of self-criticism."
The observable universe is expanding, too.  At approximately the rate of one light-year per year. ;-) Actually, despite my flippancy, the concept of 'size of the observable universe' can be a bit confusing.  I mean, if you were look to the very edge of the observable universe, what you are actually seeing is a part of the universe before it went through all that expansion, and so in effect was very small.  You just infer that by now it must be a very long way away.
Are you kidding? rm in Unix is a disaster constantlly occuring. As originally designed, wildards like * were sent to the program as a list of files so that the program couldn't really determine what the user wanted to do. Likewise the program couldn't prompt the user before he did something dangerous like "rm *". One of my favorite bits from the UNIX Haters Handbook &gt; Then there’s the story of the poor student who happened to have a file called “-r” in his home directory. As he wanted to remove all his non directory files (I presume) he typed:  &gt; % rm *  &gt; … And yes, it does remove everything except the beloved “-r” file…  I don't suppose they fixed that yet? 
You all have it confused, they didn't call 911 because he was asking for a refund... they called 911 because he bought a Tony Bennett CD.
seems like i just did.
You've got to be out of your mind. Every study involving abstinence programs has shown they DON'T WORK.
&gt; blocking outgoing SSH is just nuts Possibly not, because SSH's port forwarding feature allows insiders to "punch holes" through firewalls.
Performance my dear boy, performance. Throwing an exception is quite simply the worse way to control flow in a managed runtime like .NET or Java because it is really expensive. But we are not talking about throwing just one exception. We are talking about throwing an exception in every frame of the stack, which can be quite deep when using functional-style programming. 
&gt; And the dolts at the magazine are cheerful about it. I'm cheerful too -- it's better than being clubbed or tased.
malformed url
&gt; The only difference is that the compiler is doing the refactoring, not you. Yea, unless you care about runtime performance. Single exceptions are too expensive to be used for flow control in .NET or Java. Using an exception per stack frame is downright crazy. 
The miniature Executioner is a sweet cherry along with this set... though it makes me wonder how small Lego could get if I were to request, say, a Saturn V Booster Rocket to play with as well:  http://www.people.iup.edu/pnwm/comparison.gif Keep in mind, scale is vitally important.
That's not true.
&gt; A statically-type-checked language is essentially saying "I guarantee that something will be of type X IF something exists". A statically typed language also implicitly makes the promise that, as much as possible, the compiler and static analyzer has ensured the code is correct. While no language as of yet has fully fullfilled that promise without becoming totally useless in the real world, langauges like .NET and Java could get a lot closer. 
Nowadays, Pi is considered as a purely mathematically defined number.  So to calculate its value, you can just use one of the [many, many formulas](http://mathworld.wolfram.com/PiFormulas.html). I believe (but might be wrong) that in ancient times Pi had a physical, rather than mathematical, definition - the ratio of circumference to diameter of a circle.  Because the geometry of the universe was assumed to be Euclidean, the two are the same.  In other geometries, however, this is no longer necessarily the case, as was realised by Gauss. I think the story is that he wanted to do a measurement to check that the universe is Euclidean (and hence pi=pi) by measuring the angles in a triangle formed by distant mountains, and seeing if they added up to pi.  He was worried that everyone would think he was mad, though, so he secretly got an assistant to do it instead.  I don't know if this is true, but it's a nice tale. :)
Bummer. I always hated the lack of inner exceptions in the older versions of Java.
A very interesting article, but I find it is a little ... naive, or just that it bent over backwards to give the benefit of the doubt to Enron. It seems to ignore the possibility that most of the deals were intentionally obfuscated, which seems likely. You dodge the legal bullet of directly hiding information, but you make sure that no one can actually see the important stuff. And it almost worked. He further accepts the claim that it was so complicated that other upper level management couldn't understand it, which seems quite questionable. *Of course* they said that, or they would be being charged too. Do you really think a CEO say to a CFO "I don't understand what you're doing with all our money, but whatever, go ahead. Where do I have to sign?" They basically had no earnings, did shady/criminal accounting tricks, and tried to hide it, profited massively personally, and didn't fulfill their obligations to their shareholders. As judge, I might have let Skilling stay in a lower security jail, but the sentence sounds fitting to me.
+1 to you for catching her in a contradiction - good work! 
95% completed article
reddit != google
this article blew me away.  It applies so much to my life.  I was raised religious and felt that panic of having my whole worldview, my entire sense of security and stability, yes even my survival felt threatened when I started to realize that my religion's teachings didn't quite add up.  I ended up leaving my religion.  Now, I am dealing with another issue - my parents CANNOT accept me outside of the religion.  And their behavior towards me ever since has been so hypocritical and even bizarre, and I've had such a hard time understanding them or why they would treat me so badly.  What I've started to realize is what this article is explaining - it's not that they hate me or are angry at me, it's that who I am threatens their belief system.  I represent beliefs which are dangerous and threatening to them, and it's not that they stopped loving me or wanted to abandon me - no, it's that they ran in fear, for their own survival, away from ideas that threaten their beliefs.  This article explained all the thoughts and conclusions I've been coming to about why my parents have rejected me and acted so strangely and inconsistently, and explained it all in the most clear, straightforward, and simple way possible.  I am so excited to find this article here.
test
any links/proof for what you have just said?  what do you mean by most? why not all.. ?
Date on the article:  August 1, 2001 Funny to reflect on everything that's happened since then.
-1 Can't see anything about XP or Vista
does it count if I've biked by the road itself, even if I've never seen the movie? I remember thinking at the time that that road sign probably gets stolen pretty frequently :-)
Looks more like dark text on dark background to me...
I always thought my highschool teacher didn't know what he was talking about.
.. because it's his Daddy's enemy
Sounds like Gladwell might have a new book in here somewhere. This puzzles vs. mysteries theme fascinates me.
Neither cremated nor buried.  I prefer to be pickled.  Starting from right now.  Pröst!
An interesting counterpoint to my experiences contracting. I have seen many of the author's experiences also, but disagree on many of his points too. I suppose it comes down to the companies for whom you have worked. Here are a couple of links to alternate opinions:  http://www.c6software.com/Articles/whybeacontractor.aspx  http://www.c6software.com/Articles/contractorjobmarket.aspx 
Thanks for showing how to iterate over the list this way, but the point I was trying to make was that in this case, the c concept of incrementing a single variable as an index was not possible (under normal circumstances, at least). In your example, if I am understanding it correctly, forM_ is iterating through the list [0..2] and passing the value to the lamda. That's not the same as reassigning a value to i, is it?
That part of the article is a good troll - there's no way even a wacko believes that semen has spiritual qualities.  I found the Song of Solomon bit plausible though.
surreal humor beats the slow descent of a disco ball any day.
Not to mention it says nothing about bike riding.
How inexpensive are calls to "natively" implemented continuations?
that dog is incredible ! ahahah
The influence of radical Muslims is growing on the African Continent. I suspect that this would be the primary reason for increasing our influence there. I doubt that the Bush administration's motivation has much to do with humanitarian efforts. That being said, it's still a good thing, unless it's just aid in the form of consultants and guns.
"You can fool some of the people some of the time and all of the people some of the time, but you can't fool all of the people all of the time." --Abraham Lincoln Good quote Abe, but you left out one small detail. In a democracy, you only need fool enough people to hold a majority.
I imagine this guy got violent before they called 911--no manager wants the police in the store unless they need to be there.  My bet is that this guy was drunk/high and threatening employees or customers with violence while refusing to leave.
Interesting to see the digg-mentality at play again: &gt;Originally posted by legalbeagle:  &gt;Looks like you've been dugg! Lots more comments here...   &gt;http://www.digg.com/design/great_image_of_a_coffee_with_a_drop_of_milk_highspeed   &gt;Hi Matthew,   &gt;My first instinct is to join that site and get into the fray of things on the thread ;-) To tell some of them how wrong they are in their assumptions: It is not a stopped video clip, there are no backdrops, mirrors, umbrellas, no sound/photogate triggers etc.....and to tell them I'm not a "poor girl" because I use a Tamron 90 mm macro ;-))
I didn't know much of that so thanks. As it happens, all my cookies and cache are securely deleted every eight hours.
This is on my daughter and son in law's refrigerator... Hilarious!
Times Magazine has Wii Sports listed as #1 game of 2006.
http://winehq.com/site/myths &gt;Myth 1: "Wine is slow because it is an emulator"  Some people mean by that that Wine must emulate each processor instruction of the Windows application. This is plain wrong. As Wine's name says: "Wine Is Not an Emulator": Wine does not emulate the Intel x86 processor. &gt;Myth 4: "You need Windows anyway"  No. The goal of Wine is a full reimplementation of the Windows API which will make Windows unnecessary.  You can already run a lot of applications without having Windows installed. But you have to realize that because Wine is still far from completion many applications will indeed require Windows for some functionality that Wine does not yet provide itself. And it's not slow either, it can run modern 3D games at nearly the speed of Windows.
After asking said question, piloted airplane instantly falls, 120 killed
Yes, they can. Please see the link (inaccurately titled) "[Entire country of Qatar banned from editing wikipedia][banned]": [banned]: http://reddit.com/goto?id=wlt8 &gt; I have modified the block to allow account creation. This means that you'll be able to edit if you create an account and log in.
Missing the main funeral is tacky whether Pres. Bush likes funerals or not.  That being said, it would have been better to wait on publishing the critical interview(s) until Pres. Ford was actually buried. I wonder if he thought of that when he made that stipulation. Maybe he knew Bush would snub his funeral- in effect a parting shot.  I have great respect for President Ford, however I think the Reagan funeral set a bad precedent of closing everything Federal for the funeral. We already have New Year's and MLK day this month, and there IS work to be done.
OMFG!  30% of movie-goers are p1r4t3z!!!!!1!
Funny, but true?
Yes. You almost always can. Vandalism is usually crude and blatantly obvious, and so easily avoided. If you read the link, you would have seen that the nation of Qatar was blocked due to automatic censoring imposed by the country's one and only ISP. This is an instance of Wikipedia *working*, not failing.
sad
Whatever. If Paupa New Guinea can do it, so can we.
A DVD rip is out (Zyzzyx.Road.2005.DIRFIX.DVDRip.XviD-aAF), some probably saw that one.
Pieces by [several interesting people actually](http://www.worldchanging.com) - [Gil Friend](http://www.worldchanging.com/archives/005710.html) eg
Exactly. If all of Qatar really went through a single IP address, they could only have a maximum of 65535 simultaneous TCP connections.
The thing I missed from the list was to have a good set of automated tests.  That's what worked best for me so far.  When I don't know what to do next, I run the test suite.   Then if any of the tests fail, the next step is clear: fix it.   If the tests all pass, then often the next step is clear anyway:  write a test for a feature that hasn't been implemented yet. Writing a test is a lot easier to do than writing the feature would be. 
Scooter: exactly- it seems like this guy was actually gleeful about having the cops called on him.  I think Best Buy is a lousy company and I rarely shop there, but it doesn't seem likely that they'd call the cops on a person politely asking for his money to be returned.   And I don't understand the Violent Acres reference at the bottom- what does that annoying blog have to do with this?
Sorry, I shouldn't have added the closed-minded bit.  I saw red, my bad. &gt; Regardless, where does this belief come from? A viewpoint is not deluded simply because it comes from a non-authoritative source.  If a tramp on the street with no education told me the Einstein field equations, it wouldn't suddenly make me deluded for believing in general relativity.  Just because a source that some claim to be authoritative happens not to be so, it does not mean that it is false.  It can, simply, not be authoritative but still true. &gt; First and foremost, I was looking for beliefs held by the religious that specifically are not held by atheists. This is basically an impossible task, because atheism is only defined as a disbelief in God.  There are all sorts of philosophies on ethics and other matters that an atheist can have, and it is in principle possible for an atheist to believe we should act precisely as it says in some arbitrary holy book, the only caveat being that the holy book is not to be considered divine. You see articles like "top 10 myths about atheism" pop up on reddit, but they are misleading because they actually describe a *particular brand* of atheism (usually the one held by the author of the article).  To be precise they should be called something like "top ten myths about *my* atheism". The same can be said for religion.  Different religions (or different sects within a religion, etc) have some areas of overlap, but many other areas of disagreement.  The scientific backwardness of certain American Christians has almost nothing to do with the Bahai view of science being central to human understanding.  The jihad spirit *sometimes* associated with certain Muslims has nothing to do with Buddhism, and so on. I could list a bunch of viewpoints that *some* atheists hold which are clearly delusional.  Things like the healing power of crystals, or that no plane struck the WTC.  But that would be a bit dumb, and would not prove anything about atheists in general, because there is nothing in "believing that god doesn't exist" which implies anything about crystal therapy. &gt; Almost by definition atheists are required to be open minded. This is just false.  Atheists are, by definition, required to not believe in God, and that is all.  You are loosely describing science (or maybe agnosticism?), not atheism.  Some scientists are atheist, some aren't.  Some atheists are scientists, most aren't.  In all religions I've come across, there is nothing in the holy scripture (or whatever defining principles they adhere to) which says you should not do science. &gt; The religious can say "God did it". For any question of "why", the atheists (and anyone else, for that matter) can say "evolution did it - period", or "maxwells equations did it - period", or "the laws of physics did it", or "because the capitalists are trying to oppress the workers", or "because of his childhood", or "I don't give a shit", and leave it there.  Being atheist doesn't mean that you have an open mind, nor does it mean you're going to expend any brain capacity in trying to work anything out; it just means you don't believe in God.
What is the type of `tail` then?
Got a smile out of me too...thanks David...
There are often rather good polynomial time heuristics for approaching NP problems. The complexity class says more about how hard it is to find the perfect solution than it says about how hard it is to find a good one. Another issue with this sort of analysis is that complexity classes only apply for large enough problem sizes. Would humans do as good a job with a million vertices?
Just a guess - are you using a CRT display? It looks fine on my laptop, but very bad on low-contrast monitors. This is probably frustrating, and I apologize, but I haven't had time to finish the layout yet... and that isn't going to stop me from posting in the mean time :)
Now, imagine that this frat house that you're going to join had a millenia-long reputation for self-sacrifice of one sort or antoher, schooling, academic achievement and general scholarship, medical research and practical hospital and hospice care, charity, humility, hospitality, making *really* good beer, etc. etc. Would that be different? Monestaries are about service. Sometimes a rather rarified and abstract form of service (I don't personally believe that *lots of praying* does much for anyone but the prayer), but service non the less. Real frat houses are about: who knows what? Elitism? Self-indulgence and filth? Rape? Throwing people off the roof for the fun of it? See the difference? (Before anyone starts: I compress and exaggerate the reputations of each class of institution for rhetorical effect)
17 million children struggle to survive on India's urban streets. Some dance to survive. Video preview clip from www.tibetanphotoproject.com
They have *proven* that the ice core samples were 160 000 years old with a margin of error of 9%. Just because they cannot prove it with a 0% margin of error it doesn't mean they are 0% correct.
If this wasn't the BBC I'd have guessed it was a hoax or an **Onion** article. As things stand, it shows there are intelligent people in France who are tired of being held hostage to special interest groups who are opposed to sensible reform policies. Each time "they" hold a demonstration in the streets the government caves in and as a result France has an inordinately hard time accomplishing much needed reform.
Are you saying that denying someone birth control (something completely elective) is on the same lines of refusing to treat someone with a potentially life threatening infection?  Strep throat untreated can cause death if it becomes invasive.  If it wasn't strep throat (may not be determined on the first day of a quick strep test), it could have been some other potentially dangerous infection.
Impressive collection of information.  Great work. One thing I would recommend is an extensive section about maintenance.  Much of the cost of development is in maintenance--and many of the "new" systems are really old systems that fell apart after years of "tender care".  Developing an effective culture of maintenance (which must include both IT and business communities) would move us a long way toward being a more productive industry.
Seems very frugal to me.  I used to have the same kind of wine rack.   Just replaced it with a plain, pine wooden wine rack to put down in the basement.
"Woodward wanted to meet with Deep Throat .." That's the kind of phrase I didn't expect to see in a such publication lol.
"Times Reader runs on Microsoft’s new Windows Presentation Foundation (WPF), which is built into the new Vista operating system and is included in the .Net 3.0 Framework service pack for Windows XP. If you are using Windows XP, the installer application will first install Net 3.0 Framework, a process that takes about ten minutes, and then install Times Reader, a process that takes about two minutes."
Hard to take this guy seriously when he can't decide/choose/pick a word/phrase to use.
utile blog
Cringely again, bleh...we get it, Cringely, you own a lot of Microsoft's stock...keep polishing that turd...   
a hangover remedy brought to you by the Royal Society of Chemistry.
All the photos in this article seem to be lifted off of Flickr...I guess that's what Daily Buzzer is all about Use this link to see these photos in high res:  http://www.flickr.com/search/?q=monastery&amp;s=int
| I carry around all three builds, VLM, OEM and retail. Sounds like piracy to me.  Can you give us a list of your clients so that we can do the right thing and report them... 
I can't remember him showing any class ever... 
Normally the guy is an Apple fanboy but on this one he is mostly right ... also funny how his predictions for some years are normally coming around the middle of that year :)
Damn, I left my $100k for the initial investment in my other pants.
Can you download higher-res versions from the site? I'd like to make that a wallpaper.
Well, no source is 100% accurate all the time. But in relative terms, I consider Wikipedia to be as accurate as most other sources.  One journalist or acamedian did an experiment where they intentionally placed subtle errors on a number of documents, and was going to see how long it would take to correct. The presumption was that the intentionally seeded errors would be in place for months before being corrected, if corrected at all. What happened was that the errors were corrected within *hours* and the wiki admins detected which user had added the errors, which errors they were, and the user was warned to cut it out. That's what I mean by *works*. Google it your own damn self.
A university without uncensored access to the web isn't worth much in my book...
?
you understand that its the key that matters right?  relying on the customer to always have their install cd is begging for trouble.  however, the key is generally on a sticker on the side of the case.
&gt; Water boils at 212 degrees Fahrenheit.  The boiling point of water depends on surrounding air pressure. If you're boiling water at a higher (or lower) altitude, will you still be asserting the water is 100C because that's what you believe? So indeed, your example is a good one. Just because water is boiling, does in fact, not mean its surrounding environment is 100C / 212F. The only thing you prove is that you don't know what you're talking about yet don't trust the knowledge of others.
So, explain why you trust a thermometer.
The Onion has used that comedic paradigm before: Bush Regales Dinner Guests With Impromptu Oratory On Virgil's Minor Works http://www.theonion.com/content/node/28498
Would you care to elaborate some more on that?
Sure, hopefully it works out for them.  If all a customer will ever need is file storage, and maybe print sharing or other basic services, I see no need for anything more than a Snap server or chilibox type device.   In my experience though, it always starts out small with "file and print only", and within a couple months the customer is wanting to run ACCPAC or MAS200 which don't support linux servers.  Now they have to spend money again to readress the situation.
*drool* I want to go out and get one now!
This item is from June 12, 2005 see something a bit more current Bush has tripled aid to Africa  4:53 p.m. ET Dec 31, 2006  http://www.msnbc.msn.com/id/16412096/ Now consider how advantageous it is that we don't have to waste time raising money, rather the right person says so, and automatically everyones will be chipping in. I don't understand why we even bother with groups like the united way anymore.  Wasting time &amp; money on fund raising.   
Yeah this is true.  With the newer build that has SP2 slipstreamed into it, they took out a bunch of ranges that were leaked on the internet.
Eh, I live there, too bad I was away for the holidays. I would have participated for sure.
But that was my whole point. (cities in the middle east might get to decide that the act of not paying taxes on a car doesn't deserve the death penalty; that does not mean that after such a decision is made that country "is the only country in the world that allows its [cities] to decide about the death penalty for themselves".)
Jevgeni's comments are spot-on.  Scala has a lot of really neat, interesting features.  Problem is, they're all *sustaining* innovations, i.e. they benefit established developers at the high-end of the market the most.  Sustaining innovations never seem to result in a new product becoming dominant.  The market leader just copies the features, which is more cost-effective for the community at large than trying to convince everyone to switch. I do predict that we'll see many Scala features in Java 7 and 8, though. Interestingly, Haskell is in a similar position - a complex language with many sustaining innovations - but it has one major disruptive innovation.  Purity.  Now, the question is whether that can be leveraged in a way that makes it useful in some market that existing imperative languages can't reach.  My bets are on concurrency...
Religion and science are only antithetical in the mind. The lines between camps are artificial. Many of the dogmas of both religion and science are the constructs of adherents and should not be taken as proof of the fallacy of their respective approaches. As anyone who adheres successfully to both can tell you, they do not approach the same things. It is quite possible to accept the existence of God and the ages of the universe, the galaxy, the solar system and the planet if you take pronouncements from both sides with a grain of salt.
Half the versus on the site at taken literally and the other interpreted figuratively, so yay, all of it is a croc.
Continuation capture is a fairly infrequent operation in most languages that provide it, and it's often much more cost-effective to fast-path the function-calling case and let continuation capture take a while.  Typically, you'd use continuations as, say, the last step before a response is sent to a webserver or serialized to disk.  Your I/O overhead will swamp any exception overhead in that case. It'd suck if you're trying to do backtracking search or implement exceptions on top of continuations, though.
&gt; There are perfectly acceptable ways to get the same thing by refactoring the code into smaller functions and storing the values in a state object. In other words, manually CPS the code. Isn't the reason why we have compilers so that they can do the grunt work that programmers would otherwise have to?
I still read 2 newspapers a day, but I know I'm part of that dying breed.  At the same time, every paper has several articles that are interesting, important or both, that I wouldn't have come across otherwise.
Heh. Reminds me of [this](http://www.theonion.com/content/node/29660) from a few years ago.
The picture isn't even as rosey as that, for family practitioners, either. They take 7+ years of schooling, a few hundred thousand in debt, and go into a business where they *still* can't set their prices - the insurance companies do. In the economy set up by the low rates paid by insurance companies, most US family practitioners and pediatricians have to take on several hundred patients to make ends meet. I don't remember the exact numbers, but it turns out to be something like 3 or 4 times the "ideal" number of patients, leading to longer waiting times. We demand low cost health care, but then we demand immediate service and the best medicine available. These demands are mutually exclusive. By sticking to these demands, we're damaging all of the industries, doctors, and patients involved. edit:  and, I might add, most doctors *aren't* overpaid, or even well paid. A large number of specialists, surely, but these are mostly engaged in surgical activities (anesthetics, surgeons themselves, etc). Most go to school for half their lives and emerge saddled with overwhelming debt. A tremendous number elect to work low paying jobs in low income or low population density areas in the hopes of government-issued debt forgiveness. Your typical, generic, family practice/internalist/blah, leads a pretty typical American middle-class existence.
last image NSFW
This ignores debt. Generally you can get the best return by paying it down as fast as they will allow. (For most people their biggest debt would be their mortgage.) (Although if your lucky enough to live in a country where mortgages can count against tax it may be more complicated.)
&gt; Put 10% of your pay in a stock mutual fund and forget about it. For four separate 20 year periods in US equity history this approach would have lost you a lot of money. About once a month some article touting index funds makes the front page.  It always assumes average returns over the long term.  That's not how it works.  There are boom times and stagnant times.  We just finished the biggest 20 year bull market in world history.  Historical patterns would indicate an upcoming 15 year period of equity under performance and a mean reversion of P/Es. Rule #1 in investing, and life in general, is that there's no free lunch.  Anyone who tells you that parking money with them will most certainly turn you into a millionaire eventually is selling you a free lunch.
&gt; Macs are made for morons. Every supposed benefit of owning a Mac is something that isn't even an issue if you know your way around a computer. So if something is "good enough" then there can't exist anything better? &gt; The fact that my icons all look the same has yet to slow me down (mainly because I, y'know, alphabetize and go by the name rather than the graphic). Right, "good enough." It's not actively "slowing you down." But graphical variation would speed you up. You can pretend that your eyes and brain work differently than every other human's, but I don't think that makes it true...
It's the *Onion*, "America's *finest* news source."
Really? I was getting ready to sign the petition.
-1 meaningless blah blah blah
I'm still waiting to see buildings covered in holographic billboards like I've been reading about in sci-fi and cyberpunk novels for years.  I have to say I like this much more but I expect marketing space will be more likely in the future than this.
Story about a cat. BIG cat. Voted up.
CHEF - "It's a tiger, a fucking tiger!"
He was a research analyst for Merrill Lynch. But instead of being an independent, objective financial analyst, he was a shill, promoting stocks in public while calling them "piece of sh*t" companies in private. Here's part of a post-mortem editorial on this case: &gt; whenever an investment banking firm cynically pumps up a loser stock, capital is wasted. By that criterion, people such as Jack Grubman and Henry Blodgett were worse than common thieves. They decimated Wall Street's highest moral justification: the service of efficient capitalism. As we keep learning the hard way, efficient markets require tough regulators.  The rest of this editorial is here: http://www.businessweek.com/magazine/content/03_20/b3833047_mz007.htm You can also read some of his private emails here: http://www.consumerjusticegroup.com/mlemails.htm 
I vote for "q".
2008 stinks!
See also:  GrammerJack: I ported Dandy to F#  http://grammerjack.spaces.live.com/Blog/cns!F2629C772A178A7C!138.entry
Why is this being downmodded? While a lot of religious nutjobs post bullshit here on reddit, jesusphreak makes a valid point here.  What whoop is doing is no different from what the whackos in the comments for this article are doing. You people need to learn how to see the difference between individuals and the groups they belong to. **edit**  I don't believe it! Now *I'm* being downmodded too? I guess that'll teach me to stand up for freedom of speech, you fucking anti-religious fascists.
Bravo.  This is the definition of *having a sense of humor*.
I'd venture to guess that a significant number of "yes" responders are Catholic.  According to Catholic Tradition, Jesus really is substantially present at Mass; when the priest raises the wine and the cracker they *really* become Jesus Christ Himself. So, when someone asks a Catholic when Jesus is coming, he's likely to say "the next mass."   
Maybe there was good intentions working in the beginning but what even Chavez can't understand is that there is no ideal stable state for a society but instead it will always require active work. Everybody gets tired to the games that go on forever and in infinite new forms. If possible one will instinctively start shutting down avenues for such games and pretty soon the society will come down into a lockdown. Then most ruthless people will learn to play the strict rules best, speak the party line lingo, and eventually dominate the game. It's the same as going to the gym. Unless you work towards the pain treshold and at least slightly pass it you are not making progress, just worthless exercise. That slight right feel of discomfort is the mark of work in play.
I agree with the examples of what you shouldn't do with your money, but the 'Invest $100,000 in a low-cost equity index fund for 50 years.' ignores that this isn't as risk free as it first seems. The US stock market has done well over the last 100 years, but this success is due to a complex interaction of the micro and macroeconomical particularities that existed in america and not everywhere else.  Looking back, we can see how stockmarkets, free trade, low tax and all the rest of it led to a spectacular growth in wealth.  But hindsight is a wonderful thing - if you were looking to invest in 1900, how would you *know* what economic policies america was going to choose over the course of the next 50-100 years?  How would you know that it wasn't going to be Russia that actually implemented the good policies?  Without the experimental-economic results of the last 100 years, how would you even know what the good policies actually are? Today, you are left with the same sort of uncertainty: * Maybe america will continue to be the scientific powerhouse that led to huge productivity gains last century.  Or maybe this whole creationism and stem-cell vs. pro-life nonsense is an indicator that america will fall way behind South Korea (country pulled out of my arse) by 2050.   * Maybe the current corporate structure in america is the best one on offer, or maybe changing circumstances will make countries with german ones more efficient. * Maybe IP leads to more innovation, and america will do well.  Or maybe it ties researchers up in legal knots, resulting in china doing better. There is risk everywhere, so don't be fooled into believing predictions of 'risk free return extrapolated from historical averages'.
My laptop is equivalent, but running BSD. It's slow in both Firefox and Opera (and I've tested Opera's JavaScript before to be faster than in Firefox). I would test it in Konqueror, but I just get a blank page. It's also slow on my (still equivalent) Linux server. I am aware that it runs pretty smooth on Windows, not because I've tested this page in particular but because I do a lot of JavaScript and CSS development. In general, using static positioning and lots of JavaScript layout is a great way to make your site sluggish.
That's a good point about the anonymity of the internet facilitating conversation about incendiary topics.  For example, I have a strict social rule that I don't discuss politics, religion, or abortion with people that I care about staying friends with!  However I have engaged in debate about those topics on message boards because I didn't have to worry about the ramifications of making someone angry by my own (admittedly extreme) views on those topics.
It´s www.coolsciencefacts.com and not  www.LOOK-I-ARE-SAMRT.com
America decided that Bush was to be our leader, and we would follow.  Furthermore, Bush told us God told him to invade. So, to be against this war is to be against God and Country. If you are not an American, Bush has pointed pointed out, "You're either with us or against us in the fight against terror." Most importantly, check my sources before being too offended. sources:  http://www.google.com/search?hl=en&amp;lr=&amp;client=firefox-a&amp;channel=s&amp;rls=org.mozilla:en-US:official&amp;hs=WB7&amp;ie=UTF-8&amp;oe=UTF-8&amp;q=god+told+me+to+invade&amp;sa=N&amp;tab=nw http://archives.cnn.com/2001/US/11/06/gen.attack.on.terror/ http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Sarcasm
And that would be a very silly thing to allow for as well.
Which is exceedingly easy to do when the rest of the government is controlled by those sympathetic to your goals and the media is controlled by rich white men who are afraid to rock the boat and bite the hand that [69s them](http://www.garrettsocling.com/2007/01/01/the-new-york-times/).   
What exactly is Google using this script for?  If it's only used on their own site, couldn't they retrieve the information server-side?
65535 per target host.   The firewall can still map [remote-host, nat-port]-&gt;[local ip adress, actual port]
I'm still writing 20th Century on my checks.
Okay, thanks.
Depends on which technique you use: Representing the stack as a linked-list of frames gives very fast continuation capture (a pointer copy), fast continuation invocation (a pointer copy), and slow function calling (function calls require heap allocation, and need to be garbage collected).  This is used in Stackless Python, Rebol 1.0, and I think Ruby 1.0 and some Schemes (PLT?). Copying the stack on continuation capture gives slow continuation capture (all data on the stack must be copied), reasonably fast continuation restore as long as you have access to %esp/%ebp or their interpreter equivalents (you just reset the stack pointer), and fast (as C) function calling.  This is used by Guile, Gambit, and I think Bigloo. [Segmented stacks](http://www.cs.indiana.edu/~dyb/pubs/stack.pdf) give you fast continuation capture (the stack is sealed and a pointer to its top recorded in a continuation record), slower-but-bounded continuation reinstatement (the stack is split by walking backwards, then the top segment is copied), and reasonably fast function calling (additional overhead for checking for stack overflow/underflow, and possibly reinstating a continuation on underflow).  This is used in Chez Scheme, and is often considered the algorithm of choice as long as you have access to underlying machine code.  It doesn't play well with existing runtimes, though, since it requires that the stack be manipulated in detail. CPS conversion is a whole 'nother beast, and its performance depends a lot on how good the compiler is with closure allocation.  It *can* be fast - the Orbit Scheme compiler from the mid-80s was performance-competitive with the Pascal and C compilers of the day.  In particular, continuation capture/invocation is just a pointer copy.  If you don't have access to the underlying machine code (Chicken Scheme), CPS can suffer.  You have to pay the overhead for C's calling conventions on top of the CPS overhead.
Huh...I guess my negative comment was because I didn't agree with his analysis.  I agree Microsoft is trying to run up from behind to regain control of the action, but I don't agree that Microsoft necessarily is going to accomplish their mission of regaining their spot as our computer overlords in the coming decade.   I'm hoping competition and diversity flourish.   I don't agree with him saying "None of this means that Microsoft won't succeed in its real goal of maintaining PC market dominance."   I simply don't agree.  He is attempting to polish a turd, but that doesn't change the fact that it IS a turd.   If people submitted articles by Cringely that I didn't feel were simply trying to paint a fair light on a bad thing, I might like him too...
light travels at different speeds in different materials; measured by the index of refraction. Just FYI. (_highest_ is in vacuum).
"Huh, mathematicians, eh?"
Submitting my comment isn't automatic, that was my entire point.  If a site can have your browser read a page from another site you're logged into and submit information from it automatically, this seems like a much bigger problem than just Gmail.
Thanks to the combined effects of El Niño and global warming.
Too bad it's on a lowspeed website.
Great.  Then oil would be delivered like FEMA delivers.
Easy is bad!  It's the protestant work ethic, man! Yeah, I don't understand it either, yet like most of us I find myself thinking that way quite often...
For the latest GAA news check out http://www.15aside.com
Well implemented, there's only an exception for each *newly-captured* frame (plus dynamic state like dynamic-wind or specials). EDIT: So, for an exhaustive search, you'd only throw an exception for each step in the final solution.
" I didn't attend the funeral, but I sent a nice letter saying I approved of it."  --Mark Twain
And who is paying the expenses? And what are these expenses adding up to? Don't forget the cost of shutting down the government for a day?
CPS also has the disadvantage of completely ignoring normal call/return rules, so not only are you paying for the calling convention, but you also don't take advantage of the CPU's branch prediction on returns.
First of all, everyone have a great 2007 and may I hope you can enjoy all these new babe pictures!
You gave me an aha-moment :)
Indexing starting with one would only make sense if one was the origin on the number line.
Non-attachment, as far as I can tell, simply means that thinking of relationships in unrealistic terms of 'between yourself and an object outside of your self' can cause suffering if the relationship ends in a way that feels premature.  Doesn't matter if this relationship is between people or a person and an inanimate object:  the need and desire are unrealistic considering the impermanent nature of physical objects, and that the goal of non-attachment is simply the realization that you do not need to suffer the loss of things you care for.   It certainly doesn't mean you shouldn't love and be loves at all, it simply means keep the proper perspective and realize that since all things are interconnected on every level, your relationship with another object in space doens't EVER end...the ripples across the pond change the pond for eternity. It DOES NOT mean leave your family.  like I wrote in my comment below, one of the central ideas in Buddhism is that you should NOT accept anything which doesn't ring true in your self.  YOU create the Buddhism that you accept in your life.  Many people practice Buddhism in their lives without ever knowing that such a thing exists simply by trying to be the best person they can and having a healthy attitude towards existance.   The collected writings, teachings, books, etc etc are simply different ways of attempting the same thing: helping people be better. It would be best if people didn't bother reading about the life of the historical Buddha because it fosters the misconception that HE and HIS LIFE are somehow the story...they are not.  YOU are the story, Buddhism and the teachings are simply a tool for you to improve your life. Take 'Buddha in Your Rearview Mirror' by Woody Hochswender.  The Japanese variant of Buddhism explained in there is ideal for those looking for a mystical flavor as the central component is a worshiping tool which helps you focus during chanting on the things in life you want to improve (a terribly simplified explanation, I apologize). Now, take Buddhism Plain and Simple by Steve Hagen.  This is probably as 180 degrees away from the Nichiren school of thought as possible, but both ARE Buddhism.  The flavor described by Hagen strips away all of the mumbo jumbo and replaces it with simply english and frank discriptions.  It is a rather Zen Buddhism which eschews ritual and chanting for quiet introspection...more of the 'proto-psychologist' less of the Tibetan-style ritual. I heartily recommend you check both books out of your local library.  Both are easy and short reads, and both can really open your eyes to how wide of a concept Buddhism really is! The more I think of it, the more it burns me up, the complete shit that the linked article truly is...what an asshole...   
I like his earlier posts also.
Caligula was filmed in the late 70s. It had a $20 million budget and took 4 years to make. It starred well-known actors like Malcolm McDowell (A Clockwork Orange, Wing Commander) and Peter O'Toole (Lawrence of Arabia), yet it featured real, unsimulated sex scenes such as orgies, watersports, incest and more. The world was not ready for it at the time, and it was quickly buried...
errr... this sounds so much cooler. Really it's just 2d tetris with nice graphics. Last time I checked 3d implies 3 dimensional movement (see old N64 games for more info).
Check out the [trailer](http://www.leogrilloproductions.com/zyzzyx1.htm). Looks like it only to $30 to make, so I guess it broke even.
100% certain those 25% would be the ones to crucify him if he really did.
That was a lot easier when they preprinted the dates in the form "______, 19___". 
&gt; ...to be able to serve his time at a lower facility. Just a ten-month reduction in sentence . . .” &gt; It was a plea for leniency. Skilling wasn’t a murderer or a rapist. He was a pillar of the Houston community, and a small adjustment in his sentence would keep him from spending the rest of his life among hardened criminals... Malcolm Gladwell wrote that he wasn't a murderer or a rapist...he is right, those people typically only ruin one life, or a handful of lives...   
agreed...I'm surprised that a real 3D tetris isn't made, or is it?
My plea for Google to create a To-Do list.
How is Cringely ever "an Apple fanboy"? He's a nutcase. Neither "Apple fanboys" nor anyone else appreciate him, nor should they.
So what's the best hedge, for your average investor? It's not the first time there have been big periods of uncertainty.  The great depression, WWII, doubts about the Russians and the cold war...
&gt; I don't think it has anything to do with politics or lack of class, I think he just plain hates funerals. Nobody enjoys funerals.  People with class go anyway. 
imageshack links should be banned from reddit.
They're French!  Protesting is their national sport.
Eritrea accused the United States on Monday of being behind the war in Somalia, but said Washington could never thwart the will of the Somali people.
And that's where you're wrong.  I love myself.  I don't love the things that other people have come to associate with me based on my skin color.   One more thing:  don't be the pot calling the kettle black.
couldn't find anyway better to make fun of God's words ... haha
Looks like The Emporer is not pleased with Ford's comments about him.
Gaso, I have to agree with you that the gist of this article is turd pollishing. When an author cites some negatives and yet come out positive, especially with the supporting logic of "because all the big manufacturers can't be wrong, they really want to screw their own consumers- it's the American way" and the "common techies, admit it,  you love to beat your wives too.", as your main arguments you are doing the old lipstick on a pig shuffle. Cringley, who at least had the honesty to admit he has been involved in the development of a tech innovation in hard drive storage that is on the wrong side of the coming flash ram revolution change-over, has every reason to want the DRM overlords to advance their agenda. As an oem looking for bigger partners it is to his advantage, to keep the long term tech planning cycles in place. Cringley's tech investment after all isn't so much a disrupter as a continuer of existing trends. However the real techies are out on the disruptive end of the cycle, because that's really where all the fun is anyway.   Cringley's problem he's a commentator who wants to be a VC- conflict of interest big time.
It's genius is what it is. At 30, am I too old for Lego...?
&gt; Zed Shaw introduced an amazingly powerful rhetorical device at RubyConf 2006.  It was the "That Guy" device.  Zed created a phantom "That Guy" who makes a series of comments in response to Zed's claims and statements.  I'm going to use "That Guy" to discuss SwS. I'd just like to point out that that "amazingly powerful" rhetorical device "introduced" by Zed Shaw is at least as old as the time of [Galileo](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Dialogue_Concerning_the_Two_Chief_World_Systems)...
&gt; If a site can have your browser read a page from another site They can't.  What they *can* do, however, is load *JavaScript* from another site.  Because JSON is JavaScript, by default, any old website can read JSON data from another site.
What do you mean it won't change the world?  We have to keep our spirits up until our demands our met!
If the United States was forced to proxy through a single IP, I wonder which would produce more vandalism then?  If you're going to block an entire country, why not do it indiscriminately with respect to their ISP's configuration?
http://www.fastmail.fm/  Cost me $40/year but that's a bargain!  Awesome skinnable interfac, POP3+IMAP+SSL support, syncs w/ GMail, YMail, POP3, IMAP, etc etc etc.  Allows you to *effortlessly* archive your folders of mail into zip or tar.gz.  1000 MB of filesharing w/ yourself and people in your friends' list, AJAX calendar, notepad, etc, etc etc. and don't EVEN get me started on the AWESOME advanced search and *sorting* features! Why are you using GMail when you can't even sort by sent date????  Or edit your message in raw HTML if you wanted?  Or embed pics to non-technical friends?  Hell, why are you stuck w/ their mostly-flat address book that can't be imported or exported very well??  With your 1 GB of file space, you can also have them host your own friggin domain on it. GMail *sucks* compared to fastmail. *[downmod my non-spam, no incentive message again!  it's full of info you wouldn't know and offers an alternative to GMail's insecurity, with lots of additional features.]*
Well, the trick would be to not be lighting the same things with them. Point the halogen spots at the ceilings and countertops, and aim the LEDs at the cupboard door faces, and walls. Good lighting is all about contrasts. If the bright spots were washing out every surface in the place, that would be pretty sucky regardless of whether it was paint or LEDs attempting to provide the colour.
While GC time can be proportional to heap size, there is another factor which the authors seem to discount: generational copying GC is excellent at arranging data for best locality. The authors try to argue that explicit memory management has the advantage with respect to locality "because it can recycle immediately freed objects."  That's not a particularly satisfying explanation considering the easy fragmentation to which that leads.  I'm puzzled that the authors could argue that but ignore the amazingly fast allocation and packing which generational copying collectors perform. Anecdotally, I've observed this in quite startling effect.   Tweaking the size of newspace in ghc with a sizeable application, I noticed the proportionality of heap-size to GC time, as the authors note.   But I also noticed that setting the newspace to be equal to the onboard cache size (2MB, Xeon) caused the relative GC time to go up *but the entire program ran twice as fast*. The allocation patterns of a functional programming language  (tons of short-lived objects) tend to be different from that of an imperative language such as Java, so that may not be the best comparison.  Also, FP languages have an advantage wrt GC since old objects cannot point to new ones. 
Compensation?  They should have been compensated during reconstruction, but they were sold a pup by the whites, of course.   Understanding might be a good start.
I fully agree.  If the disc doesn't work because of copy protection, you should get your money back.  I don't think this post mentioned copy protection.  It was presented as a defective disc...which happens all the time...and is not grounds for getting your money back.
http://antiwar.com/justin/?articleid=10238
&gt;*Speak in Arabic and you will be kicked out of airplanes inspite of going through all the extra "random" security check at the airport. Where did you get this from? The Imams denied access to a plane in Phoenix, that were acting like terrorists (just look at the [crew/passenger's observations](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Flying_Imams_controversy#Suspicious_behavior)), possibly on purpose? &gt;*Speak in Spanish and quite a few restaurants and other such places will deny service..(remember all those "No English No Service" stickers) What's wrong with that? If a restaurant makes enough money by offering their service in English, they really don't need to go to the effort of making everything bilingual. &gt;*Doctors and Pharmacist deny service related to Birth Control(and abortion) on personal religious beliefs all the time.. I get the feeling that most doctors and pharmacists went into their profession to *help* people, not kill them. There's even a special medical clause that lets them deny services like that, based on reasons such as religion.
wouldn't be surprised to hear you are one too
as if atheists aren't as fucking stupid as religious morons, you humans are all the same fucking shit, stupid creations.
No sex also equals no children. If only fundies would abstain a little more.
Today was the scariest day of my life, when I witness my father having a heart attack, for the second time. The first one was not as bad as this...
More cats.
Just buy a multi-region player... Cost of Box Set - 60.  Cost of multi-region player - 17.99 from Tesco. Not too hard a decision to make really is it. 
90% of the answer is this: Imagine a wodden board, mostly level to the ground but tilted up. Now imagine that board bing pushed rapidly forward, with the raised end in front. What's going to happen? The rusing air under the rasied end will push that end up even further, flipping the board over. But suppose the board was prevented from rotaring. Now the air is going to push the hwhole board higher. Airplane wings are 90% just fancy boards. And they're prevented from rotating mostly by the mass of the plane that they're attached to. All that stuff about air travelling faster over the wing than under it is just details; important details if you're an engineer, to be sure, but deatils that get in the way of seeing the basics.
Scratch pad of rants, raves and insights into brand strategy, development, marketing, pr.
Did you RTFA?
Why can't Microsoft just update their install CDs by downloads on their website, for example remove that stupid requirement for a floppy drive that is probably the main reason floppy drives are still around? Shouldn't be too hard if the key is the only thing that matters.
&gt; what's the best hedge, for your average investor? Here's my recommendation: * 1/4th diversified equities, and no, the SP500 is not diversified.  * 1/4th bonds, both private and sovereign.  * 1/4rd precious metals.  Maybe even go so far as to keep some gold coins in a safety deposit.  * 1/4th cash. Some land probably wouldn't hurt the mix. The portfolio must be further diversified internationally.  You should keep at least a third entirely outside the reach of your government and denominated in a foreign currency.
Yes. I think they didn't emphasize the extent to which one is more important than the other. And, I suspect not everyone will read the article.
Haven't we seen these velcro close ups before? They are still popular obviously but they are not new.
You expect me to watch a 64 minute long film based on your description?  Go fuck yourself, but first, tell me what the fuck it is.
By [throwing frozen hot dogs](http://www.wikihow.com/Calculate-Pi-by-Throwing-Frozen-Hot-Dogs).
When the hell are the recursion police going to show up?
Quite nice IDE, I was waiting for the PHP support (at milestone 9 I beleive)
http://www.squidoo.com/ashokartgallery
Why, this is retarded.  Numbering should start at whatever value that makes it simplest to express algorithms.  And that number is usually zero.  (One exception to this rule of thumb is heaps.)
I submitted a comment on his site, but I'll submit it here to because it's really a better way to debug javascript:   I struggled a long time with that question, my final tough was to write something similar, but Firebug 1.0 beta came out and saved the day. Really, take my word, those next line will change your debugging life forever; // If firebug isn’t present just do nothing. if(typeof console != ‘object’) { console = {}; console.log = function(){return false;}; } window.onload = function() { console.log(’The windows has been loaded !’, window); }   And guess what ? because “window” has been passed as second parameter and is an object, it will be displayed as a clickable link which allow you to browse the window object and change propreties .. live :) And it’s only one of the many cool features of firebug, really you need nothing else. Cheers
Even though Coq and Epigram use very similar underlying lambda calculi, they are quite different applications: Coq is a proof assistant, and Epigram is a programming language.  In Coq, the focus is on proving theorems, and the way you do that is by treating a proposition as a type, and a proof as a lambda term of that type. Since what you care about is provability, the specific lambda term you find (ie, the specific program) is not that important. As long as you can find it, it's good. For example, if you want to prove that lists can be sorted, any sorting algorithm and correctness proof will do -- a bubble sort and quick sort are just as good. As a result, most of the work you do in Coq is using and writing programs (tactics) that automate searching for lambda terms well-typed in the calculus of constructions.  However, for a programming language, you absolutely do care about particular lambda terms (ie, programs) -- there's a BIG difference between quick sort and bubble sort. So you want to work directly with your program, and not with search algorithms that find well-typed programs. And since programmers will be spending a lot of time with lambda terms, it's worth building in languages features that make programming more convenient, but would make writing proof search tactics more complex or harder.
Why is cloned food even a question? A clone is just an identical twin with a different birthday.
look again, the whitestars are there, as are a lotta b5 ships. though B4 is missing, which is odd as B4 is a lot bigger than B5 (and was mobile, given it had the largest ion drives in earth history (in the b5 universe, that is, of course :P ) )  --vat
very funny,thanks for sharing
&gt;Don't forget the cost of shutting down the government for a day? Uhhh... why would the government be shut down?
Didn't you get the memo?  The office of the presidency has been elevated to Caesar.  Presidents move around with a large praetorian guard.  When they die the nation must be awed by huge spectacles. Remember that FDR drove his own car and his wife cooked the meals in the White House.  This elevation of the president to Caesar is a development of the last 20 years.
An exclusive interview with Shaun Mullen, find out about the man behind the blog.
I've always heard the exact opposite of what you're saying. That is, the important aspect of flight is the angle of attack, which is why jet planes can fly upside down.
Where do you get the stickers??
I saw it on this site yesterday. Googling the phrase should find something. [This](http://ethnikoi.org/iran.html) is similar: &gt;A man can have sexual pleasure from a child as young as a baby.  However, he should not penetrate vaginally, but sodomising the child is acceptable.  If a man does penetrate and damage the child then, he should be responsible for her subsistence all her life.  This girl will not count as one of his four permanent wives and the man will not be eligible to marry the girl's sister...  It is better for a girl to marry at such a time when she would begin menstruation at her husband's house, rather than her father's home.  Any father marrying his daughter so young will have a permanent place in heaven.  ["Tahrirolvasyleh", fourth edition, Qom, Iran, 1990] &gt;A man can have sex with animals such as sheep, cows, camels and so on.  However, he should kill the animal after he has his orgasm.  He should not sell the meat to the people in his own village, but selling the meat to a neighbouring village is reasonable.  ["Tahrirolvasyleh"]
*Some* lift comes from the cambering. But as the article states, you'd need to get a Cessna up to 300 mph to get off the ground, if that were what you were relying on. The article *doesn't* say how fast a Cessna would ahve to go if it used flat wings and the optiimal angle for such wings, but I bet it's a lot less than 300 mph.
One of three posts on societal narcissism, started with the (now) popular "Time's Person Of The Year Is someone Who Doesn't Actually Matter"
Which of those three reasons you named are OS-independent? I grant you that some of them might be present in all commercial OS but there certainly isn't any bureaucracy in Linux or any other Open Source OS (unless maybe if you want to contribute to very large programs like the kernel, Gnome or KDE).
90% of the answer is 'Coanda Effect'. Which is fluids follow surfaces. Curved surface -&gt; curved fluid flow -&gt; Newton's third law.
"My fundamentalist ex-boyfriend changed his mind rather quickly on the topic of premarital sex." (laughs) I guess faith goes out the window when there's sex to be had.
I doubt any single Linux distribution could match Microsoft's ressources and yet they all seem to be able to produce a decent installer that can use all kinds of media (not just floppy disks), auto-detects hardward, automatically uses the correct drivers unless they are experimental or non-existent,...
Pedant:  Many of these are not fractals.
Are there any photos of the object all those people said they saw?
But guess what, the memory management is the bottleneck. Lunux has its own memory management in its core, and there's no way around it. So Windows memory management is EMULATED anyway, there's nothing you can do.  Besides, don't believe in bullshit statements like "Wine is a full reimplementation of the Windows API". It's impossible, unless you have Windows source code.
Wow the spelling in the title. AMAZING. Who is this idiot who can't type?
Yeah this is pretty obnoxious that you can't do that.  you can create a slipstreamed build that has any weird drivers you want in it, and include SPs, hotfixes, etc so you don't need the floppy.   For XP, I think a lot of it has to do with the limits of what you can fit on one CD.  With Vista being on a DVD, they were able to include all permutations on it, including all the different editions.  The key you put in during install determines whether Ultimate or Basic gets installed, Retail or OEM, etc. They really did fix a lot of these weird install things with XP/2003.
Tyranny of the majority (which we don't have yet) may be problematic, but I think we all know how tyranny of the minority goes. Of course, there are those very interested in post-state systems (or ones where the role of the state is fundamentally transformed): anarchists. [Chomsky](http://flag.blackened.net/revolt/rbr/noamrbr2.html) is perhaps the most visible figure, but there are many others... 
I've seen this film a couple of times.  It's pretty intense for the time, but not when seen in context of the current offerings in soft-core out there.  It's worth watching - very entertaining to say the least.
I don't think there is any fixed percentage. If you teach average C/C++ programmer to program in Common Lisp (Gabriel does not talk about Scheme here), 30% may be somewhat right.  But what if you teach really good C/C++ programmer say, somebody that is in the top 1% of his profession? I guess something like 100% - 1000% may attainable.  It is said that Lisp is programmer amplifier. It amplifies what you have in you. Because you can program the programming language to fit your problem domain and not vice versa, there is so much more room for great ideas (and mistakes). I think Common Lisp will never become mainstream language, but it seems that it's gaining popularity again among the code wizards.
Wordpress Template.PHP HTML Injection Vulnerability 27 December 2006
This is a good story.
yes.  Myself.  I used to be a fundamentalist.  I think I have a unique perspective on what actually is going on inside their puzzling minds, because I have been there.   But the bottom line is that in the end I am the only person who could have changed my mind.  Many people tried to talk to me and convince me otherwise before I was ready, and I held my own very strongly and convincingly (at least to myself) in the face of all their arguments. Don't try to change fundamentalists.  Just love them and befriend them and be a great example, and maybe someday it will occur to them that morality exists outside of religion.
FOREIGN mutual funds!!!  Keep an eye on them; learn trigger prices! For instance, I invested $17,475 in ICSEX in October 2006.  It costs 1.85% a year to maintain, so at minimum, I will pay $323 in fees (which is where the fund makes its money).  It's already appreciated to $19,812, or 12% in less than 70 days.  Annual increase in 2006?  37.43%.  But it's paid two months worth of dividends, so it's more than $20,000 today. That European fund is beating the American markets by a whopping 300%.  The Asia Pacific fund, started in July this year, looks to be even better.  ICSEX has appreciated 188% since 1997.   What that means is that if I had taken my college money and invested it (while in highschool), by the time I hit college, my $15,000 would have appreciated to 27,000 - 832 in fees; and that does NOT count derivatives.  In fact, counting derivatives, it would be worth closer to $40,000. But getting back on track, I invested in ICSEX when it was valuated at 18.82 (21.04 now).  What I did immediately was put a stop-loss order of 18.00 so that I would immediately cash out the day it depreciated by $760.  That day has, obviously, never arrived.  However, after it hit $21, $20.50 became the new out, etc.  I revise this with every calculated trigger price so that I'm always only losing less than 1% of my investment in any given 2 week window.  You can always reinvest it later, once the bottom has been reached, you see. The points: * Invest in foreign markets,  * Invest in non-USD-based stable investments,  * Keep your eye on them!  * Always have an open stop-loss order *or* if possible, a suitable amount of cheap put orders,  * Always re-adjust your stop loss orders up as the stock progresses, based upon your month-to-date appreciation.
it's not so much "I want sex so I'll do what it takes to get it".  It's more along the lines of "everyone has always told me that I am dirty bad wrong and evil and going straight to hell if I have a sexual feeling, but now that I'm here, I'm realizing that this is actually a positive, healing, growing experience.  Maybe those beliefs were wrong"
probably not as often as the hwy 69 road sign outside fort mcmurray, alberta
Are they? The wikipedia article uses the term "good quality solutions" which you could argue is a euphemism for non-optimal. ;-) The article referenced also lists deviation from optimal, which indicates that humans aren't generating optimal solutions, but merely reasonable ones. So we're really going by two standards, one where a computer is expected to perform perfectly and a human is expected to do good enough. Still, human intuition is a fascinating subject.  I like the study where grandmasters could memorize chess boards instantly if they were from real games, but couldn't if the pieces were randomly placed.
Well I still read the local Times Union, simply because it's a better paper with genuinely better coverage of what it can and does cover.
So, basically, you can't get rich at all in the stock markets. Slightly over $1,000,000 in 50 years is not what I call rich. Screw that. I'm starting a business.
No shit, Sherlock.
Yet another reason why Wikipedia cannot be trusted and should not be used as a source for anything. Without peer review PRIOR TO PUBLISHING, wikipedia as it stands is utterly worthless, except maybe as a form of (very) mild entertainment.  All the wiki-nuts blathering back and forth are absolutely hilarious, especially the ones going on about whether or not bloggers deserve a page...priceless.
&gt; there is more than enough work for everyone That's because you're not using lisp. :-)
Well, they aren't my numbers, it's not as if I made up the figure 160 000. A scientific study reached that conclusion. Maybe that's what you meant? Anyway, the results are not 0% correct in the sense that you could somehow refute all the scientific data gathered and prove that the earth is only 6000 years old. Or let me put it in terms you might understand, the only way for this data to be entirely incorrect is if God were to sneak in extra layers of ice in the Antartic presumably with the sole purpose of fucking with our heads.
In Canada, the best way to invest was to invest in income trusts. However, that's all gone since the current government decided to impose taxes on the whole thing. :(
No,  monasteries are not about services or scholarship or any of this crap:  it is about perpetual tax free status -- including no estate taxes.  Any organization with a tax free status such as this and free labor would accumulate in a few centuries enough dough to pay lip service to charity or scholarship or really cool architecture or whatever could confer them an aura of respectability. Raidi's open-source software frat house would get there just as effectively after a few centuries of not paying taxes.
He's dismissing the consumer. And yet, history shows no successful, intrusive DRM product. In my opinion, consumers are neither for nor against DRM in any principled way, *but* their reaction when stymied by DRM rules is: this product is broken. If that happens often enough, they feel scammed - and they tell their friends. I suspect what MS will find is that huge numbers of customers, both home and business, will be extremely reluctant to move off XP. This could even drive their usual network effect in reverse: businesses will be dissuaded from a move by partners who refuse to accept Vista-only documents.
I don't think it's even laziness. I have spent most of my life, to date, in education learning to develop software. I'm _good_ at developing software. On the other hand, I'm decidedly mediocre at cleaning. So, to me it makes perfect sense that I hire someone good at cleaning, for major cleaning jobs at least. They can do the job faster and better than I can, and I can spend that time working instead, and almost certainly make a net profit. 
Calexico?
This may not explain the atheism of *every* atheist out there, but it does explain the anti-Christian atheism (*) which seems like it is a considerable majority in the US atheists..  I am an atheist myself, and I would love to see people give up  superstition for rational/intelligent thinking..  But, an atheist majority in the country is still a long time away.. If we can get to this this modernized version of Christianity which Bishop Spong hopes for, I guess it will be still pretty awesome!  ----- ()"anti-Christian atheism" =&gt; 'I am an atheist because the bible is stupid/inaccurate/absurd'
What I usually find helpful is, similarly to techniques used for writing, just to write. Start with the simplest thing you can think of and write that. It can seem like a silly c function, or two lines of code that you know are flawed, wrong or even not perfect. Putting that first stroke of paint on the canvas even if you know is wrong will get you going and help you figure out what's right.  [shuri](http://www.shuri.org)
Well, historically, it's been a problem due to lack of library support, but I don't think there's any real problem anymore with writing games in Haskell apart from finding people who want to do it. A good chunk of the Haskell community is made up of people who care more about writing things like compilers and things having little to no user interface. Despite this, GHC comes with support for OpenGL, and there are SDL bindings and such which are no harder to use than their C counterparts. (Possibly even a bit easier, though not by much.) Performance used to be a larger problem than it is today. Once you're used to lazy evaluation, and provided that you're using the right abstractions, it's not that hard to get the level of efficiency required by games. (Frag is more of a proof of concept than anything.) There are perfectly fine ways to get decent performance in Haskell code without sacrificing clarity, but the gap in performance between knowing what you're doing and not can be large. Just the other day in #haskell, we took a couple of minutes and brought someone's program from using something like O(n^4) memory, in practical terms something like 300MB on the problems he was trying, down to a roughly constant 30MB, and the runtimes went from tens of minutes down to a few seconds. It's really just a matter of being able to see how things will be evaluated (outermost first + sharing), and knowing what data structures are available (like unboxed arrays, diff arrays, Set, Map, and so on). People who write programs in Haskell treating it as if it was a strict language may be in for a few nasty surprises at first. These can all be overcome with a little knowledge though. Yampa approaches a more declarative model that was originally aimed at programming robotics. It could be quite a natural model for game implementation. It would be rather nice to see a game engine library written to use functional reactive programming with OpenGL. Frag looks like it already has a decent chunk of what would be needed, but I haven't looked too closely. Personally, I'd like to see some 2-D games written using Haskell. (Say, a platform game like Supertux... "Lambda the Cat" anyone?) It's been done quite successfully in Clean, which is another lazily evaluated functional language, with a slightly different take on how to handle IO (linear typing restrictions are used instead of monadic IO). In principle though, it's possible to write a game in Haskell with much the same sort of overall design as you would write it in an imperative language. Most Haskell programmers are not so content with that, but it's absolutely not a problem to do it. Haskell can make quite a good imperative language even. Really, the major problem is in finding people who are sufficiently interested in writing games, and who also know Haskell.
So that somehow automatically makes her guilty of it?
There is not confidence and will never be, in the same way a creationist can not believe the evidence in evolution. Let see: * The voting machines are electronic...  * ...but they print confirmation tickets which are deposited in a box  * The totalization program is reviewed by all parties and some observers  * The totalization program is signed electronically by all the parts. A voting machine can not run if the program signature has changed  * Each voter has to present an identification document, his/her fingerprints are checked, (s)he has to sing an assistance book, and his/her finger is inked to avoid multiple votation  * 55% of all the votation boxs are checked: the votation tickets agreed with the electronic acts  * Political parties have representation in each center  * Copy of the acts are given to each party  * National and international observers were permitted and manifested the transparency of the process  * The recommendations of international observers made in the last electoral event were implemented  * Most of the polls gave Chavez a 15-20 points over his opponent   * His opponent recognized the results  * Those who claimed fault now and in the past have never been able to bring evidence
or the Hague.
Nobody is forcing you to use it. Go and use Britannica - with luck, they will eventually have useful articles about technology and pop culture by the year 2050, so that is not a long wait. Wikipedia has its shortcomings - and lots. But overall, it is one of the best things that the internet has created.
Interesting story, but I think it's unlikely. To my ears it sounds like someone imitating Hendrix rather than Hendrix himself. The guitar effects also sound a little more modern than what was available in 1970. I could easily be wrong though. A key point is that the track was "tacked on to the end" of the tape - it wasn't necessarily recorded at the same time as the rest of the tracks.
The typical high-school student may not have actually learned one damned thing about the classics, but they have it on their transcript. That's one of the funny differences.  A normal kid and I might know the exact same information on a particular subject and they get credit for knowing things they don't, just because they knew it for long enough to pass an exam in school.
I think he's hit the nail on the head, and the WSJ is heading in the right direction. I still enjoy the actual physical act of reading a newspaper.  It's so much easier on the eyes to read actual paper as opposed to an LCD screen.  Besides, I spend enough time in front of a computer (I average 14-15 hours a day on workdays, and probably another 8-10 a day on weekends) that the last thing I want to do first thing in the morning is plop down in front of a monitor, or if I'm in a coffee shop to pull out my laptop.
&gt;spent 12 years tracking the cuddly African mongoose
I'm Jewish and homeschooled.  The two have no relation at all.  I was Jewish before homeschooling and will be Jewish afterwards. Despite my love for my religion, we do not include it as an academic subject.  While I may yet read a Talmudic argument to study rhetoric (for example), Judaism in and of itself presents no academic value to any non-Jew. I keep a study Tanach in English, but do not read it except occasionally on weekends. Even homeschoolers who follow a religion are not necessarily religious homeschoolers.
At The Onion, every day is April 1. :)
I see your (one/some) Tiger in some Siberian villages (population: ?) getting chased away by a Dog; And raise you 47 Leopards, in Mumbai, India (population: 16 million, among the most densely populated cities in the world, India's Financial Capital and home to 2nd largest(?) movie industry in the world..), who attack and killed people (12 in one month) and had to be caught by Animal Control and released back into the National Park they escaped from..   http://www.dailyindia.com/show/94162.php/Wild-leopards-to-roam-outskirts-of-Mumbai :) (BTW, cool video..) 
Wow. That'd be a real low point. Having Microsoft intentionally break peoples' computers just to make them pay more money - sounds like blackmail doesn't it? Then they'd bring out the old Windows 98 CD they have lying around.
Sorry. No photo, no story. Could have been a [lenticular cloud formation](http://pic1.funtigo.com/valuca?g=25544746&amp;cr=1)? /still believe though   
This or something similar was posted a long while back.  For some reason I can't find my comment... Basically though, this article is crap.  The [coanda effect is fallacy](http://www.av8n.com/how/htm/spins.html#sec-coanda-fallacy).  Google it, the effect comes from a [guy into model airplanes](http://jef.raskincenter.org/home/index.html), not an aerodynamicist in industry or at the university level.  Also, having taken aerodyanmics, flight mechanics, a boundary layer course, and most everything else in a fairly good undergrad program I have never heard of this effect.  Last time the article was posted I looked through my aerodynamics text and could find no mention of it.  Also, the article bluntly says NASA is wrong under further reading.  Believe who you want, a model airplane guy, or NASA. 
I am french and I thought it was a nice way of making fun of protesters of all forms, as well as a cool flash mob kind of event.
"i think there are many holes in the "Dawkins admits he's wrong, while his opponents don't" that anyone attempting objectivity could see easily. if someone really has a hard time seeing them and actually wants it explained, then i'll do it, it's just not really worth having to explain things objectively if my audience is a bunch of atheists who don't want their bubble burst." You are the one who needs your bubble bursting.  You have set up so many 'straw men' arguments that can easily be dismissed: "to be honest, i was just searching for objective treatments of dawkins that didn't seek to glorify him." Then look no further than the work of his fellow scientists. "I wouldn't call him a fanatic either--he's too cold and calculated to be considered a fanatic" Cold and calculated?  You have got to be joking.  Much of his work is written with warmth and humour.  "--but I would say that he's a bit extreme, in the sense that he lies quite far out of the mainstream." Actually his views are very mainstream.  The only unusual thing about him is that he has the courage to stand up and challenge religion and ignorance.  The problem is that religion has had a protected status. "if Dawkins really is a man who can admit when he's wrong, then maybe atheists need him more than they think." Of course he can admit when he is wrong.  Take the time to read some of his books - the Extended Phenotype is one of the best.  He gives many examples of how he has been proved wrong in his career.  Like a true scientist he admits his mistakes with good grace. 
Prove that you exist.
No wonder, Tom Sizemore's in it. /get better tom
The basic principle I use (or, rather, *would* use if I had any money to invest ;)) is that of minimizing your exposure.  Find all the risks that you are exposed to in the foreseeable future, and buy contracts that will pay out in those eventualities. Sometimes this will be in the form of insurance - fire, theft, injury etc, and other times it will be in the form of tradeables - stocks, commodities, bonds etc. I've written a longish comment on this before, so if you're interested in my thoughts, [read this](http://reddit.com/info/unas/comments/cupa8).
Why does something have to be dominant in order to be good? Rather, why does something have to be dominant to find use? This seems to be a project management problem and not a technical problem with tools.
Just a small, minor note: 173 IQ score is far beyond the point (about 140, IIRC) where IQ starts losing significance.  A 173 score is basically "too smart to measure accurately with this test". Oh, and about most of the rest of your posts:  "To understand all is to forgive all." - the only true Christian who ever lived
Dude, maybe link to the article instead of your two-line blog analysis of it.
&gt; If it worked for you (tm), you wouldn't be bitching either. That's your assumption, and funnily enough it's wrong. Amazingly, some people do actually feel strongly enough about issues that don't affect them directly to go and do something about it. &gt; So you're saying that all your opponent has to do in order to win is to ignore you? If you want X, and your opponent wants Y, as soon as he does Y you give up and go home? The standards bodies have showed a complete disregard for the consumer. The content producers generally have shown a complete disregard for the consumer. All we as the consumer have managed to do is ensure that multi-region DVD players sell better than fixed-region players, to the point where you would now be hard pressed to find the latter on sale.  The time to fight DVD content restrictions was 10 years ago - so we shrug and move on when someone clueless complains when they discover a battle that was fought and lost *in their name* in the distant past. Our attention is now on the next generation of even more draconian standards and we look set to lose out even more there. So, to sum up, this is old and irrelevant - keep up, and focus on the battle that is still being fought.
Downmodded because the author doesn't realize that the only "weak" type system commonly in use is C's.   All modern languages have relatively strong type systems.  What the author wants to talk about is static vs. dynamic, not strong vs. weak.
Well, this is an interesting twist on the whole affair. I don't agree with this person regarding the defintion of atheism, where it seems to me like someone can't imagine how some people just don't believe in any higher deities. But I would certainly take his God over the one that Americans keep asking to bless their nation.
&gt; I invested $17,475 in **ICSEX** Hilarious. If your going to make shit up, at least dont use obviously fake symbols.
They can... *now*. But they *couldn't*. The link *was* correctly titled. The phrase you quoted was added *six hours* after the link was posted. Additionnally, it is buried in the discussion. The much more prominent notice was added later, after I read the discussion.
Well he'll have to go to one eventually.
That *was* true.
I can vouch for this one.  Having a nice long list of things to do is very nice.  Though I attribute it mostly simply to the knowledge that you have options of other things to work on.  I know for me, having only one task to work on, and being at a stand-still on it almost always leads to stress and despair.
right, you are an atheist with respect to a God taht hates homosexuals and wants America to slaughter people with chemical weapons. nothing wrong with that. i don't understand why more Americans turn atheist with respect to this monster of a God.
Not to mention that 11 million in the future probably buys a box of pop tarts.
The simple answer is that lift is generated via Newton's third law by accelerating air downward. Wikipedia actually provides a reasonable summary of [aerodynamic lift](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Lift_%28force%29) with links to more complete explanations. The sad thing about the linked article is that a fellow **working for an aircraft manufacturing company** chooses to ask the straight dope instead of engineers working at his company.  Despite the misinformation often delvered in high school science classes, this phenomenon is fairly well understood with plentiful reference material and decades of experimental data closely aligning to theory. 
All the editions of XP are similar enough to fit on one CD too, I have seen howtos for slipstreamed XP CDs doing that (or at least 5-6 of the editions).
Actually, the enslaved children are enticed from Mali and other countries with promises of good wages and bicycles.  Once on the Ivory Coast plantations, they are not paid, and beaten if they don't produce or try to leave.  They would have eaten better if they had stayed in Mali. You know nothing about me, sir.  If I were to argue anything, it would be to not make choices in an information vacuum.
